status,title,company,location,date,blurb,tags,link,id,provider,query
new,Project Coordinator,Exceptionaire Technologies,"Pune, Maharashtra",2020-01-11,"Junior/Senior PC  Experience:- 3 Years
Joining: Immediate
Job Description:-
Project Coordinator / Senior. Business Analyst:-
End-to-end customer communication, engagement & satisfaction.
The bridge between the customer (International) & the technology team (Internal)
2+ yrs of experience in project planning using project management systems like JIRA, ZOHO etc
Daily updates to customers, weekly demos, monitor project delivery, mapping project progress against milestones, meeting milestone timelines, benchmarking project delivery against SLAs / contracts/scope documents,
Documenting processes, plans etc
Auditing the delivery tasks, daily scrums, creating checks & balances to ensure nothing is missed during the development phase
Monitoring scope creeps to ensure the project is delivered within budget & on-time.
Experience creating FRDs, FSDs, Wireframes
2+ years of experience in managing web & mobile application development projects
Managing expectations of all stakeholders in the project.
Prompt communication

Desired Skills:-

Excellent documentation / wireframing skills
Excellent verbal & written communication skills
Excellent interpersonal skills (client communication; internal communication)
Strong Team handling skills
Strong negotiation skills
Strong technical know-how of IT / software technologies
Conversant with the software development lifecycle & methodologies
Performance-oriented & not a believer of the 9-5 shift job
Smart & hard working, self-driven, willing to take on challenges, accountable, taking ownership, committed, flexible",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=5d38bcaae2dd45b3,5d38bcaae2dd45b3,indeed,ZOHO
new,Project Manager,CyberWorx Technologies,"Delhi, Delhi",2020-01-11,"Account Manager Responsibilities:
Operating as the lead point of contact for any and all matters specific to your accounts
Building and maintaining strong, long-lasting customer relationships
Overseeing customer account management, including negotiating contracts and agreements to maximize profit
Job brief
We are looking for an Account Manager to create long-term, trusting relationships with our customers. The Account Managers role is to oversee a portfolio of assigned customers, develop new business from existing clients and actively seek new sales opportunities.
What does an Account Manager do?
Account management responsibilities include developing strong relationships with customers, connecting with key business executives and stakeholders and preparing sales reports. Account Managers also answer client queries and identify new business opportunities among existing customers. In this role, you will liaise with cross-functional internal teams (including Customer Service and Product Development departments) to improve the entire customer experience. This position may require occasional travel.
If you are familiar with account management and have a flair for client communication and understand consumer behavior, wed like to meet you.
Ultimately, a successful Account Manager should collaborate with our sales team while keeping our clients satisfied and engaged with our products and services in the long-run.
Responsibilities
Serve as the lead point of contact for all customer account management matters
Build and maintain strong, long-lasting client relationships
Develop trusted advisor relationships with key accounts, customer stakeholders and executive sponsors
Ensure the timely and successful delivery of our solutions according to customer needs and objectives
Clearly communicate the progress of monthly/quarterly initiatives to internal and external stakeholders
Develop new business with existing clients and/or identify areas of improvement to meet sales quotas
Prepare reports on account status
Collaborate with sales team to identify and grow opportunities within territory
Assist with challenging client requests or issue escalations as needed
Requirements
Proven work experience as an Account Manager, Key Account Manager, Sales Account Manager, Junior Account Manager or relevant role
Demonstrable ability to communicate, present and influence key stakeholders at all levels of an organization, including executive and C-level
Solid experience with CRM software (e.g. Salesforce, Zoho CRM or HubSpot) and MS Office (particularly MS Excel)
Experience delivering client-focused solutions to customer needs
Proven ability to juggle multiple account management projects at a time, while maintaining sharp attention to detail
Excellent listening, negotiation and presentation abilities
Strong verbal and written communication skills",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=bd88bd5cfa666f7d,bd88bd5cfa666f7d,indeed,ZOHO
new,Inside Sales Rep,InstaSafe,"Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-01-11,"We are hiring an Outbound Inside Sales Rep for our team that is located in Bangalore, India. Our ideal candidate is highly motivated, collaborative, and an opportunity mapper with a passion for value proposition.



Requirements
Essential duties and responsibilities may include, but are not limited to:

- Identify qualified prospects and navigate company structures to identify decision-makers.

- Assertive and persuasive.

- Learn, leverage and help evolve our demand generation process.

- Very strong interpersonal and communication skills to understand the opportunity, and the needs of prospects

- Experience using Zoho CRM is preferred.


You would be a great fit if you Are / Have:

- 0-1 year prior sales experience (within a Software/High Tech company is a plus)

- Fearless attitude  willing to take intelligent risks

- Hard-working and willing to achieve a volume of outbound calling activity every day while maintaining a positive and energetic persona.

- Problem Solver

- Ability to work in a team environment

- Articulate with strong business acumen



Benefits

 Challenging real world problems - You will need to deploy automated, scalable and reliable services;

 Constant learning - You will often be ideating on cutting-edge technologies as we believe in finding the right tool for the problem rather than fitting the problem to the tools we already know

 Opportunity to shape InstaSafe


 

 - As part of the team, everything you do will influence the growth and direction of InstaSafe


 ",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=c0785cf57992a453,c0785cf57992a453,indeed,ZOHO
new,Senior Sales Consultant B2B (Saas),10xBiz,"Hyderabad, Telangana",2020-01-11,"Job Information
Industry
IT Services
Salary
35,000.00 to 60,000.00 /month
City
Hyderabad
State/Province
Telangana
Zip/Postal Code
500081
Job Description

Job Summary

The Pre Sales Consultant coordinates technical pre-sales activities. He/she technical and product knowledge to customers via good written, verbal and presentation skills. Assists in all levels of technical account planning. The Pre Sales Consultant supports the successful achievement of sales targets by analyzing the technical needs and proving products ability to deliver the IT solutions proposed to prospects or existing customers.



Responsibilities and Duties

Work individually or in teams to deliver projects for global clients, and be responsible, with minimal supervision to:

Independently liaise with customers and convincingly present solutions - especially in an unstructured and ever-changing client environment. Be able to independently question the customer, when required

Gather business requirements from client stakeholders via interactions like interviews and workshops

Understand customer needs and translate them to business requirements (business requirement definition), business process flows and functional requirements thereby acting as an interface between business and technology teams

Ability to understand the as-is process; understand issues with the processes which can be resolved either through technology or process solutions and design detail level to-be process with all stakeholders.

Ability to analyze data and determine key trends and develop appropriate and relevant recommendations for the client

Understanding of how cloud-based applications are delivered and consumed

Understand of unique feature and challenges of SaaS applications

Exceptional critical thinking skills is a plus



Requirements
Qualifications and Skills

Excellent written, verbal, and interpersonal communication

Prior experience working for a US-based company and providing email, chat, and voice support to US customers is preferred

Experience working in customer support in the SaaS industry is preferred

Strong familiarity with popular CRM tools such as Zoho, ZenDesk, SalesForce, etc.

Strong knowledge of MS Office (especially MS Excel) and spreadsheets.

Proven customer support experience or experience as a client service representative

Customer orientation and ability to adapt/respond to different types of characters

Strong analytical and critical thinking skills

Ability to multi-task, prioritize, and manage time effectively

Flexible approach, able to operate effectively with uncertainty and change

Driven, self-motivated, enthusiastic and with a can do attitude

Experience working with cross-functional teams

Comfortable in a startup environment and wear many hats in a dynamic environment




Benefits
10Biz Is into Cloud-based ERP implementation, we Build the ERP Applications on top of ZOHO Platform right now we are giving the end to end Solutions for certain Industry Specific Solutions like real estate, Logistics and Retail, Banking and Financial Institutions
Our Core Strength is we have ready to deploy solutions for these type of Industries
Our Major Clients is from USA and UK, Middle East
as a 10X we help the organizations to achieve top-notch performance by Completely automation of t business process to enrich the full potential and effective utilization of resources to reach 10x results. We align the team and technologies for 10x results. We have helped hundreds of organizations to achieve their 10x results within a short span of time using Robust Applications.

A competitive salary

The opportunity to learn tons at a rapidly growing startup

Will always respect the Ideas

We have a policy of No Work Hour (3 times in a week ) Which will allow you to Brainstorm and Deep thinking and Idea Pitching

Our great 10x Team",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=cd9db1bc5b3e20ba,cd9db1bc5b3e20ba,indeed,ZOHO
new,Associate Manager  Client Servicing,vCommission,"Gurgaon, Haryana",2020-01-15,"Focus Area: CPS
Advertisers should choose vCommission as their 1st priorityComplete clarity of offers about terms, tracking & reportingMaintain up to date Advertiser/Offer information in HO & ZohoStay updated regarding offer terms & payout in industryAnalyse daily performance through Offer & Conversion reportNumber reconciliation & advertiser feedback reportUp-sell: Renew campaigns before budget or date expiryIdentify & cross sell offer variants running in industryMonthly number confirmation for timely billing closureAssist Finance team for on-time collection of paymentsPresent proper offer information Business MeetingEnsure prompt Internal Communication",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=d6d4d0c07dd75c24,d6d4d0c07dd75c24,indeed,ZOHO
new,Customer Success Manager (B2B- Saas),10xBiz,"Hyderabad, Telangana",2020-01-11,"Job Information
Industry
IT Services
Salary
250,000.00 to 600,000.00 /year
City
Hyderabad
State/Province
Telangana
Zip/Postal Code
500081
Job Description
Who We Are

*10x Biz (https://www.10xbiz.co/):

""Automation is the Game Changer in New Era As per the Forbes Magazine Published on Jan 2019 Automation expected to replace almost half of the global workforce. Multiple industries, from Manufacturing to Banking, are adopting Automation to drive productivity, safety, profitability, and quality"".

We help the organizations to achieve top-notch performance by Completely automation of the business process (Sales Automation, Marketing Automation, Finance Automation, Project management, Customer Support Management etc) to enrich the full potential and effective utilization of resources to reach 10x results. We align the team and technologies for 10x results. We have helped hundreds of organizations to achieve their 10x results within a short span of time using Robust Applications which was built on Salesforce and Zoho.

This Job is not for everyone. This is only for the people who believe themselves as an out of the box thinker and growth hacker, who can approach the solutions to the problems in a different way (Blue Ocean Way)

Come and Join Hands With us into Creative World with Smart People who help you to grow 10x Smarter With our 10x Culture



We are looking for someone to be responsible for Handling the Clients across the World

The candidate is expected to be a highly-motivated individual who will play a key role in driving and executing requirements for our customers. The candidate is expected to be a Self-starter with curiosity to learn, having a customer-centric mentality with superb analytical skills and persistence in problem-solving. The candidate will assist in executing the standard day to day responsibilities of the team working with projects for the Cloud platform. The position requires leadership capabilities, critical thinking, analytical skills, attention to detail, and a strong understanding of trading workflows.


Requirements

Ability to multi-task, prioritize, and manage time effectively

Should have Good Knowledge on Business analytics

Flexible approach, able to operate effectively with uncertainty and change

Driven, self-motivated, enthusiastic and with a can do attitude

Strong communication skills and excellent command overwritten English

Candidate should have Good at presentations Skills

The candidate is expected to be a highly-motivated individual who will play a key role in driving and executing requirements for our customers.

The candidate is expected to be a Self-starter with curiosity to learn, having a customer-centric mentality with superb analytical skills and persistence in problem solving.

The position requires leadership capabilities, critical thinking, analytical skills, attention to detail, and a strong understanding of trading workflows

Effectively communicating your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management.



Benefits
A competitive salary

The opportunity to learn tons at a rapidly growing startup

Will always respect the Ideas

We have a policy of No Work Hour (3 times in a week ) Which will allow you to Brainstorm and Deep thinking and Idea Pitching

Our great 10x Team",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=87a6aa25db0ac272,87a6aa25db0ac272,indeed,ZOHO
new,Digital Marketing Executive,Cloudbyz Inc.,"Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-01-11,"3+ Years of experience in digital marketing, SEO, SEM, Social Marketing, Email Campaigns and content marketing
3-5 years in social marketing, content marketing, email marketing and demand generations, lead generations
Exceptional Experience in social marketing, email marketing, SEO, SEM and content marketing
Salesforce.com Developer certification is strongly preferred
Familiarity with marketing tools such as Salesforce marketing, mailChimp, LinkedIn, Social tools, Zoho, blogs, Google Analytics, Google Adwords etc",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=5a0531a5c1b7551d,5a0531a5c1b7551d,indeed,ZOHO
new,Business Development Executive,HashTag Technologies,"Coimbatore, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-11,"Coimbatore, India
Are you excited to be a part of an international sales team that is going to drive the next phase of growth in cutting-edge technologies? We have a spectrum of software development and consulting offerings in Web, Mobile, and Digital Marketing services. If you like working in an empowered, open work culture and passionate about sales, we would love to talk to you!
Desired Profile:
Responsible for reporting to Chief Executive & Business Development Manager on daily, weekly and monthly basis.
Any graduation, MBA (Marketing, IT & Systems) from good institute will be an advantage.
Minimum 0-1-year experience in of IT/Software products & services sales or marketing.
Outstanding verbal & written communication skills.
Can express their ideas in persuasive emails and other written communications.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Roles and Responsibilities:
Possess ability and desire for sales and highly challenging to meet the targets consistently.
Better understanding of our offerings, prospect streams and industry verticals.
Generate and collect potential lead from internet market research.
Prospecting the contacts and converting them to qualified opportunities through email marketing, cold emailing, sales follow-ups and other online marketing campaigns.
Ongoing record keeping and forecasting within Zoho CRM.
Build Digital Marketing Strategy & Plans for growing fan base, Reach, Engagement, Leads, Sales and then drive that strategy proven by testing and metrics; focusing on LinkedIn, Twitter, Facebook, Google+, YouTube, Slide Share, Pinterest, Vine, Instagram.
Work with management to develop marketing campaigns to support Sales Strategy. Generate new business and raise awareness of other company products and services.
Work with management to apply organisation sales and project management standards in preparing proposals and contracts, responding to customer needs and managing the sales process from opportunity identification to customer sign off.",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=af98fb29fc732e29,af98fb29fc732e29,indeed,ZOHO
new,Senior Manager  Digital Marketing,CustomerXPs,"Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-01-11,"We are looking for Senior Manager  Digital Marketing to implement, track, optimize our digital marketing campaigns across our online channels. If you live and breathe digital marketing, we want to meet you!

Come aboard our growing global team, and work for a category leader with a market presence in 15 countries. You will work with some of the leading financial institutions worldwide who rely on our product innovation in helping them shield themselves against the global $4 trillion problems of financial fraud. We create customer-centric predictable enterprises and we do this by directing intelligence to the heart of every customer interaction. In real-time.

The Role:
Plan and execute our digital marketing campaigns on social media, email, and web in collaboration with content development specialists (internal and external)
Build and maintain our social media presence across our digital properties
Measure and report performance of digital marketing campaigns
Identify trends and insights, and continuously evaluate emerging digital marketing technologies
Brainstorm new, creative digital marketing strategies
Assist in the development and execution of internal / employee brand marketing content
Skills
Minimum of 6 Years of experience in Digital Marketing
Ability to execute strategic and tactical digital campaigns on schedule
Good knowledge of tools (working knowledge of Mailchimp and Zoho would be an advantage)
Good English communication (verbal and written)
Good analytical skills and data-driven thinking
Up-to-date with the latest trends and best practices in online marketing and measurement

The position is based at our SRIT office in Brookfields, Bangalore.

Your Education / Qualification:
MBAs
Bachelors degree in Engineering or Science
About Us

Endorsed Category Leader in Financial Crime Risk Management Systems for Enterprise Fraud by Chartis Research, Winner of Best Fraud Detection Product by Risk.net and ranked consistently in Chartis RiskTech100 rankings, CustomerXPs redefines real-time, cross-channel banking Enterprise Fraud Management using AI as a central nervous system to fight financial crime. The companys flagship product Clari5 harnesses the combined power of Automation, AI, Decision Sciences & Real-time Decisions. Clari5 currently processes over 10 billion transactions, manages over 500 million accounts and reliably secures 4% of the global populations banking transactions. With 200 million accounts at a single site, Clari5 has the worlds largest implementation of a fraud management solution. Tier 1 banking customers across 15 countries who trust Clari5 for driving their fraud management strategy are recipients of global industry acclaim, including Banking Technologys Best Use of IT in Risk Management/Regulation and Celents Model Bank of the Year.",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=1e07490ef3d3006f,1e07490ef3d3006f,indeed,ZOHO
new,Customer Retention Lead,Hotstar,"Mumbai, Maharashtra",2020-01-14,"Hiring Managers speak

Hotstar partners with hundreds of advertisers to grow their brand & business. Our ambition is to scale this up to 10,000+ and then 100,000+. What got us here wont take us there. We are building a tech and data-driven self-serve engine that will help businesses of all sizes reach audiences with hotstar. The SMB Sales Strategy team will develop GTM and build infrastructure and processes to power this growth. We will put in building blocks to dramatically scale up our platform.

Customer Retention Lead: We are setting up the business of the future. You will drive programs for retention and nurturing of both leads and advertisers gained via marketing campaigns and sales teams. You will be responsible for setting up and driving drip & nurture campaigns via emails, webinars & more and enable marketing automation.

You will also work closely with cross-functional teams for various initiatives including inside sales and field sales, acquisition & analytics, product and ad-tech, sales operations, finance and legal.

Your Key Responsibilities
Develop a good understanding of hotstars value proposition, ad formats and self-serve platform for advertisers as well as the ecosystem of digital advertising. This will be oriented towards SMBs, startups and upcoming brands.
Set up and manage marketing drips for all leads acquired in CRM via digital marketing or organic routes. Work with Inside sales & analytics teams to establish and manage cadence of communication with different types of leads
End to end planning and execution for all email marketing campaigns, whether as part of drips, or to drive specific offerings or events on hotstar like IPL, India Cricket and more
Planning and execution of webinars and other content marketing routes to nurture and evangelize hotstars ad offering to the community of advertisers and agencies
Metrics oriented; use data and analytics to understand sales pipeline, conversion rates, and overall measure and impact results.
Focus on conversion from MQLs to SQLs, continuously improve drop-offs from top of funnel and enable repeat business from existing customers.
What to bring
Post-graduate with 3-6 years of experience in B2B marketing from organizations offering SAAS or advertising sales; experience with driving email marketing and/or customer retention
Strong hands on experience on working and managing marketing automation platforms (Salesforce, Zoho, etc)
Strong understanding of 1x1 Marketing channels like email (deliverability, open rates etc), chat comms, sms platforms etc.
Good articulation and communication skills to drive the right messaging in a B2B sales environment
An understanding of digital marketing and advertising landscape will be an added advantage;
Ability to work in a fast-paced, dynamic, startup environment; with the discipline to drive an iterative, data-driven approach
Analytical acumen paired with agile, entrepreneurial mindset and can-do attitude
Proven track record of generating leads and driving business


#Non-tech",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=4a8e853dbc518413,4a8e853dbc518413,indeed,ZOHO
new,Sales Executive / Manager,CEPTES Software Pvt,"Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-01-11,"Desired Skills:

Minimum 3 to 5 years of experience in CRM / ERP / Software sales, like Salesforce, MS Dynamics(D365), Oracle, SAP, Zoho, Lead square. Hubspot etc.
They should know complete sales cycle(End to end sales)  Lead generation, lead qualification, lead assessment, RFP, Negotiation, Sales.
Result Oriented
Self Driven
Self Motivated
Very Aggressive
Go Getter
Positive Attitude
Good Communication Skills",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=f37043b3dbb5032d,f37043b3dbb5032d,indeed,ZOHO
new,Salesforce Consultant,10xBiz,"Hyderabad, Telangana",2020-01-11,"Job Information
Industry
IT Services
Work Experience
Fresher
Salary
220,000.00 to 450,000.00 /year
City
Hyderabad
State/Province
Telangana
Zip/Postal Code
500081
Job Description
Job Description

Responsibilities:

Business requirements analysis

Creating and presenting software demos with customers requirements

Project planning and resourcing

Implementation of CRM & ERP System using one of the cloud based CRM/ERP provided by 10xBiz

Working as a conduit between Customers and Technical team

Testing the solution before handing over to the customer for UAT

Training users on the ERP/CRM System

Support customers post implementation

The role is for junior to mid-level executives and remuneration will be based on your experience.

10xBiz is now looking for a professional, detailed oriented and confident ERP/CRM Implementation Consultant with a flavour of project management.

The ideal candidate should have a graduate degree and should have strong knowledge of business processes together with some project management skills. The candidate must be a strong communicator and should be able to work as a member of a team. The candidate should have a good understanding of Financial Systems with knowledge of any of the leading financial systems will be advantageous.



Requirements
Skills/Experience:

Degree in Technology, Business, Accounting, MIS or equivalent (Software Development Degree is not required)

Some knowledge of finance/accounting (if not from accounting background)

Experience of using and/or supporting one or more of the following applications: Zoho, Salesforce, Microsoft Dynamics CRM, Microsoft Dynamics Nav, SAP etc.

Knowledge of core business processes such as finance, purchase and payables, sales and distribution and project management required

Good English and presentation skills are a necessity for this role.



Benefits
A competitive salary

The opportunity to learn tons at a rapidly growing startup

Will always respect the Ideas

We have a policy of No Work Hour (3 times in a week ) Which will allow you to Brainstorm and Deep thinking and Idea Pitching

Our great 10x Team",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=67a44710305aefab,67a44710305aefab,indeed,ZOHO
new,Quality Analyst,Konstant Infosolutions,"Jaipur, Rajasthan",2020-01-11,"Requirements and Duties :
Execute and evaluate manual or automated test cases and report test results.
To communicate bugs to developers and other stakeholders
Review functional and design specifications to ensure complete understanding of individual deliverables.
Ensure that validated deliverables meet functional and design specifications and requirements.
Researching business opportunities to identify new leads and potential new markets
Identify project requirements and focus on deadlines and deliverables
Identify any potential quality issues as per defined process and escalate potential quality issues immediately to management.
Skill and Ability :
Should be proficient with using bug-tracking tools like JIRA, Bugzilla, Mantis, and Zoho
Familiar with the process of Load Testing, Security Testing, Bug Tracking, Functional Testing and Regression Testing
Should have knowledge of using QA tools like Selenium WebDriver, JMeter, Appium and Wapiti
Ability to comprehend and create test plans from specifications or verbal communications.
Hands-on experience with Quality Management Software and Processes
Ability to write test plans and test cases.
Should have keen eye for detail and can create clear, concise detail-oriented test plans/cases.",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=ed428cf295bacb8d,ed428cf295bacb8d,indeed,ZOHO
new,Digital Marketing Internship,InstaSafe Technologies,"Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-01-26,"About the company:
InstaSafe is a leading provider of cloud-based security solutions, that help mobile & remote workers securely access enterprise apps, emails, and web on a SaaS model. Unlike appliance-based solutions, InstaSafe offers a hardware-free, zero-configuration, self-service style, and a fully redundant security-as-service which could be deployed in minutes with comprehensive reporting.
About the internship/job:
Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilities include: 1. Execute email campaigns in accordance with the sales team and lead generation 2. Build both automated and manual email campaigns 3. Work on reporting, analysis, and optimization of the email campaigns and social media
Who can apply:
Only those students or freshers can apply who:
are available for full time (in-office) internship
have relevant skills and interests
can start the internship between 23rd Jan'20 and 22nd Feb'20
are available for duration of 3 months
have already graduated or are currently in any year of study
Females willing to start/restart their career may also apply
Other requirements:
Action taker and problem solver with strong accountability and ownership Comfortable working with Excel Hands-on experience with marketing tools like Zoho Campaigns, HubSpot marketing Hub
Number of internships/jobs available: 2
Categories: Digital Marketing,MBA",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=21c36f868995817d,21c36f868995817d,indeed,ZOHO
new,Application Support Engineer,Autoplant System India PVT LTD,"Mumbai, Maharashtra",2020-01-11,"Location: Mumbai, India

Responsibilities/Duties:

Resolves Software or Service problems via phone, email, mail, or social media; Determining the cause of the problem; selecting and explaining the best solution to solve the problem expediting correction or adjustment; following up to ensure resolution.
Proactive Monitoring of Software solution and Service Uptime
Maintaining Customer Records related to their queries and issues
Understanding of customer requirements by collecting customer information and analyzing customer needs.
Use telephones or Customer Visits to reach out to customers to serve in better way
Need to process high volume of data accurately and for extended period
Preparing Performance reports, Trend analysis
Prepare Presentations
Client Visits across pan India
Jira, Zoho.
Skills:

Customer Service
Quality Focus
Problem Solving
Market Knowledge
Listening, Phone Skills,
Good Analytical Skills
Knowledge of Microsoft Office,
Documentation Skills
Multi-tasking
Basic Technical skills >> SQL/Oracle",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=fba80ca05bc8d6bb,fba80ca05bc8d6bb,indeed,ZOHO
new,Accounts Management Specialist,Econz IT solutions,"Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-01-22,"Location: Bangalore
What we expect?

Manage all financial transaction by raising Invoices and follow-up with payment process
Accurate quantitative information on business financial position, customer profitability inputs
How we expect you to do it?

Raise Invoices
Accounts Receivable
Follow-up on collections
Invoice dispute management
Verify input on tool (Zoho)
Analysis of Sales / Financial reports
Outward Remittance
Tax analysis and management
Partner Billing management
Tools cost management
Per customer profitability mapping.
Do you fit in?

1  2 years of experience in the same field.
Degree & formal training in the area of work.
Good knowledge of MS Office Excel and Word.
Able to multitask, prioritize, and manage time efficiently also able to work independently as an active member of a team.
Salary: 4.0 to 4.5 LPA",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=c8eeb81348162987,c8eeb81348162987,indeed,ZOHO
new,Marketing Operations,InstaSafe,"Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-01-11,"We are looking for an enthusiastic Marketing Specialist to help us in our overall marketing efforts. You will be an integral part of the development and execution of marketing plans to reach targets from brand awareness to product promotion. A Marketing specialist should be a competent professional able to grasp consumer behavior trends and generate creative ideas. You should also be well-versed in specialized marketing concepts, principles and tactics. The goal is to deliver effective marketing programs that will help our reputation and growth.



Requirements
 Execute email campaigns in accordance with the sales team and lead generation

* building both automated and manual email campaigns with utilizing multiple tools

constructing dynamic content blocks and EDMs for the campaigns

 Reporting, analysis, and optimization of the email campaigns.

 Out of the box thinking with strong accountability and ownership

 Extremely analytical, and good knowledge of excel

 Hands-on experience with marketing tools like Zoho Campaigns, HubSpot marketing Hub

 Highly energetic and self-motivated



Benefits

 Challenging real world problems - You will need to deploy automated, scalable and reliable services;

 Constant learning - You will often be ideating on cutting-edge technologies as we believe in finding the right tool for the problem rather than fitting the problem to the tools we already know

 Opportunity to shape InstaSafe


 

 - As part of the team, everything you do will influence the growth and direction of InstaSafe


 ",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=4a173c0c6d322200,4a173c0c6d322200,indeed,ZOHO
new,Digital Marketing Executive,InstaSafe,"Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-01-11,"Looking for freshers with 0-1 year work experience.



Requirements
Execute email campaigns in accordance with the sales team and lead generation

Building both automated and manual email campaigns

Reporting, analysis, and optimization of the email campaigns and social media

Action taker and problem solver with strong accountability and ownership

Comfortable working with Excel

Hands-on experience with marketing tools like Zoho Campaigns, HubSpot marketing Hub



Benefits


 Challenging real world problems - You will need to deploy automated, scalable and reliable services;

 Constant learning - You will often be ideating on cutting-edge technologies as we believe in finding the right tool for the problem rather than fitting the problem to the tools we already know

 Opportunity to shape InstaSafe


 

 - As part of the team, everything you do will influence the growth and direction of InstaSafe


 ",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=be1745e888eca8c7,be1745e888eca8c7,indeed,ZOHO
new,Business Relationship Manager - Sap/oracle/ai & ML/ Salesfor...,Prowess Enterprise,"Delhi, Delhi",2020-01-21,"Job Description
The primary purpose of the Business Relationship Manager is to achieve their overall revenue goal. In order to achieve this goal, the BRM must create a complete territory business plan that generates at least 3x their quota in pipeline opportunity. The BRM is responsible to identify and qualify opportunities, develop and drive strategy. The BRM will develop an opportunity plan containing the value proposition for all technologies like SAP, Oracle Applications, Artificial & Business Intelligence, Blockchain, Salesforce.com etc targeted line of business solutions and services to potential customers & prospects across APAC region. It is expected that the BRM be adept at creating and nurturing executive relationships on their own while positioning the technology teams.



NO. OF POSITIONS:
SAP applications: HANA, ECC, SuccessFactors, Concur, BI/BOBJ/SAC, MII, MDG, Ariba, Hybris etc.
AI/BI and Blockchain, IoT Sales - BI/BOBJ, Tableau, Power BI, Micro strategy, Blockchain supply chain and financial trade.
Microsoft Technologies: Azure, Microsoft Dynamics, Web & Mobile Applications.
Cloud - Salesforce, Zoho, Microsoft Dynamics, Oracle CPQ, AWS

EXPECTATIONS AND TASKS:

Works with the Management and team to develop and execute programs to drive pipeline & close deals.
Works to uncover and run sales cycle based opportunities.
Leads efforts to establish, develop, and expand market share and revenue attainment with existing and prospect clients.
Works to attain various sales objectives related to securing new business opportunities.
Develops sales best practices securing repeatable and expansive opportunities across APAC region.


WORK EXPERIENCE:

5+ years of experience selling business software and/or IT solutions
Experience selling to CXOs and top management.
Proven track record in target achievement
Open to work in any of the mentioned locations - Delhi/NCR , Pune, Bangalore, Visakhapatnam, Hyderabad, Mumbai and Chennai

EDUCATION AND QUALIFICATION / SKILLS AND COMPETENCIES:
Bachelor's degree in related fields (Business / Engineering or Technology)
Completion of Sales Methodology training preferred
Communication skills
Teamwork & Collaboration
Presentation skills
Sales Product Solution Knowledge

Experience: 5 to 10 years
Salary: Not Disclosed by Recruiter
Industry:IT-Software / Software Services
Functional Area:Sales, Retail, Business Development
Role Category:Corporate Sales
Role:Sales Executive/Officer
Keyskills
Target AchievementBusiness PlanningSellingTop ManagementProduct SalesSolution SalesStrategyBusiness DevelopmentNew BusinessSales Executive Activities
Desired Candidate Profile
Please refer to the Job description above
Company Profile
Prowess Enterprise ( India ) Private Ltd
We focus on providing IT consulting services & software solutions in SAP suite, Oracle, Artificial Intelligence, Business Intelligence and Salesforce. We also concentrate on Creating IT Value using application services, infrastructure and Business Process Outsourcing by delivering through onsite, near shore, and offshore resources. We deliver custom solutions, tailored to you - your industry, your culture and any kind of challenges of yours.
We deal with integrating SAP, Oracle and Salesforce applications with other products and with AI & BI Integration Services The organization was founded by seasoned entrepreneurial leaders with 20 years of experience in SAP, Oracle and Salesforce. Our global success is based on a highly expert team of technocrats, with a rich experience in implementation, support, migration and upgrade in every aspect of SAP, Oracle, and Salesforce.
View Contact Details+
Recruiter Name:Tina B
Contact Company:Prowess Enterprise ( India ) Private Ltd
Website:http://prowessenterprise.com/",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=37c366b385ecf7b7,37c366b385ecf7b7,indeed,ZOHO
new,Web Analytics Manager,Crimson Interactive,"Mumbai, Maharashtra",2020-01-11,"Location: Goregaon (W)  Mumbai
Shift timings: 10am to 7pm (weekend all yours)
Roles & Responsibilities:
Analyze website data, conduct tests for opportunities in improvement of conversion and analyze test results.
Develop various measurement tools and analyze business requirements and implement appropriate plans.
Analyze functionality of all current and future websites and develop new objective for the same.
Identify risks and gaps in all channels of traffic on the website and analyze various risks and provide optimal solutions for the same.
Monitor all investigation on sites and resolve the tracking-issues as and when required in a Web-Analytics manner.
Maintain records of web usage and traffic to site and prepare reports in user usability trends.
Perform usability tests and evaluate customer experience for projects and ensure accuracy for the same.
Manage various web analytical tools and prepare reports for metrics evaluation.
Perform analysis on volume and navigation behavior to gather appropriate information on web site user.
Monitor and incorporate data in visitor behavior and ensure optimization of business processes.
Ensure appropriate implementation of software application to aid various businesses-goals.
Assist other departments to develop test scripts and perform troubleshoot on various issue in websites.
Analyze data captured on other software and tools to understand customer journey and various touchpoints and devise a plan to improve up-selling and conversion.
Expertise:
Expertise in Tag-Management tools like GTM, Tealium, Ensighten, DTM etc.
Strong understanding of data layer creation of any web-asset (Website/Web-App)
Expert in Google Analytics - Custom dimension & metric creation, attribution-modelling, cohort-analysis and goal-funneling.
Experience in A/B & Multivariant testing tools like Unbounce, Optimizely, Zoho, CrazyEgg, Google-Analytics, Clicktale etc... and well versed right implementation & metrics to be measured for the same.
Education:
Bachelors degree in Engineering from a reputed institute with good grades.
Google Analytics Certification.
MBA in Marketing (Preferred).",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=ade849c66917a92e,ade849c66917a92e,indeed,ZOHO
new,AM / MANGER - Business DEVELOPMENT,Perion Human Capital Solutions,"Kolkata, West Bengal",2020-01-21,"Client: CONFIDENTIAL
Location: Kolkata
CTC: Upto 3 - 8 Lacs
Experience: 2-7 Years
Required Skills: Role Purpose / Summary:  Build and strengthen relationships with the prospects / new clients by delivering the desired client experience and value proposition;  Drive sales of all Insurance Products, by developing, identifying, and securing all relevant direct sale opportunities.  Act as the contact for dedicated prospects or clients (or a portfolio of prospects or clients) with the aim of new business development. Key Account abilities:  Accountable for the development of new business and achieving and exceeding the new business budget  Identifying the new revenue generation opportunities with the Team Leader / Line Manager  Product demonstrations and visiting customers with a structured plan.  Responsible for market planning and opportunities mapping  Manage sales funnel development by entering and updating all customer opportunities and leads in Zoho (or other CRM system (GPS)) and regularly update the same to facilitate closure of sales.  Ability to understand the Client, their industry and their risks and match them with potential Global Solutions;  Accountable and responsible for articulating the value delivered by Global and effectively lead remuneration negotiations;  Responsible for compliance with IRDAI, other, regulatory requirements and Global business procedures (including usage of CRM System, and application of Insurer security policies where relevant).",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=f04796e6dd2ee79a,f04796e6dd2ee79a,indeed,ZOHO
new,Business Development (Sales) Internship,Gangeya Source Code Private Limited,"Hyderabad, Telangana",2020-01-26,"About the company:
Gangeya Source Code Private Limited is a privately owned, independent IT consulting business solutions company based in India founded by the IT center for excellence heads. We have professional and subject matter experts in innovative technologies to simplify one's business needs and we have been delivering a world-class performance to our customers globally. We are the fastest-growing leaders in sap ECC and cloud platforms, development technologies with the latest programming languages, implementations, support, hyper care, testing, upgradation, enhancement, and AMS projects.
About the internship/job:
Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilities include: 1. Communicate effectively both orally (telephonic) and in writing (emailing) 2. Learn the real-time usage of services provided company 3. Pitch the services and company profile to the client 4. Work with sales tools (for example ZOHO CRM) 5. Build customer relationships 6. Meet personal and company sales goals through sales techniques and training
Who can apply:
Only those students or freshers can apply who:
are available for full time (in-office) internship
have relevant skills and interests
can start the internship between 23rd Jan'20 and 22nd Feb'20
are available for duration of 6 months
have already graduated or are currently in any year of study
Females willing to start/restart their career may also apply
Other requirements:
Must be detail-oriented and security conscious Must be friendly, energetic, customer-service oriented and who work well in a fast-paced environment to join our teams in the Madhapur area  Must be a graduate in management studies  Customer service skills, including problem-solving and handling customer complaints  Strong written and verbal communication skills in English
Number of internships/jobs available: 5
Categories: Sales,Marketing,MBA",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=d96e00cb2501cb3d,d96e00cb2501cb3d,indeed,ZOHO
new,Human Resources (HR) Internship,Metapercept Technology Services,"Pune, Maharashtra",2020-01-14,"About the company:
Metapercept Technology Services LLP is a bootstrap startup with a focus towards developing cutting-edge technology products and providing high-end technology services.
About the internship/job:
Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilities include: 1. Developing, communicating, and supporting various HR programs, plans, policies, and procedures for all employees 2. Providing strategic analysis in the management of the companys human capital 3. Handling all attendance, payroll operations, excluding the processing of payroll 4. Developing and maintaining a compensation structure that ensures internal equity in compensation practices and compliance with FLSA and other applicable laws 5. Managing the annual merit cycle 6. Executing HRMS transactions regarding employee status changes ensuring data integrity 7. Creating and distributing standard, complex, and ad-hoc reports 8. Making a purchase invoice, purchase orders, and maintain inventory 9. Payment follow up for outstanding dues 10. Interacting with clients for the future work and resource allocation requirement 11. Identifying resource requirements and conduct recruitment activities 12. Indirect business development activities
Who can apply:
Only those students or freshers can apply who:
are available for full time (in-office) internship
have relevant skills and interests
can start the internship between 13th Jan'20 and 14th Feb'20
are available for duration of 3 months
have already graduated or are currently in any year of study
are from Pune and neighboring cities
Females willing to start/restart their career may also apply
Other requirements:
Must have the following skills - Zoho Payroll, Zoho People, Zoho Books, Zoho CRM, Tally, HRMS, accounting, TDS, PF GST, payment flow, income tax, bookkeeping, and account management Candidates who have done their bachelors degree in business administration, HR with finance, HR generalist may apply
Number of internships/jobs available: 1
Categories: HR,MBA",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=28e514d45cd98ca2,28e514d45cd98ca2,indeed,ZOHO
new,Sr Executive/officer - Customer Engagement,ILabz Technology LLP,"Delhi, Delhi",2020-01-16,"Customer Engagement/Service which includes Customer related queries like Booking, Complaints pertaining to membership /service are addressed and resolved within SLA for member delight.

JOB RESPONSIBILITIES

Managing feedback on social media, feedback forms, website and other mediums.

Monitoring and replying to customers either directly or through software's like Hootsuite, Zoho CRM etc.

Maintain complete and accurate customer correspondence data for analysis and other marketing campaigns.

Working knowledge of using marketing campaign software like mail chimp.

Collaborate with internal teams (e.g. operations, sales, senior management) to address customers- needs

Guide and lead team members to deliver products/services that meet or exceed the customer requirements.

Provide timely resolution, in line with company policies to enhance guest satisfaction.

Establish the facts, gather information and request Incident Report from relevant departments, in case of a negative feedback.

Prepare and submit appreciation data to HKG CR along with report generation and MIS.

Prepare and share updated AI - Index with IND operations team whenever requested.

JOB REQUIREMENTS

Graduate with 2 -5 years of experience in CRM

Proven experience as a Client Relations Executive Relationship Manager

Background in customer service; industry knowledge is a plus

Experience tracking relevant KPIs (e.g. customer satisfaction)

Proficient in MS Office, with working knowledge of CRM platforms.

A customer-oriented attitude and Excellent communication and negotiation skills.

Problem-solving aptitude and ability to work well with a team.",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=2ee6b52aa91bb645,2ee6b52aa91bb645,indeed,ZOHO
new,Business Development / Sales Executive,intellemo,"Gurgaon, Haryana",2020-01-11,"Job Skills:
Must be well versed in English and Hindi Speaking for a qualitative communication with the customers.

Calling customers, understanding their queries and qualifying them according to the relevancy and qualitative metrics outlined for the product.

Ability to Satisfy customer issues and resolving them with confidence.

Ability to learn fast and remember various products & their features to be able to explain to the customers properly.

Aptitude to understand the processes of the organisation and workflows of CRM tools such as HubSpot, Zoho or FreshSales.

Ability to handle tough situations with a customer and answer with humility. Good humour to lighten the mood in tough situations will be a bonus.

High emotional intelligence to remain calm and maintain composure at all times.

Why Join Us?

Since we are in the business of growing the results of clients very fast, we value the employees equally and they would get the benefits transferred to them as well.

Get Bonus, Incentives & Commission over & above Salary on successfully achieving targets outlined.

The best ones may even see their salaries & incentives doubling in a short period to give an exponential curve to their career graph along with job satisfaction.

Learn better skills. Achieve your dreams & career goals faster.

APPLY NOW",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=e3a0b2cee659423d,e3a0b2cee659423d,indeed,ZOHO
new,Content Marketing Specialist,"Arun Jayaraj ,Proprietor Of Job Roster,","Chennai, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-23,"Content Writer responsibilities include conducting thorough research on industry-related topics, generating ideas for new content types and proofreading articles (blogs, Case studies, social media content) before publication.

Added Advantages:
Educational Background in digital Marketing or related field
Knowledge in Banking
Hands-on experience with Content Management Systems (e.g. WordPress, Zoho builder)",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=34718c77df4d550b,34718c77df4d550b,indeed,ZOHO
new,digital marketing manager,Randstad,"Hyderabad, Telangana",2020-01-11,"digital marketing manager in hyderabad
?? Plan and execute all digital marketing activity of the company including SEO/SEM,
marketing database, email, content marketing, social media, display advertising and
re-marketing campaigns
? Build and maintain our social media presence in line with our brand and content
strategy
? Measure and report performance of all digital marketing campaigns, and assess against
goals (ROI and KPIs)
? Identify trends and insights, and optimize spend and performance based on the insights
? Brainstorm new and creative growth strategies
? Plan, execute, and measure experiments and conversion tests
? Collaborate with internal/external teams to create and manage the various digital
assets like website, social media, campaignlanding pagesandcontinuouslyoptimize
the customer/user experience
? Utilize strong analytical ability to evaluate end-to-end customer experience across
multiple channels and customer touch points and suggest improvements and tweaks.
? Collaborate with agencies and other vendor partners whenever required
? Evaluate emerging digital/marketing technologies.
? Cascade Knowledge and perspective for marketing tech adoption where appropriate

Benefits
?Fast growing organization with a strong leadership team.

Client Introduction
?Premium home automation.
skills
?SEO/SEM,
Email marketing and marketing database,
Display advertising campaigns
Social media Management
CRM Management
qualification
?? Proven working experience in digital marketing/ digital technologies and tools
? Demonstrable experience in successfully managing
o SEO/SEM,
o Email marketing and marketing database,
o Display advertising campaigns
o Social media Management
o CRM Management
? Experience in identifying target audiences and devising appropriate digital campaigns
? Experience in setting up and optimising marketing/advertising technology tools like
o Google Analytics
o Google Adwords/DoubleClick
o Google Trends
o Keyword Planner
o Facebook ad platform 
o Instagram ad platform
o Linkedin

o Google/Facebooks native remarketing platform
o Email management like mailchimp/constantcontact or similar
o External Remarketing/Retargeting tools like adroll/criteo or similar
o Content Marketing/Advertising tools like taboo/outbrain or similar
o Social Publishing platforms like Hootsuite or similar
o CRM platforms like zoho/zendesk or similar
o Marketing automation services

? Experience in optimizing landing pages and user funnels
? Experience with A/B and multivariate experiments wrt landing pages and user
experience optimisation
? Knowledge of working with front end technologies and development teams
? Strong analytical skills and data-driven thinking
? Up-to-date with the latest trends and best practices in digital marketing and
measurement",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=87ee9f82d8cef0eb,87ee9f82d8cef0eb,indeed,ZOHO
new,Human Resources (HR) Internship,Metrica Bizsol Private Limited,"Mumbai, Maharashtra",2020-01-11,"About the company:
We are a fast-growing executive search firm servicing clients large conglomerates and MNCs in Media, BFSI, Pharma, Fintech, etc.
About the internship/job:
Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilities include: 1. Complete the candidate assessments and update it in Zoho 2. Research and build the list of organizations for BD
Who can apply:
Only those students or freshers can apply who:
are available for full time (in-office) internship
have relevant skills and interests
can start the internship between 3rd Jan'20 and 15th Feb'20
are available for duration of 2 months
have already graduated or are currently in any year of study
Females willing to start/restart their career may also apply
Number of internships/jobs available: 1
Categories: HR,MBA,Recruitment",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=be7377f0dc436164,be7377f0dc436164,indeed,ZOHO
new,Sales Executive -- HR Product Domain,Workingside,"Chennai, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-11,"Mandaveli, Chennai
Workingside.com is looking for a Sales Executive to sell products in HR to Enterprise Companies. You will be selling products like Applicant Tracking Systems (ATS), Job Postings and Resume database to businesses. Job involved talking to HR managers about the products and close sales deals. Responsibilities include cold calling, marketing, making presentation to client, negotiating and sales support.
Desired Qualifications
Graduate with Sales Experience is a must. MBA is a plus. Minimum of 2 years of sales experience is necessary in HR or Staffing Sales. Should be extremely computer savvy in using powerpoint and excel.
Skills
Powerpoint2
Excel2
Zoho CRM1

Annual Salary
4.2 lakhs
Work Experience
2 years",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=0170923b4901ca25,0170923b4901ca25,indeed,ZOHO
new,IT Sales Manager (US Shift),Job Mitra,"Delhi, Delhi",2020-01-11,"Description :
Experience: 2-3Yrs in IT sales
Qualification: MBA in Sales and Marketing
Position: Asst. Manager sales
Shift Timing: 2:00 PM to 11:00 PM (U.S shift)
Key Responsibility:
1. Identifying the new prospect and generate leads for software development& cloud hosting services
2. Understand the customer requirement, pain points and propose solutions based oncustomers requirement.
3. Gather customer requirements and share with account manager& BI Team foe analysis
4. Develop and implement an effective lead generationstrategy
5. Expected to build a strong sales pipeline
6. Timely build marketing collaterals for the business promotion
7. Build & implement the marketing strategy
8. Build & implement customer engagement and follow-up strategy
9. Coordinate with IT & business team to prepare the customer proposal
10. Manage and track pipeline activities through contacts.
11. Conducting solution capability presentations to client for opportunity qualification.
12. Monitor market Intelligence within the industry/competition in terms of market development, new products, competitive activity, new customers etc.
13. Develop new strategies for revenue growth, including product expansion, market expansion, partnerships.
Desired Candidate Profile:
1. Motivated and self-directed sales professional.
2. Pleasing personality with excellent communication and problem-solving skills.
3. Ability to sell solutions, proven track record of meeting and overachieving targets.
4. Strong presentation skills building and delivery as well.
5. Must carry experience in IT solution sales e.g. CRM, ERP, Custom development project, IT product sales.
6. Good to have salesforce.com experience, My dynamic, Zoho, sugar etc",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=6a1c32abfd5d1a15,6a1c32abfd5d1a15,indeed,ZOHO
new,Sales Executive,ManageEngine,"Chennai, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-11,"Are you ready to join Zoho Corporation's high-energy sales team that sells cutting-edge technology products to enterprises the world over? We're looking for highly motivated and self-driven individuals who have excellent communication and listening skills. As has been with Zoho Corp., you'll treat the ""customer as the king"" and the ""market as your heaven""! You have outstanding analytical abilities and planning skills. You are adept at giving customer demos and also fielding questions from prospects. Prior IT sales experience and call center experience would be an added advantage. Knowledge of network management will also work to your advantage.
You have a passion to work in a highly innovative and creative culture. Since we have customers across the globe, you should be willing to work nights.",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=afd39e289a8217f0,afd39e289a8217f0,indeed,ZOHO
new,Digital Marketing- Kolkata,Genius Consultants,"Kolkata, West Bengal",2020-01-11,"Barilliance, Betaout, Mailchimp, Leadsquared, Canva, Powtoon, Zoho, SendinBlue, Candid
Barilliance, Betaout, Mailchimp, Leadsquared, Canva, Powtoon, Zoho, SendinBlue, Candid",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=636762d4c2a17ce9,636762d4c2a17ce9,indeed,ZOHO
new,Accountant,freshermart,"Gurgaon, Haryana",2020-01-11,"Primary responsibilities are:  General Accounting, Auditing, and Taxation
Expectations: Working knowledge of Tally/QB/ZOHO/SAP
Good understanding of general legal, financial and accounting principle
Location  South City 2, Sector 49, Gurgaon

Job Location: Gurgaon
Experience (Years): 2-4 Years
Sub Location: South City 2",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=b6b16bf11e3a6691,b6b16bf11e3a6691,indeed,ZOHO
new,SEO and Social Media Specialist,Translate By Humans,"Ahmedabad, Gujarat",2020-01-11,"Job Description

5501

An exciting opportunity for a Content Marketer to join a London-based language services start-up. The ideal candidate should have 2-3 years experience of SEO and Social Media Marketing with excellent written and spoken English communication skills. We are looking for a creative and dynamic individual to help enhance our online presence by creating new strategies and evaluating past efforts.



Plan, develop and execute the organic SEO strategy for the editorial calendar. Create a unique organic SEO strategy for each industry and take complete ownership of technical SEO

 Ensure a steady and consistent growth of the brands online presence

 Actively engage in offline events, seminars, webinars and other activities of relevance to the team and the company

 Conduct regular primary and secondary market research, research on social media best practices and keyword optimization

 Handle outreach for the content team by getting in touch with various publishing platforms, freelance writers and industry professionals/companies

 Be the single POC for direct marketing to potential business leads and industry-specific event organizers

 Build professional relationships with potential business leads by promoting industry-specific events, hosting online competitions, contests or giveaways

 Source influencers and manage campaigns alongside the Content Manager

 Assist content writers with copy and blog writing when necessary

 Regularly evaluate service offerings, online content, landing pages, content and design quality for web pages, and associated traffic to ensure an increase in search engine ranking and marketing

 Create weekly and monthly reports to track and analyze SERPs, website analytics, competitor and industry activity, link building, organic initiatives, campaigns and website architecture



Requirements

 Bachelors degree in English Literature, Journalism, Mass Communication, Marketing, Branding or Liberal Arts

 Excellent command over spoken and written English communication

 2-3 years professional experience with demonstrable skills in managing content

 Demonstratable leadership skills

 Great time management skills

 Well versed with tools such as Wordpress, Google Analytics, SEMRush, Zoho PageSense, and Microsoft Office

 Basic knowledge of HTML/CSS and website administration

 Advanced knowledge of social media platforms such as Twitter, Linkedin, Facebook

 Basic understanding of digital graphics and design",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=ee6357f3737a5318,ee6357f3737a5318,indeed,ZOHO
new,Sales executive/Business development,Geek Creative Agency,"Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-01-11,"Geek Creative Agency is looking for Sales executive/Business development.

With 3-4 years of experience from an Agency Back ground.


Tasks and duties may include :
3+ Years Experience selling creative advertising services, Digital Marketing, media buying, SEO and Web Dev
Hunter Mentality  able to prospect 50 -250 new potential clients each week
Create Solutions around the client goals by creating multi mix product solutions centred on client goals and budget requirements.
Ability to organize all work performed in our ZOHO CRM and follow up on all tasks
Ability to run discovery meetings and put meeting notes in CRM
Ability to keep the sales process going by creating engaging conversations with clients
Ability to close new business with higher than average client spend to accommodate their growth goals
Ability to Upsell and Cross Sell and Manage the client relationship with Geek Account Managers
Ability to stay on top of all your closed business with a track record of successful implementation working with Account Management and Product Mgrs.
Prefer a track record of long term client relationships who are loyal to you and stay with you
Add more than 25 New Prospects Leads in the CRM at a minimum weekly  with DM contact information.
Minimum of 5 Discovery Meetings Weekly
Minimum of 1 new sale per week
Minimum of 5 closing appointments weekly.",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=0260c8a1e19651b9,0260c8a1e19651b9,indeed,ZOHO
new,Business Development (Sales) part time job/internship at Che...,VayuJal Technologies Private Limited,"Chennai, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-30,"About the company:
VayuJal Technologies Private Limited develops Atmospheric Water Generators (AWGs) to combat the problem at the global level and to provide affordable, clean and healthy water to everyone facing a water shortage or a water contamination problem, through environmentally sustainable technological solutions. Developed AWG units will provide healthy mineralized water for drinking and normal clean water for other purposes, through a combination of its patented surface engineering technology, energy efficient unit design and mineralization technology, at a cost 20 times lesser than the current bottled mineral water costs.
About the internship/job:
Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilities include: 1. Work on sales for available atmospheric water generator unit 2. Manage social media platforms 3. Manage the ZOHO CRM application 4. Handle lead generation and setup sales meetings 5. Prepare meeting dockets for the sales team 6. Meet prospects for lead follow-up 7. Conduct research for brands 8. Support calls from customer and prospects 9. Coordinate with departmental for data/information 10. Make presentations
Who can apply:
Only those students or freshers can apply who:
are available for the part time job/internship (it may be part time in-office or part time at home/work from home online)
have relevant skills and interests
can start the part time job/internship between 25th Jan'20 and 24th Feb'20
are available for duration of 3 months
have already graduated or are currently in any year of study
Females willing to start/restart their career may also apply
Number of internships/jobs available: 1
Categories: Sales,Marketing,MBA",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=bfacf189031f11e2,bfacf189031f11e2,indeed,ZOHO
new,Business Research Internship,InsightCrew,"Chandigarh, Chandigarh",2020-02-08,"About the company:
We are a CRM and sales consulting firm. We help implement sales technology softwares, CRMs such as Zoho and other products and provide sales process consulting services as well.
About the internship/job:
Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilities include: 1. Research for target leads from Google and other online websites 2. Use prospecting tools to find email addresses and Linkedin information 3. Recommend target audience based on familiarity with data 4. Learn sales techniques and business development
Who can apply:
Only those students or freshers can apply who:
are available for full time (in-office) internship
have relevant skills and interests
can start the internship between 6th Feb'20 and 7th Mar'20
are available for duration of 6 months
have already graduated or are currently in any year of study
Females willing to start/restart their career may also apply
Number of internships/jobs available: 1
Categories: Market/Business Research,MBA",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=4ac5d4d0e64a6e61,4ac5d4d0e64a6e61,indeed,ZOHO
new,Software Development Internship,Arc Attest,"Ahmedabad, Gujarat",2020-01-30,"About the company:
Arc Attest offers a comprehensive range of background checks as per clients business needs. Arc Attest help companies in mitigating risk of frauds, create a safe work environment, prevent frauds, establish trust and protect company brand value and profitability by assisting them in background screening of the employees they recruit. Our smart, digital, automated processes help our clients save a good amount of time and resources invested by them by reducing the inputs and monitoring from their team. Our team proactively focuses towards the betterment of the processes to make them more efficient and effective which saves time and resources and delivers best results without compromising on the quality of outputs. We are a proactive and vibrant community of professionals and our detail-driven indigenous professionals extend excellent service experience and believe in client satisfaction to its core.
About the internship/job:
Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilities include: Good Development Knowledge Zoho CRM Proven track record as a developer Certification will be added advantage Good Communication Skills Work on Zoho, Zoho Desk, Zoho Creator, Zoho other products Work on a project as development team members Should be Zoho CRM Certified
Who can apply:
Only those students or freshers can apply who:
are available for full time (in-office) internship
have relevant skills and interests
can start the internship between 27th Jan'20 and 26th Feb'20
are available for duration of 6 months
have already graduated or are currently in any year of study
Females willing to start/restart their career may also apply
Number of internships/jobs available: 3
Categories: Software Development,Computer Science,Engineering",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=60e32b6aa09d67b7,60e32b6aa09d67b7,indeed,ZOHO
new,Cluster Manager - Business Intelligence/Senior Cluster Manag...,Bajaj FinServ,"Pune, Maharashtra",2020-01-11,"This position is open with Bajaj Finance ltd.

Job Duties & Key Responsibilities
* Duties and Responsibilities -  Own logic of customer deduplication and maintaining uniqueness in customer ids.  Liaise with Risk and system delivery teams in order to gauge impact of change requirement received  Co-ordinate with various system owners to make change live in system  Liaise with Bureaus for data acquisitions


Required Qualifications and Experience
*  4-5 years of experience in RDBMS and requested domain of dedupe system and methods.  Managing rules to identify duplicate customers in database  Professional expertise in SQL, Python or other data science related technology  Issue management experience on tools like Jira/Zoho ticket system etc  Stakeholder Management experience QUALIFICATION  B.E. or BSc in computer science. ANY OTHER SPECIFICATIONS  Working experience in Dedupe domain will get preference.",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=b7c517c8bfee8d06,b7c517c8bfee8d06,indeed,ZOHO
new,Senior Business Development Manager,Aptus Data LAbs,"Mumbai, Maharashtra",2020-01-11,"Job Description:
 Willing/ Ability to work, manage and grow a start-up firm
 Willing to collaborate and work with partners, research organization and technology

firm
 Responsible in selling vendor products (like Rapid miner, MapR, Yellow fin,

Microsoft Data Platform etc.), industry & software solutions and consulting services

on the above technology and business domain
 Must be working in providing technical, commercial and long-term benefit proposals

with win-win approach and competitive pricing
 Responsible to achieve the sales and business targets
 Responsible to work with SMB, enterprises and independent consultants to mine

the leads and accounts
 Must have experience in generating and managing leads, contacts and accounts

using in any CRM tools (preferably Zoho, Salesforce etc.)
 Must be part of running campaigns and analysis of key KPIs on CRM
 Should have strong business acumen, understanding market intelligence reports

(Gartner, Forrester, IDC etc.) and build the business foundation aligning with them
 Should be prepared to participate in Data Science and Big Data conference and

summit (GITEX, CEBIT, GARTNER etc.)
 Willing to travel across regions
Qualification and Experience:
 Engineering graduate with MBA
 5-10 years in sales & business development role in Big Data, analytics, business
intelligence and cloud space with ability to drive the sales to achieve target
 Must have experience in building a healthy partner and vendor relationship
 Must have sales experience in product, solutions and consulting engagement
 Must have experience in working with banking, manufacturing, healthcare and retail

segments
 Revenue, Result and target achievement-oriented mindset",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=7c120124acdb2a77,7c120124acdb2a77,indeed,ZOHO
new,Digital Marketing Specialist,Sentri,"Coimbatore, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-15,"About Sentri:
Sentri(https://sentriapp.com/) is a software product company started by a group of Indian Techies based in Houston, Texas. Sentri is a one-stop solution for IAG (Identity Access Governance), IRM (Integrated Risk Management) and GRC (Governance Risk Compliance) requirements. Our Intelligent Enterprise Identity Platforms are built to provide holistic data protection against security breaches, identity thefts, and financial frauds, keeping your critical applications safe, both on Cloud and On-Premise.
Sentri provides you with the right environment to showcase your skills. We are an employee-centric company and encourage our employees to maintain a work-life balance in a true sense. If you are looking for a strong platform to help your career grow, applying to Sentri can prove to be a beneficial move!
Job Description
Job Summary
Digital Marketing Executives are responsible for planning, developing, implementing and managing the overall digital marketing strategy. In addition, they are responsible for managing, guiding and training digital marketers and other marketing positions in the team.

We are looking for an experienced and result-driven Digital Marketing Executive to join our awesome marketing team! As a Digital Marketing Executive at our company, you will be responsible for setting up, implementing and managing the overall companys digital marketing strategy.

Digital marketing strategies are extremely important for our companys success, so your role will play a crucial role in achieving our business goals and objectives.

We are expecting you to have experience and a big passion for digital technologies and all digital marketing channels especially LinkedIn.
Responsibilities and Duties

Build, plan and implement the overall digital marketing strategy
Manage and improve online Content, considering SEO and Google Analytics
You must be a specialist in E-Mail Campaigns
Manage the Marketing Strategy in all Digital Mediums especially LinkedIn
Stay up to date with the latest technology and best practices
Manage all digital marketing channels
Measure ROI and KPIs
Prepare and manage a digital marketing budget
Oversee all the companys social media accounts
Build an inbound marketing plan
Forecast sales performance trends
Motivate the digital marketing team to achieve goals
Monitor competition and provide suggestions for improvement

Required Experience, Skills and Qualifications

2 years of experience as a Digital Marketing Executive
2 years of experience in developing and implementing digital marketing strategies
Good knowledge of all different digital marketing channels
Good knowledge and experience with online marketing tools, SEO tools, E-mail Campaign tools(MailChimp or Zoho Campaigns) and best practices
2 years of hands-on experience with SEO/SEM, Google Analytics and CRM software
Familiarity with web design
Sense of ownership and pride in your performance and its impact on a companys success
Critical thinker and problem-solving skills
Team player
Good time-management skills
Great interpersonal and communication skills
Bachelors or Masters degree in Marketing, Digital technologies or relevant field

Job Type: Full-time",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=22e49633ea6fe698,22e49633ea6fe698,indeed,ZOHO
new,Accounts Internship,Walinns Innovation,"Coimbatore, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-23,"About the company:
Walinns Innovation offers a complete portfolio of big data analytics & mobile app development and analytics solution to accelerate your web and mobile applications.
About the internship/job:
Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilities include: 1. Finalizing monthly accounting and GST returns of customers 2. Working on Zoho books implementation 3. Filing ESI PF, GST returns 4. Working with Accounting team to compile, analyze data and transactions 5. Working on Tally ERP-9 and MS Excel 6. Managing day to day financial activities
Who can apply:
Only those students or freshers can apply who:
are available for full time (in-office) internship
have relevant skills and interests
can start the internship between 22nd Jan'20 and 26th Feb'20
are available for duration of 3 months
have already graduated or are currently in any year of study
are from Coimbatore
Females willing to start/restart their career may also apply
Number of internships/jobs available: 2
Categories: Accounts,Commerce",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=c4a100f2e5cd0258,c4a100f2e5cd0258,indeed,ZOHO
new,Senior Sales Executive,AAPC India,Uttar Pradesh,2020-01-11,"Senior Sales Executive

Job Timings: 6:30 PM to 3:30 AM IST (with cab)
Job description

We are hiring for the role of Sales Executive.
Job Requirements and Responsibilities:

Selling US Healthcare Industry products (Books, Online Tools) to healthcare and non-healthcare customers.
Excellent English communication (US Voice and Accent) is a must  both written and oral.
Goal oriented and self-motivated.
Excellent interpersonal skills.
Efficiency of managing multiple tasks.
Efficiency in presenting Demos, filling reports, understanding online updates/tools.
Proven Sales Record.
Relevant Past Experience in Similar Industry will be a plus.
Knowledge of US Healthcare Industry will be a plus.
Experience in using CRM for Sales reporting  atleast either of SalesForce, Zoho, SalezShark
Analytical mindset and eye to detail.
Eager to learn and adaptable.

Contact
Dilip Kumar Chaurasia | HR
Dilip.Chaurasia@aapc.com",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=a7f256164debacc2,a7f256164debacc2,indeed,ZOHO
new,Associate - Expert Advocacy,Chegg,"New Delhi, Delhi",2020-01-11,"Associate - Expert Advocacy
Expert Management | New Delhi, India

Role:
We are seeking young, bright, and passionate candidates with 1-2 years of experience for the position of Associate  Expert Advocacy Team. As an Expert Advocacy Associate, you are expected to have an in-depth understanding of our business processes and utilize that knowledge to provide outstanding customer experience and best-in-class service support. An ideal candidate is a street-smart, outgoing professional having exceptional problem-solving abilities.

Responsibilities:
Address customer inquiries and concerns by providing friendly, professional and efficient support via emails or calls (if required) to ensure all issues are addressed quickly
Stay up to date with and follow all on-going process and product changes
Perform root cause analysis and recommend process tweaks for efficiency gains
Be a team player by staying positive in the face of challenges
Work closely with the business stakeholders to report customer feedback and capture customer VOCs
Be an advocate of Chegg on social media platforms
Be a mentor to the customers, resolving their queries with thoughtful, timely responses
Requirements:
Excellent business communication skills (oral and written)  non negotiable
Exceptional problem solving and conflict resolution skills
Working knowledge of MS Excel and MS Word
Working Experience in ticketing tools like Zoho desk, zen desk, fresh desk or Sales force etc
Genuinely care about people and eager to help under any circumstance
Experience in working with freelancers, online tutors or community management is a plus
Ability to actively listen, understand and summarize with clarity and simplicity
Patient, organized and ability to multi-task
Flexible and willing to adapt to new challenges which arise
Ability to use diplomacy and tact to manage escalations
Able to remain detail oriented while working at high volume
Ability to work effectively within a team environment as well as independently
What is Chegg?
An always on digital learning platform.
Chegg puts students firstEverything we build in this company is student-focused, making us the leading student-first connected learning platform. Chegg strives to improve the overall return on investment in education by helping students learn more in less time and at a lower cost. This is achieved by providing students a multitude of educational tools from affordable textbook rentals to Chegg Study which supplements their learning through 24/7 tutor access, step-by-step help with questions, and more. Chegg is a publicly-held company based in Santa Clara, California and trades on the NYSE under the symbol CHGG.
Why do we exist?
Students are working harder than ever before to stabilize their future. Our recent research study called State of the Student shows that nearly 3 out of 4 students are working to support themselves through college and 1 in 3 students feel pressure to spend more than they can afford. We founded our business on provided affordable textbook rental options to address these issues. Since then, weve expanded our offerings to supplement many facets of higher educational learning through Chegg Study, Chegg Math, and Chegg Internships and more to support students beyond their college experience. These offerings lower financial concerns for students by modernizing their learning experience. We exist so students everywhere have a smarter, faster, more affordable way to student.
Video Shorts - Life at Chegg: https://jobs.chegg.com/Video-Shorts-Chegg-Services
Certified Great Place to Work!: http://reviews.greatplacetowork.com/chegg
Chegg Corporate Career Page: https://jobs.chegg.com/
Chegg India: http://www.cheggindia.com/
Chegg Israel: http://insider.geektime.co.il/organizations/chegg
Chegg is an equal opportunity employer",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=997997bc084ebe17,997997bc084ebe17,indeed,ZOHO
new,Technology Consultant (4 month Consultant Assignment),Dasra,"Mumbai, Maharashtra",2020-01-11,"Primarily an assignment for Diagnostics of our internal Technology systems.

Analyze system requirements and implement migration methods for existing data.
Familiar with predictive analysis and data visualization techniques using relevant tools
Develop database solutions to store and retrieve company information
Analyze structural requirements for new software and applications
Contribute to the growth of the practice through though-leadership, development of solution accelerators, reusable assets, and participation
and ownership of other operational areas (recruiting, onboarding, training, enablement, etc.)
Expertise in ERP & CRM tools like MS-Dynamics 365 (ERP and CRM), NetSuite Zoho CRM, Salesforce.
Proficiency in MS-Office - Excel, PowerPoint, Word, SharePoint Online
Coordinate all vendor management tasks inclusive of working with external vendors and internal employees.
Managing projects, including:

Managing work plan execution;
Tracking actual expenditures versus budget;
Supervising project team members; and
Client liaison.

Ensure to collaborate with IT areas to assure vendor partners effectively manage plus contracts are completely leveraged.
Prepare processes for as well as manage analysis, selection and transition.
Monitor contractual agreements for all IT functions vendors.
Conceptual knowledge of HRMS, PMS and KMS applications.",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=bb8323ecfe5d2fca,bb8323ecfe5d2fca,indeed,ZOHO
new,Counsellor,Quantiphi,"Hyderabad, Telangana",2020-01-11,"Responsibilities and Duties:
Advice students on University selection, applications, SOP preparation, visa application and navigating the entire admissions process.Support the students throughout the admission process by answering their questions and helping them to complete the required documents.Review the student applications and academic qualification to help them choose the correct University, write perfect Statement of Purpose, letter of recommendation and fill up the University applicationMaintain the target metrics by converting prospective students into confirmed admissions and succeed in achieving the performance goals.Participate in educational events, college fairs, information sessions/activities as a representative of the company.Maintain regular communication with students, parents, colleagues and external agencies for coordinating admission activities and resolving problems.Maintain students details and faculty details for the assigned course.Play a leading role in building and managing a team of counsellors to complete their targets.
Skills Required:
Excellent written and verbal communication skills and a good listener.Attention to detail, high confidence, fast learnerMust have a keen desire to learn and grow and take upon greater responsibilitiesSelf-driven and motivated


Qualifications:
Atleast 1 year of experience in student education counselling for foreign Universities.M.B.A / Business Management / Marketing / Human ResourceExperience in Marketing / Administration is a plus.Understanding of International admissions process for popular destinations like USA,
Canada, UK, Europe, Australia etc.
Fair understanding of career specializations and courses.Thorough knowledge of entrance exams such as GMAT, GRE, SAT, IELTS, TOEFL etc.Should have experience in guiding students with SOPs, Essays, LORs, resumes
building, interviews.
Basic knowledge of the Education-VISA process for various countries.Have used CRMs such as Hubspot, ZOHO, Salesforce etc.",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=679b5c5550af4134,679b5c5550af4134,indeed,ZOHO
new,Project Coordination Internship,InsightCrew,"Chandigarh, Chandigarh",2020-02-07,"About the company:
We are a CRM and sales consulting firm. We help implement sales technology softwares, CRMs such as Zoho and other products and provide sales process consulting services as well.
About the internship/job:
Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilities include: 1. Helping in project coordination and delivery tracking 2. Learning client communication including writing detailed emails & calls 3. Working on project requirement translation with team 4. Maintaining documentation and requirement documents 5. Conducting project followups and ensuring successful delivery
Who can apply:
Only those students or freshers can apply who:
are available for full time (in-office) internship
have relevant skills and interests
can start the internship between 4th Feb'20 and 5th Mar'20
are available for duration of 6 months
have already graduated or are currently in any year of study
Females willing to start/restart their career may also apply
Number of internships/jobs available: 1
Categories: General Management,Operations,MBA",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=2dbc4b0f05737a5d,2dbc4b0f05737a5d,indeed,ZOHO
new,Sr. Marketing Manager,ETP Group,"Mumbai, Maharashtra",2020-01-11,"Job Description

Lead generation  relevant and high quality
Branding online/offline. Being true to the brand parameters. Building and enhancing value.
Well-versed and hands-on experience with SEO, PPC, Email campaigns, Films, Events, Roadshows, CRM.
Manage, maintain and guide a marketing team with digital, design, inside sales, CRM.
Create content for all collateral including brochures, presentations, emails, scripts, website, newsletter, films, blogs, testimonials, PR.
Generating and Qualifying point of conversion for the sales team and hence a conversion to a qualified opportunity.
Building and maintaining accounts and contacts through regular CRM activities. Should have experience with ZOHO or similar CRM.
Organize internal and external events for ETP.
Building and maintaining strong professional relations with existing customers through regular CRM activities.
Maintain reports and calendars. Follow the existing norms of reporting and communication as well as introduce methods to improve the teams output.
Create monthly, quarterly, annual marketing plans, reports, and budget reports.


Skills & Experience

9+ years of experience
Should have worked on and managed different aspects of Marketing including Events, Digital, PR, Collateral, CRM, Films, Design, Content Creation and Printing.
Personable, with excellent organizational, spoken and presentation skills, an eye for detail, and strong commercial acumen
Strong prospecting and persuasion skills, ability to gain technical understanding of the products
Should have worked with an IT company
Vendor management skills: printers, filmmakers, editors, PR agencies, graphic, designers, content creators, SEO agencies, event organizers, hotels
Ability to build a relationship, possess negotiation skills and do objection handling
Proficiency in MS Outlook, excel, word, ppt., social media platforms
Influencer circle: journalists, bloggers, influencers, magazines, TV

Location: Mumbai (Open to local travel)

Industry Type: Retail Technology  Digital Marketing department

Functional Area: 360 Marketing, Social Media, Events, SEO, PR, Content writing

Key Skills: Communication skills and networking ability, adaptability, strong attention to detail, good organization and planning skills, creativity and content writing skills, commercial awareness, numerical skills & good teamwork skills

Graduate: Marketing/ IT Background preferred",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=ccabda378b991bbe,ccabda378b991bbe,indeed,ZOHO
new,PHP Developer,Vestigo Solutions,"Pune, Maharashtra",2020-01-11,"Expertise in Core Php, Any 1 Framework, HTML, CSS, Jquery, Bootstrap, Mysql
Knowledge of WordPress would be added advantage.
Experience in Developing large scale enterprise level application.
Integration of Third Party Application such as Payment Gateway, Zoho CRM etc.
UI Design.
Team Handling experience would be added advantage.

Job Type: Full-time

Required education: Master's

Required experience:Php, Mysql: 2 years

Job Location:Pune, Maharashtra.",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=680cf0c23fc23b9e,680cf0c23fc23b9e,indeed,ZOHO
new,Technical Project Manager,Onsumaye,"Noida, Uttar Pradesh",2020-01-11,"Job Description

OnSumaye is hiring for experienced Technical Project Manager with a passion for new technologies.

Responsibilities
Experience managing multiple projects at a single point of time comprising of difficult technologies.
Proficient in Project Planning, Forecasting, Status Reporting, Change Management, Defect Management, Risk Management, Budget Management and maintain customer relations.
Good understanding of System Development Life Cycle, Waterfall and Agile methodology.
Excellent technical, analytical, organizational, and communication skills, for effective interaction with third party (vendors)/stakeholders and all levels of management.
Must have used agile Project Management tools like Jira, Zoho Sprints or something similar.
Should be open to contribute to pre-sale activities & take delivery ownership.
DESIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE
10 to 12 years of experience in the Information Technology field.
5+ years of experience as a Project Manager.
At least 3 year of experience as a Scrum Master.
Programming experience with solid PHP design/coding/testing and building large scale distributed web sites.
Hand on Front End technologies such as REST, Web Service, Backbone, React, nodeJs, requireJs, underscore, bootstrap, jQuery, jQueryMobile, JSON, HTML5, or CSS.
Must have started his career as a developer (Mandatory).",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=d7f995a354ba61b6,d7f995a354ba61b6,indeed,ZOHO
new,Inside Sales Manager,Promenna,"Mumbai, Maharashtra",2020-01-11,"Relevant Experience
Should have minimum 6 plus years of experience in Inside Sales
Should be having experience of atleast2 years to manage a team and should be able to Individually handle the responsibilities
Should have exceptional skills in research, analysis, and problem solving while adhering to strict deadlines.
Job Responsibilities
Prepare the required email templates / newsletters for the campaign
Evaluate the email campaign response and plan to improve the response rate
Assist the data gathering team to create the database
Keeping abreast of changes in the marketplace and watching competitor activity.
Working hard to maintain a good working relationship with other company departments.
Suggest and implement improvements in the inside sales administration process Coordinate department projects to meet deadline.
Report on inside sales metrics and suggest improvements, Prepare monthly, quarterly and annual forecasts.
Should have a knowledge of CRM tool, preferably ZOHO.
Should have a knowledge of email campaigns tool.
General responsibilities:
Manage the inside sales representatives team
Excellent communication, interpersonal, leadership, presentation and organizational skills
Should be a good team player
Should be a quick learner
Qualifications:
Tech-IT preferred, any graduate.
Any related certification completed, can be an added advantage",,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=9ef348aab645206f,9ef348aab645206f,indeed,ZOHO
new,Developer for Zoho,BS MINING CORPORATION PVT LTD,Bhubaneswar,2020-01-27,"Customisations to Zoho Modules as per our needs and development of some products only for our organisation in Zoho creatorJob Type: ContractSalary: 15,000.00 to 25,000.00 /monthExperience:software development: 1 year (Preferred)work: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)javascript: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Location:Bhubaneshwar, Orissa (Preferred)Benefits:Health insuranceCompany Cab / Shuttle serviceTravel allowanceShift allowanceIndustry:Logistic Support",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=109&ao=389273&s=58&guid=0000017030575b2689eb8afa587e2aef&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_147aaca3&cb=1581358996362&jobListingId=3474087683,3474087683,glassdoor,ZOHO
new,Zoho CRM Developer,Advanz 101 Systems,Indore,2020-02-04,"Job Location-

Indore/Pune

Education & Experience-

3+ Years , BE (Computer Science /IT), MCA, M.Sc.

Job Description-

Very good experience with ZOHO CRM platforms in configuration, customization,

administration and reporting.

Experience in creating and testing application development, using Zoho Creator (HTML, Java and Deluge).

Solid understanding of accounts, leads, opportunities, contacts and campaigns.

competent in building reports and dashboards. Proven business process, analytical and problem-solving skills.

Demonstrated working knowledge of data management.

Experienced in development using Zoho Creator and workflow.

Experience in all Zoho Modules.

Experienced in integrations of Zoho across internal database & other resources.

Automation using Zoho like sending automated emailers & message etc

Good understanding of front-end technologies, such as HTML5, CSS3, jQuery and

Javascript.

Flexibility to carry out any other task required to meet business needs.

Excellent communication and written skills.",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=110&ao=437149&s=58&guid=0000017030575b2689eb8afa587e2aef&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_803dd4e0&cb=1581358996363&jobListingId=3353893352,3353893352,glassdoor,ZOHO
new,ZOHO CRM Analyst Gurgaon (Udyog Vihar Phase 4),Avantha Technologies Limited,Gurgaon,2020-01-30,"looking for a Zoho Analyst(expert),
Integrate Zoho software for In house
Sales, marketing, building and maintaining dashboards internally,

Exp : 1 to 3 yrs
Gurgaon location

Pooja Singh

HR Executive
8826443208",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=111&ao=437149&s=58&guid=0000017030575b2689eb8afa587e2aef&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_07233fd5&cb=1581358996364&jobListingId=3476979678,3476979678,glassdoor,ZOHO
new,Zoho Developer,Cubic Web Solutions,New Delhi,2020-01-30,"Full Time
Delhi
Posted on January 29, 2020

Website

Redian Software
We are hiring Zoho Developer 2-4 years experience with ZOHO CRM platforms in configuration, customisation, integration and administration.

Exp.: 2-4 Years

Salary: Best in industry

 Responsibilities-

Implementation, customization, and administration of suite of Zoho one applications including Creators, Projects, Desk, CRM, Books, Expense.
Understand the business process and requirements of the team and to implement and customize various modules.
Develop custom workflows and handy with Deluge. Track issues and provide periodic updates.
Create and develop CRM according to the requirement
Ensure speedy development in all the modules
Create custom tools and scripts to automate the manual business processes, within or outside
Should be able to manage the entire tool efficiently



To apply for this job email your details to info@rediansoftware.com.",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=115&ao=4120&s=58&guid=0000017030575b2689eb8afa587e2aef&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_ecfd09ec&cb=1581358996367&jobListingId=3476260404,3476260404,glassdoor,ZOHO
new,Customer Success Consultants for Zoho Consulting Practice,GoldenLion Consulting Services,Kolkata,2020-01-26,"Post Brief:

At GoldenLion we dont have a sales team. We have customer success team instead. If you have a passion to help customers by combining technology with industry expertise, this role is for you.

Prior Experience:

3-7 years of experience in customer success, business development or project execution.

Location:

Kolkata

Eligibility Criteria:

Successful track record in customer success, business development or project execution

Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal English

Consultative selling skill (Ability to listen and craft a solution)

Great presentation skills at C-Level executives (and ability to tailor presentations according to audience)

Creative problem-solving and follow-up skills

Experience working with CRM, ERP software (Experience in Zoho would be an added advantage)

Knowledge about different SaaS applications

Ability to build great relationships with clients

Desire to learn everyday

Ability to work in a team and build a world-class customer-centric culture

Responsibilities:

Engage in discovery sessions with prospects to understand their need

Craft a solution framework along with our Zoho Consulting team that can solve the business challenges of the prospect

Demonstrate the solution (or proof of concept) and the value of our offerings to prospects

Differentiate our offerings from competition

Closing the deal

Manage relationship with customers throughout the implementation so that you can walk the talk along with our implementation team

Keep relationship with customers once the implementation is over and facilitate all future engagements

Benefits:

Competitive salary

Flexible working time

Incentive based on performance

No formal dress code

Exposure to customers across Continents",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=117&ao=437149&s=58&guid=0000017030575b2689eb8afa587e2aef&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_05be0d67&cb=1581358996368&jobListingId=3450166728,3450166728,glassdoor,ZOHO
new,Zoho Developer,Centilytics,Noida,2020-02-03,"Education : B.tech (Any)

Job Responsibilities

1. Zoho Products Knowledge is recommended.

2. Attention to small details.

3. Have Good Memory

4. Adaptable to explore new products and is techie

5. Understand User stories (Shall be helpful in process creation thinking)
6. Good in Flow Charts. (not from the flow chart convention perspective, but from the flow chart making perspective).
7. Should have knowledge of Deluge script
Share resumes at hr@centilytics.com
RequirementsKnowledge about ZOHO CRM

Knowledge of ZOHO Recruit.

Knowledge of ZOHO Desk

Knowledge of ZOHO People",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=120&ao=4323&s=58&guid=0000017030575b2689eb8afa587e2aef&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_ac2abf66&cb=1581358996370&jobListingId=3480291383,3480291383,glassdoor,ZOHO
new,Customer Success Team Lead - Salesforce,Screen Magic Mobile Media Pvt. Ltd.,"Pune, Maharashtra",2020-01-29,"Screen-Magic is publisher of #1 business texting application on Salesforce & Zoho platforms. We are revered for our great customer support. Current high quality customer support is helping us growing well and to retain our leadership position in the market. With growing business, We have decided to expand our Customer support team. We are looking for a Customer support manager who can lead, manage and scale our support team, with goals of high performing customer support team.
Skills:
Very good communication skills
Experience of managing customer support team of atleast 10 members for international customers.
Good Customer facing skills
Good experience of managing teams
Good technology background required for understanding complex technology issues.
Responsibilities:
Setup, Manage customer support team, Setup KRA, SLAs using fresh desk like customer support tools.
Keep your team motivated.
Keep tab on all issues which are reported by various sources
Keep in touch with Product team for new releases and training teams according to their responsibility
Check quality of customer support tasks and plan the trainings & reinforcement sessions for improving in general customer support quality
Report to management about customer success reports
Invent/discover new channels and method to improve customer success
Manage budgets of Customer support team requirements
Take care of hiring and retaining customer support teams
Do upkeep of tools used for Customer success such as fresh desk, chat etc.

Information Security Responsibilities:
You are responsible for protecting the information resources to which they have access. Your responsibilities cover both computerised and non-computerised information and information technology devices (paper, reports, books, recordings, computers, removable storage media, printers, phones, fax machines, etc.) that they use or possess. You Must follow the information security practices set by the ISO, as well as any additional departmental or other applicable information security practices.You are expected to adhere to all Screen-Magic policies and exercise good judgement in the protection of information resources.
SHIFT : Either US or ROW based on your preference
MkDoqM18ZQ",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=16cd96609c873190,16cd96609c873190,indeed,ZOHO
new,Technical Support Engineer,Playment,"Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-01-11,"What do we do?
We are on a mission to expedite the AI-age by providing critical tooling infrastructure for engineers to build high accuracy AI models. Our first product is providing high-quality annotations-as-a-service for Autonomous AI (self-driving cars, drones, industrial robots). We're backed by YCombinator, SAIF Partners & Google Launchpad. In the last 18 months, we've established ourselves as a market leader created 200M+ annotations, grown 12X in top line, acquired 50+ enterprise customers across 10+ countries including Didi, Daimler, Ford, Samsung etc.
We are one of the top 10 startups in India as declared by Linkedin.
Why is it important?
High-quality training data is quintessential to improve the precision of ML algorithms. Forbes estimates ML engineers spent 70% of their time in pre/post-processing & data management steps. Companies need to build sophisticated tooling (supporting all forms of sensor data), hire and manage hundreds of skilled people to ensure high quality labeled data. Our autonomous driving customers estimate 1 hour of video data needs 800 man-hours of manual human work. Today, in the wake of the autonomous car industry only a few million kms of data have been labeled and 10x more will be collected before the world sees them on road. Like DevOps is critical to tech implementation, AI Ops will be a big challenge as AI development commercializes in the next 5-10 years. We aim to become an AI data platform, a critical part of AI infrastructure stack.
Join us to witness & influence the unfolding of AI, which is the largest technology wave the world will ever see.
Product Videos: https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCBzqxbzHstkYNudIMxAkmWQ/videos

Role description:
We are looking for a Technical Support Engineer to provide enterprise-level assistance to our customers. You will diagnose and troubleshoot software problems and help our customers perform the work smoothly. They will rely on you to provide timely and accurate solutions to their technical problems. In addition, the Support Engineer will focus on determining technical support Pain areas that she/he would see while working with Customers and Provide feedback and details to Technical Advisors and Internal teams.
Responsibilities :
Act as the initial point of contact for all product/software related concerns from clients or other employees.
Taking ownership of customer issues reported and seeing problems through to resolution
Researching, diagnosing, troubleshooting and identifying solutions to resolve system issues
Following standard procedures for proper escalation of unresolved issues to the appropriate internal teams Comfortable working in and assisting others through company help desk software, such as Zoho in addition to other remote access desktop programs
Complete detailed reports listing requests to technical assistance steps taken to resolve them, and the specific dates/individuals involved
Accept constructive criticism and customer feedback regarding their experience with software or IT services Rapidly establish a good working relationship with customers and other professionals, such as software developers
Requirements:
1-3 Years of proven work experience as a Technical Support Engineer, Test Engineer or similar role
Good understanding of web-based and related systems like javascript
Strong debugging skills using browser's console and network tab
Ability to diagnose and troubleshoot basic technical issues
Familiarity with remote desktop applications and help desk software (eg. JIRA, Zoho)
Excellent problem-solving and communication skills
Ability to provide step-by-step technical help, both written and verbal

zKbTMGNilE",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=fe83986698c030f1,fe83986698c030f1,indeed,ZOHO
new,Business Development Manager,Anuta Networks,"Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-01-11,"Business Development manager - Bangalore
Position Title: Business Development manager
Anuta Networks is the leader in network orchestration industry. Our customers include global Tier-1 Service Providers and Fortune-500 enterprises. We are seeking a Business Development Manager to maximize customer outreach and build a sustainable pipeline. This is an ideal opportunity to join a small team and make a big impact in a fast growing industry.
Responsibilities
Setup and maintain a substantial pipeline on a monthly and quarterly basis
Identify and target prospective clients across strategic accounts in North America
Write compelling email copy and cold-call prospects.
Work efficiently on the assigned accounts and bring qualified demo's to build the pipeline
Qualify and nurture inbound leads by preparing personalized follow-ups
Utilize CRM for managing leads and follow-up
Track and monitor sales and performance of key partners.
Contribute to specific projects as they arise (E.g. Market research, webinar promotion, social media presence etc.)
Support Account executives in some administrative tasks (trip preparation, scheduling)
An ideal candidate will have following qualifications:
3-5 years of End-to-End sales experience in a B2B technology company with a track record of customer acquisition.
Experience with inside sales, international sales, lead generation and cold calling.
Self Starter & Target Driven sales acumen
Exceptional communication and language skills in English.
Passionate and a curious mind with out-of-box thinking.
Proven networking skills score additional points
Experience with CRMs such as SalesForce, Zoho
Entrepreneurial drive and comfort working in ambiguous, quickly-changing environments",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=f0ff0c5a12aaf546,f0ff0c5a12aaf546,indeed,ZOHO
new,IT Sales Consultant,Agileblaze,Kerala,2020-01-11,"Were looking for a self driven, self-starter individuals with a natural drive for sales and Marketing
Passionate about innovation & creative
She/He should have the natural ability to learn can talk Cloud Computing (IaaS, Big Data) & DevOps.
Knowledge of the sales process with the ability to understand and interpret customer needs using fact-finding to identify sales opportunities.
Responsible for prospecting and qualifying leads for our sales team
To achieve revenue targets.
Should possess effective written & verbal communication skill.
Familiarity with CRM tools is an added advantage.
Compensation is DOE, salaried, and incentive-based. The right individual will be rewarded for team selling and scheduling high-level meetings.
Requirements
Ability to hit in a fast paced environment.
Technical understanding in the field of IT administration and/or DevOps
Ability to pickup complex technologies on the fly
A proven track record in sales: Atleast at college level events
Experience with Salesforce, Zoho, Close.io, or other CRM
Desired Profile
B.Tech,BCA, BBM, BBA or any other equivalent
0-3 Years
Should preferably be from a technical background
The candidate should be an effective team player, self starter, ability to meet sales deadlines.
Must have good understanding of Sales & Marketing concepts
Should be ready to travel abroad on quick notice

Candidates looking for a challenging career, who fulfill the above requirements & willing to relocate in Kochi can send in their resumes to careers@agileblaze.com",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=34d07ef04da2aafe,34d07ef04da2aafe,indeed,ZOHO
new,Accounts Executive,YNM Pan Global Trade Pvt Ltd,"Hyderabad, Telangana",2020-02-04,"Job Summary: I. Accountant - Female Only.JD details below: All Accountant Skills along with Having knowledge of any accounting Software like Tally, CRM, Zoho , etc...E-Mail Writing Skills, MS Office & Communication skills are mandate.Maintaining DBR, Purchases cum Sales and other allied accounting record.Maintaining Tally ERP9 / Any Accounting Software for successful and smooth operational movements.GST Calculations and GST Filing.Maintaining Waybills, Accounting Vouchers, Bills, Statutory recordsMonitoring Payrolls.Data Analysis & Financial Services.Processes supplier & our Client invoices.Maintain the accounts payable and accounts receivable systems in order to ensure.complete and accurate records of all financial transactions.Administer employee files and records in order to ensure accurate payment of benefits and allowances.Mandate Languages : English.Should understand the Office Work Flow Like Sales and Accounts.Experience : 2-4 year.Salary: 15k - 18k per Month.Positions: 1To Know More About our Company, Please Visit our Website : www.ynmsafety.com or WhatsApp No.: 7989225802Responsibilities and DutiesI. Accountant - Female Only.JD details below: All Accountant Skills along with Having knowledge of any accounting Software like Tally, CRM, Zoho , etc...E-Mail Writing Skills, MS Office & Communication skills are mandate.Maintaining DBR, Purchases cum Sales and other allied accounting record.Maintaining Tally ERP9 / Any Accounting Software for successful and smooth operational movements.GST Calculations and GST Filing.Maintaining Waybills, Accounting Vouchers, Bills, Statutory recordsMonitoring Payrolls.Data Analysis & Financial Services.Processes supplier & our Client invoices.Maintain the accounts payable and accounts receivable systems in order to ensure.complete and accurate records of all financial transactions.Administer employee files and records in order to ensure accurate payment of benefits and allowances.Mandate Languages : English.Should understand the Office Work Flow Like Sales and Accounts.Experience : 2-4 year.Salary: 15k - 18k per Month.Positions: 1To Know More About our Company, Please Visit our Website : www.ynmsafety.com or WhatsApp No.: 7989225802Qualifications and SkillsI. Accountant - Female Only.JD details below: All Accountant Skills along with Having knowledge of any accounting Software like Tally, CRM, Zoho , etc...E-Mail Writing Skills, MS Office & Communication skills are mandate.Maintaining DBR, Purchases cum Sales and other allied accounting record.Maintaining Tally ERP9 / Any Accounting Software for successful and smooth operational movements.GST Calculations and GST Filing.Maintaining Waybills, Accounting Vouchers, Bills, Statutory recordsMonitoring Payrolls.Data Analysis & Financial Services.Processes supplier & our Client invoices.Maintain the accounts payable and accounts receivable systems in order to ensure.complete and accurate records of all financial transactions.Administer employee files and records in order to ensure accurate payment of benefits and allowances.Mandate Languages : English.Should understand the Office Work Flow Like Sales and Accounts.Experience : 2-4 year.Salary: 15k - 18k per Month.Positions: 1To Know More About our Company, Please Visit our Website : www.ynmsafety.com or WhatsApp No.: 7989225802Job Type: Full-timeSalary: 15,000.00 to 18,000.00 /monthEducation:Bachelor's (Preferred)Location:Hyderabad, Telangana (Required)Benefits:Flexible work hoursIndustry:SalesJob Duties:Record changes to customer accounts, updating service packages, adding accounts, and removing accounts as neededOther duties as requested",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=7e9a7471f3642659,7e9a7471f3642659,indeed,ZOHO
new,Accounts Assistant,Kreate Konnect E Solutions Pvt Ltd,"Vadodara, Gujarat",2020-01-16,"Job SummaryWe require a full time account assistant for various activities related to collection, segregation, classification and compilation of data which will streamline the accounting activities.Responsibilities and DutiesThe person appointed will be responsible for the following:- Collection of data from various online portals and marketplaces.- Compilation of data as per the needs of different users of the data for their respective objectives.- Posting the transactions on our cloud based accounting software Zoho books.- Reporting to the management periodically on the status of outstanding receivables and payables.- Once a payment is made or received the same has to be marked against the respective invoices.- Uploading payments on netbanking portals for further approval by higher authorities.- Liasioning and collaborating with external agencies e.g. ca, consultants, etc. for providing the required data to them.- Any other work which might be assigned by the management from time to time in due course of emloyment.Required Experience and QualificationsThe person is expected to possess the following set of skills:- Basic knowledge of accounts and book keeping.- Should have very good knowledge of MS Excel.- Should be able to draft emails which are to the point and crisp.- Should be ready to learn and adapt to new systems.- Should be able to generate reports, download invoices, etc after logging on to various websites and marketplaces using own judgement and understanding.- Should be familiar with net banking facilities and aware of how the system of online payment works.- Should have knowledge of due dates of various statutory liabilities and compliances.- Should have basic knowledge of statutory provisions like rates of TDS, GST, etc.- Fluency in English for communication will be an added advantage.Job Type: Full-timeExperience:Tally: 1 year (Preferred)work: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Accounting: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Required)Language:English (Required)Required Documents:Aadhar Card (Required)Industry:Accounting",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=c90ae7105e628c9c,c90ae7105e628c9c,indeed,ZOHO
new,Sr. Content Writer,Translate By Humans,"Ahmedabad, Gujarat",2020-01-22,"Job SummaryA fantastic opportunity for a passionate and ambitious Content Writer to join a London based language start-up. Our ideal candidate would be an experienced professional with demonstrable creative writing skills, who can perform well under deadlines and is detail-oriented. The candidate should be innovative, a quick learner with a good understanding of digital marketing, social media and web analytics. This is an amazing opportunity for someone who has a passion for writing, research, and technology.Responsibilities and Duties: Research and analyze industry-specific facts and figures for creating content (textual, graphical, pictorial) for research heavy articles and website copyWrite regular language industry-specific articles for the companys blog and on behalf of the company for various other credible platformsCreate content for web-pages, infographics, case studies, white papers, and other marketing materialLead the discovery of new topics and areas of editorial expertise for the company, as well as the optimization of existing content - all backed by the latest SEO techniques, research, and tracking toolsAnalyze the effectiveness of uploaded content using various analytic tools and softwareShow a passion for SEO and current trends but with expertise in writing for people, rather than machinesHelp execute the editorial calendar by coordinating with the Content Manager and SEO specialist on targets and deliveryAssist to create and implement an industry-specific editorial strategy, informed by competitor research and reports on the past performance of contentCreate a monthly social media calendar with approval from the Content ManagerIndependently troubleshoot technical issues faced while using marketing toolsDrive outreach efforts on platforms like HARO, Quora, social media and via email for primary research initiativesRequired Experience, Skills and QualificationsBachelor's degree in English Literature, Journalism, Mass Communication or Liberal ArtsExcellent command over spoken and written English communication2-3 years professional experience with demonstrable creative and formal writing skillsOpen and clear communication with the teamGreat time management skillsWell versed with tools such as WordPress, Google Analytics, SEMRush, Zoho PageSense, and Microsoft OfficeExceptional primary and secondary research skillsBenefitsBirthday and Weekends OffComplimentary Gym MembershipGenerous Paid LeavesFrequent Lunch and LearnsOngoing Learning and Development opportunitiesCompetitive Rewards and Recognition programJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 35,000.00 to 40,000.00 /monthExperience:Content Writing: 2 years (Required)work: 2 years (Required)Education:Master's (Preferred)Industry:Therapy",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=57f169bb57aa1873,57f169bb57aa1873,indeed,ZOHO
new,Sr. Zoho CRM Developer,10XBiZ,"Madhapur, Hyderabad, Telangana",2020-01-30,"Job SummaryZoho CRM Developer is for candidates having 1 to 4 years of experiences looking to develop the career as a developer / Senior Developer. This position has a competitive salary and there will great learning potential. The Job will also involve extensive project experience on various CRM Products such as Zoho CRM, Zoho Creator.Responsibilities and Duties1. Implementation, customization and administration of suite of enterprise Zoho applications including Projects, Desk, CRM , and more.2. Understand the business process flow and requirements of the team members to implement and customize various elements and objects in Zoho.3. Develop custom Zoho workflows.4. Create required training material /guidelines for the users, as needed.5. Assist users in day to day questions or technical concerns.6. Work with Zoho support team to resolve any reported issues. Track issues and provide periodic updates.7. Create custom tools and scripts to automate the manual business processes, within or outside of Zoho.8. Effectively utilize Zoho modules features to automate various business processes.9. Mentor, Control and ensure the sustained effective usage of Zoho products throughout the organization.10. Provide System admin / IT support to users.11. Manage access and control of users.12. Generate required daily, weekly and monthly reports RequirementQualifications and Skills1. Experience in Zoho projects/Desk or Zoho CRM customization, implementation, administration and administration.2. Experienced in development using Zoho Creator and Flow.3. Experienced working as a Software or Web Developer using one of the following languagesI. Backend: Python (Django), Node.JSII. Frontend: React Native, JQuery, React.js, Angular.js4. Experience in either one Frontend: React Native, JQuery, React.js, and Angular.js.5. jquery6. python7. angular.js8. react.js9. react10. nativeBenefitsThe opportunity to learn tons at a rapidly growing startupWill always respect the IdeasWe have a policy of No Work Hour (3 times in a week ) which will allow you to Brainstorm and Deep thinking and Idea Pitchingwill form part of Our 10x Innovative TeamJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 350,000.00 to 600,000.00 /yearExperience:software development: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Zoho Developer: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Industry:IT Operations & Helpdesk",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=faa24617b3ebafd3,faa24617b3ebafd3,indeed,ZOHO
new,Zoho Developer,Durafit Fitness Equipment's,"Tiruchchirappalli, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-15,"KRA's: Implementation of Zoho one applications including CRM, Books, Projects and more.Automate any manual business process within or outside Zoho.Develop and maintain all the websites of Durafit.Integration of Zoho with Third party application like Amazon, Flipkart, SMS magic.Job Types: Full-time, FresherExperience:software development: 1 year (Preferred)Location:Tiruchchirappalli, Tamil Nadu (Required)Programming Languages needed:HTML (Required)JavaScript (Required)PHP (Required)",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=317f37067fd0d2d3,317f37067fd0d2d3,indeed,ZOHO
new,Project Manager,Whatfix,"Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-02-06,"Who are we?


Whatfix is the #1 Digital Adoption Platform (DAP) for Enterprises. We are disrupting the way Learning content and Application Support is consumed. We provide large enterprises (Mostly Fortune 500 companies) with a SaaS platform that helps accelerate product adoption and reduce support/training efforts by providing Contextual and Step by step guidance inside any web application at the exact time a task is being performed. The product has redefined the way companies onboard, train, and provide support to users.


What sets us apart from the rest?


With over 100 of the Fortune 500 companies already onboard as customers, Whatfix has been named among the top 20 B2B tech companies alongside the likes of Adobe, PayPal, and Cisco.


With a YoY growth of 300%, it has also been recognized among the top 50 fastest growing SaaS companies worldwide in the SaaS 1000 list and as a Market Leader by Gartner in the Digital Adoption space.


We are pleased to have an Employee rating of 4.6 on Glassdoor which speaks volumes of our work culture and our Customer obsession can be clearly seen in our reviews on platforms like G2 Crowd & Gartner Peer Insights. The employees are happy, the customers are happy, but what about the investors? Take a look for yourself - Stellaris || Cisco || Eight Roads || Helion Ventures


Our Professional Services team of around 15+ members is working with large enterprises spread across the North Americas (85%) and EMEA (15%) regions. It is a very fast-paced group that is looking at growing to more than thrice its size by the end of 2020. The team is looking at adding over-achieving Project Managers to lead the product implementation & solution-ing efforts.


What you'll get to do?


Design a framework for an efficient end-to-end implementation of Whatfix for Fortune 500 Customers spread across all geographies, industries, segments, applications, etc
Conduct kick-off meetings with every new client to review expectations and to create a written project implementation plan with milestones, deliverables, SLAs and KPIs
Understand the business objectives, define the project scope, create a plan with clear outcomes and timelines, monitor & communicate the status, and ensure timely customer onboarding and completion of concurrent projects
Ensure the success of the Proof of Concept (POCs) by administering and collecting all technical inputs and demonstrating the capabilities of Whatfix to the prospects
Analyze, estimate and recommend solutions with an in-depth understanding of customer landscapes in collaboration with Solutions Engineers and Architects
Enable the team to reduce the product's Go-Live Time (RGT) by performing regular reviews and introducing process improvements
Work closely with stakeholders within each customer account to understand their workflow processes and business challenges, in order to create Business Requirement documents


Our ideal Project Manager:


Has preferably worked in Product based companies or Consulting firms for International customers
Comes with 9+ years of total experience, with at least 2 years in a project management role
Preferably, lead implementation projects of Enterprise Applications like CRM (Salesforce, Zoho, FreshSales, etc), ERP (SAP, Oracle JDE, etc), or HCM (Workday, SAP SuccessFactors, etc)
Understands Multi-tenant applications and has knowledge of agile delivery management methodologies, processes, and tools
Has the ability to lead and manage complex and concurrent projects
Demonstrates the ability to collaborate with internal and external stakeholders while dealing with complex situations
Exhibits strong organizing skills with the ability to prioritize and respond to shifting deadlines
Is open to travel on short term projects to customer locations (outside India) if required
With 85% of our customers based out of the North American region, the person should be open to working in the US time zone (4 PM to 1 AM IST)


Please Note:


We don't believe in keeping the applicants hanging and give very high importance to closing the loop irrespective of the outcome of your application. In case you don't hear from us within 7 days of applying for this role, please reach out to Harshil Mittal on LinkedIn
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diverse people because of and not in spite of the differences. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, ethnicity, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status
Confidence can sometimes hold us back from applying for a job. But we'll let you in on a secret: there's no such thing as a 'perfect' candidate. Whatfix is a place where everyone can grow! Please apply if this is a role that would make you excited to come into work every day.",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=2bad5efc32e70b63,2bad5efc32e70b63,indeed,ZOHO
new,ZoHO Developer,Objective Blue Pvt. Ltd,"Delhi, Delhi",2020-01-11,"Job SummaryFunctional understanding of ZOHO in its entirety, including Zoho CRM Plus, Workplace, Finance Plus, IT management etc.Be efficient in implementation, getting customizations done and administration work related to Zoho and its related apps i.e.  Recruit, CRM, Zoho mail etc.Have a complete understanding of the process from Development till the end support. A complete knowledge about the system configuration and its setup.Good knowledge to do technical documentation of the work.integration of ZOHO Apps with third- party applications.Project Management.Responsibilities and DutiesAssist, train and create guidelines for the users to understand the complexities of the product.Work closely with the clients and understand their needs and requirements.Be ready to travel to different onsite locations for work if needed.Required Experience, Skills and QualificationsWe are on a lookout for an enthusiastic person for the role of ZOHO Implementation Specialist who loves the process of professing, educating and training people on the platform and has a decent experience of at least 2-5 years of being in the industry.Excellent knowledge in MS ExcelKnowledge of other ERP Platform will be added advantageBenefitsInsuranceJob Types: Full-time, Contract, Walk-InExperience:work: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 2 years (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=c49de922dbef9643,c49de922dbef9643,indeed,ZOHO
new,Executive - Market Research-contract (1 Year),HealthAsyst,"Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-02-05,"Requirement:- Executive - Market Research
Employment type:- Contract (1 year)
Profile Summary
HealthAsyst marketing team is looking for a result driven candidate with excellent communication skills to drive marketing operations. The ideal candidate will have 1-3 years' experience in list building, data mining, database management, CRM administration, and email campaigns. Experience with any marketing automation tool is a plus.

Desired profile
Market Research and Database Management
Research and build a database of prospects for marketing campaigns and sales efforts
Gather prospect details including email address, phone numbers, size etc
Ensure that the existing database is accurate and updated by adding missing information
Ensure accuracy of existing database through regular data sanitization
Clean-up new databases, de-dupe and upload in the CRM
Support the marketing and Inside sales team in prospecting exercises
Zoho Administration and Reporting
Updating Zoho with latest releases without impacting business operations
Taking regular back-up of Zoho CRM
Own Zoho and execute required changes from time to time without impacting business operations
Key Success Factors
Prior experience in database research
Good communication skills, ability to write clear and concise emails
Self-starter, results driven with a disciplined approach to research
Expertise in MS office Product Suite, with special emphasis on Excel
Zoho knowledge and knowledge of any marketing automation tool is a plus

Education
Bachelor's Degree
Keyskills
inside salesdatabase managementmarketing campaignsprospectingdata miningmarket researchcrm
Desired Candidate Profile
Please refer to the Job description above
Education-
PG:Post Graduation Not Required
Company Profile
Health Asyst Private Limited
HealthAsyst is a technology company with a strong track record of successful products and services engagements across the Healthcare industry spectrum since 1999. HealthAsyst offers a whole gamut of software services helping clients effectively address their operational challenges and grow their businesses stronger. Some of our services include software development, mobile application development, ICD 9-10 implementation & healthcare integration. HealthAsyst combines strong domain expertise, proven processes and flexibility in engagements to make every service engagement a success.

Leveraging its market insights and strong R&D focus, HealthAsyst has developed a range of software products for the Healthcare Industry. HealthAsyst products enhance quality of patient care &, improve patient safety, allowing its clients & partners to grow their business while controlling costs. HealthAsysts product development process is guided by a formal validation process. HealthAsyst meets clients and prospective clients to fully understand their business operations, their software needs, and the challenges they face in the market. This feedback is used to ensure that the software HealthAsyst develops meet real-world needs. HealthAsyst is committed to ensuring its clients stay ahead of the game. With a combination of technology skills, innovative solutions, domain expertise and a commitment to long-term client relationships, HealthAsyst provides value to its clients by improving quality and reducing costs.
Kindly send in your resumes to hr@healthasyst.com",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=76e549627c64c25a,76e549627c64c25a,indeed,ZOHO
new,Sr. Executive - Finance & Accounts,Avi Solar Energy Pvt Ltd,"Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-01-30,"Job SummaryAvi Solar is looking for an experienced candidate (preferably female candidate) for the current opening in their Finance and Accounts department. Candidate having corporate work experience is preferred.Work Location: Rajaji Nagar, Bangalore (No transportation facility provided by company)Responsibilities and DutiesTaking care of all work involved from Record to ReportQualifications and Skills1. B.Com graduate with 5+ years of experience in accounts & financeor MBA/M.Com graduate with 2+ years of relevant experience2. Good communication skills3. Good accounting knowledge4. Good working knowledge of Tally/Zoho ERPBenefits1. Medical Insurance for employee and family members including parents2. 5 days working weekJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 240,000.00 to 300,000.00 /yearExperience:work: 1 year (Preferred)Sales: 1 year (Preferred)Benefits:Provident fund (PF)Health insurance",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=eba5156f4c8005b5,eba5156f4c8005b5,indeed,ZOHO
new,Hungry Customer Specialist,Rezonant,"Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-01-11,"By now, you have spent some time honing your talent.
You are able to grasp nuances of a brand and are thinking strategy. You are able to write well and communicate the ideas in your head. You are ready to make the shift.

Experience: 1-3 years
Required Skills: Very good English: writing and communicating. Composing and sending high-quality, error-free emails. Must know typing. Must understand briefs.
Tools: MS Word, MS Excel, Google docs, Dropbox, Intercom, Zoho

We want someone who:
Is good at understanding briefs
Has worked in the eco-system
Basic knowledge of design, writing, digital marketing, social media
Is highly responsive, someone who replies to mails and messages sent by clients, vendors, team members immediately
Someone who has a knowledge of materials, vendors, site visitations
Can handle our chat handles for customers
Familiar with modern customer engagement tools such as Intercom, Freshdesk, Zoho

You wont like it here if:
You are not focussed. We want you to learn & grow fast
You are not a master of your software. You will not be able to deliver
You can handle only one brief at a time. Unfortunately, time is of the essence and multi-tasking is the need of the hour
If you do not want to learn
If you dont enjoy your work
If you dont want to get your hands dirty. From dealing with vendors and clients to site visits, we do everything ourselve
If you are in it for the wrong reasons. We come to work early and try to leave early. Party/sleep/chill, your time, your choice.

Good to have:
Aspire to be a strategic thinker and solve problems for brands
Aspire to write/design
Desire to grow and learn
A love for chai, shorts & flip-flops, cause thats how we roll

If interested, please send your work to careers@rezonant.net",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=98d2d6084b3009a9,98d2d6084b3009a9,indeed,ZOHO
new,Manager Finance,Innoval Digital Solutions,"Mumbai, Maharashtra",2020-02-03,"Location : Mumbai
Posted On:05-02-2020
Experience : 8 to 12 Yrs
Last date : 25-02-2020
Skills :Accounts Receivables, Account Payable, TDS Return, GST Return, Payroll, PF, ESIC, PT, statutory Compliance, Hands-on experience on MS Excel, Zoho/ Tally, Assisting in Audit, Budgeting and MIS Reporting
JOB DESCRIPTION
Independently handle Day to Day Accounting, Accounts Receivables, Account Payable, TDS Return, GST Return, Payroll, PF, ESIC, PT, statutory Compliance, Hands-on experience on MS Excel, Zoho/ Tally, Assisting in Audit, Budgeting and MIS Reporting
1. Coordination with the project delivery team for tracking milestones for invoicing
2. Preparations and sending of customer invoices
a. Product licensing, AMC, implementation
b. Time and material billing based in timesheets
3. Preparations and issue of purchase orders
4. Cash flow - Receivables/Payables Management, budgeting planning and actuals reporting
5. Statutory -GST returns & related. TDS & Income tax related.
6. MIS reporting - Profit & Loss, Balance Sheet, Provisions, Ageing report
7. Liasoning with Auditors and company secretary for ROC and statutory forms filing
8. Final Accounts
9. Follow up with customers for receivables
10. Updated daily book keeping, reconciled accounting software and bank book
11. Netbanking for processing payments - vendors and salaries
12. Good excel & analytical skills.
13. Team player & good written & oral communication.
Knowledge of Tally or Zoho books accounting systems in a software product and services company will be of added advantage
Must and essential experience of working in software product and services company
Candidates Preferred from : Western suburbs of Mumbai Andheri- Borivali
Only MUMBAI resident candidates can apply.
Education:
UG:B.Com - Commerce
PG: MBA/PGDM - Any Specialization, CA, ICWA (CMA) is an advantage

Contact: 0471 4074000
Email: careers@ivldsp.com",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=9790185bb6e056a1,9790185bb6e056a1,indeed,ZOHO
new,Junior Accountant,APKA Industries,"Karur, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-20,"Job SummaryOur company is a startup manufacturing organization and we are interested in hiring a Junior Accountant to join our team. The ideal candidate will have a head for numbers, experience with Tally or Zoho Books, MS Excel, and strong analytical skills. The Junior Accountant will report directly to the Founder/Business Strategist, and will need to demonstrate the ability to work proactively and independently in a fast-paced office environment. We offer opportunities for advancement for the right candidate, and a competitive salary.Responsibilities and DutiesAssist with the preparation of financial statementsAnalyze and reconcile bank statements and general ledgersPost journal entries for accrued expenses and revenueMaintain and record fixed assetsPrepare and file local compliance reporting as necessaryPrepare court-mandated annual accounting reports and inventories for client discharges as necessaryAct as a liaison for vendors to reconcile any billing discrepanciesRequired Experience, Skills and QualificationsBachelors Degree in Accounting or Finance2+ years related experience preferredHands-on experience working with general ledgersStrong written and verbal communication skillsExcellent problem-solving skillsProficient with ERP systems, including Microsoft Office, Tally or Zoho BooksAble to multi-task and prioritize work effectivelyBenefitsPaid leavesJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 120,000.00 to 180,000.00 /yearExperience:Tally or Zoho Books: 1 year (Preferred)Accounting: 1 year (Preferred)A/R Analysis: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Benefits:Paid leaves / Leave encashmentIndustry:Production & ManufacturingJob Duties:Monitoring company accounts and conducting quarterly reviewsAccounts payableAccounts receivableProfit-and-loss statementsTax preparationExpense reportsCost reduction proposalsPayrollBudgetsInternal audits for policy adherenceInternal audits for tax codesPresenting budgets and reports to upper managementAdditional Duties:RecordkeepingAccount reconciliationInvoice processingRunning errands (bank deposits, etc.)Data entry",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=94d3a3e72ec99ea3,94d3a3e72ec99ea3,indeed,ZOHO
new,Business Development Executive,Pena4 Tech Solutions,"Hyderabad, Telangana",2020-01-29,"Business Development Executive *BDE - Position DescriptionI. Position Purpose: Pena4 Business Process Services require a sales lead generation team to develop and qualify revenue opportunities for the remote and U.S. sales teams to pursue. There will be a team leader. This position will be a team member generating and qualifying sales leads. This work needs to be performed at Pena4 Tech.II. Position Summary:  The Sales Lead Generation Team Member will develop sales leads, qualify revenue opportunities and turn them over to the sales team. This is a quota carrying role and candidates must be highly motivated, tenacious, and self-starting. The Team Member must be able to quantify a record of accomplishment in lead generation results. Alternative compensation models based on lead qualification should be considered.III. Essential Job Requirements1. Education : -A university degree or college diploma.2. Experience : - A minimum of 2 years of quantifiable results in revenue prospecting, remote sales, and cold calling. Experience includes generating high volume leads at a high sales conversion rate.  Broad range of contacts crossing several industries, but including Information Technology. Information Technology industry experience helpful.  Experience using and setting up Zoho CRM application.4. Required Skills : - Using a lead qualification methodology, such as BANT (budget, authority, need, and timeline)  Track record of exceeding sales quotas Demonstrated analytical and problem solving skills Demonstrated client facing skills including expectation management, communication skills, and client information management.5. Preferred Skills: -Experience in multiple industries including financial services, human resources and other Business Process Services areas.6. Physical Requirements : -Available to work out of our Hyderabad office.V. Position Responsibilities1. Collaboration with the Sales Lead Team Leader in developing and working to the sales quota.2. Develop leads, qualify revenue opportunities and turn them over to the sales staff for the close.3. Develop new business via telephone and mass communication such as email and social media to introduce the Pena4services and identify appropriate buyers within the target market.4. Follow up on leads and conduct research to identify potential prospects.5. Conduct a needs analysis and determine prospects pain points to determine prospective client needs6. Build and cultivate prospect relationships by initiating communications and conducting follow-up communications in order to move opportunities through the sales funnel.7. Work with Lead Generation Manager to develop and grow the sales pipeline to consistently meet quarterly revenue goals.8. Manage data for new and prospective clients within the CRM tool, ensuring all communications are logged, information is accurate and documents are attached.9. Prepare and analyze sales pipeline reports and dashboards.Job Types: Full-time, Walk-InSalary: 500,000.00 /yearExperience:Sales: 2 years (Required)business development: 2 years (Required)Education:Higher Secondary(12th Pass) (Required)Language:English (Required)",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=34b1f22fa3b17b36,34b1f22fa3b17b36,indeed,ZOHO
new,Finance Tech Lead,Builder.ai - What would you Build?,"Gurgaon, Haryana",2020-01-11,"We are looking for a versatile & experienced finance professional who shall develop and manage our company financial reporting systems and, to help meet or exceed corporate goals in real-time financial and KPI reporting. The Finance Tech Lead will collaborate with the Global Finance Team and Planning & Reporting Team to develop the Real time Financial and KPI Reporting System.
Excellent commercial acumen and understanding of KPIs and a natural flair for using technology in creating MIS Dashboards for reporting. Must have a strong background in corporate financial management, commercial acumen, analytical skills to spearhead the finance function and a strong desire to become a part of a dynamic team.

Why We Need This Role
We are looking for a financial professional to develop and manage a Real Time Financial and KPI Reporting Dashboard and help develop a system to constantly compare actual results with Business Plan to detect variances in a timely manner and facilitate corrective actions. The Finance Tech Lead shall have to work in close coordination with the global finance team spread across India and the US. The Finance Tech Lead shall have a solid line reporting to the Group Finance Head and dotted line reporting to the Director of Financial Growth and the CEO.


Why You Should Join
This is a challenging and important role that requires you to handle a set of financial reporting tools and integrating them to develop a real-time financial reporting system. Only join this role if you are comfortable with trying fast and innovative ways in the rather staid and standardized finance functions and not fearing to fail.

First Three Month Deliverables
Review and understand the dynamics of the financial systems of the Company which is critical to develop any financial reporting system.
Understand the strategic business goals of the Organization and its stakeholders.
Develop an Interactive and Analytical Dashboard/ Management Information System (MIS) capable of providing a reliable and accurate periodic financial and KPI reporting.
Act as the primary support person for the MIS system
First Six Month Deliverables
Integrate the Interactive and Analytical Dash Board/ MIS fully with various platforms like Builder 360, Builder Hive, Zoho, Xero, Fathom, Visible, Tableau etc. to provide Real time Financial & KPI Reports.
Customize the various Reports required by stakeholders.
Requirements
The successful candidate must possess the following :
Passionate about loosely held values and ideas. We want someone who has experience but is not blinded by the path already taken.
5+ years experience in developing and managing MIS Reporting Systems
Proficiency in online accounting software and ability to work in applications like Zoho, Fathom, Visible, Tableau. Proficiency in Spreadsheets is a must.
Ideal candidate should come from a start-up kind of organization, preferably from a disruptive business idea, which has raised funds from investors and which boasts of a strong MIS
Lots of energy and multitasking
Good understanding of business and financial issues
Ability to work in tight deadlines
Benefits
Health and Wellness benefits including competitive medical, dental, and vision plans
Performance-based bonuses and stock options
Generous vacation and time off benefits including paid holidays
Generally flexible working hours
Working in a very young, energetic and infectious work atmosphere
A collaborative culture where unconventional thinkers come together to solve interesting problems and having fun while doing it
Mission-driven company that is making the world a better place",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=91950166dc5ccb59,91950166dc5ccb59,indeed,ZOHO
new,Web Developer | Wordpress | PHP,MountCode,"Mohali, Punjab",2020-01-20,"Job SummaryWe require a Senior Web Developers.You will be responsible for the design, development, and troubleshooting of Wordpress, HTML and PHP websites.Responsibilities and Duties-: - In-depth knowledge of Wordpress.- Working with Wordpress plugin.- Strong fundamentals in PHP, Javascript, CSS- Good Knowledge of HTML,CSS, Bootstrap, Javascript.- Must have strong knowledge in Wordpress, Shopify, Squarespace, Zoho CRM.- Must have strong knowledge in Codeigniter, Core PHP and PHP(MVC) and API.- Logically sound and hard working.Required Experience and Qualifications-: Experience- 1 year to 2 yearsQualification - Any Bachelor degreeBenefits: -5 days workingGood Salary PackageHealthy EnvironmentJob Type: - Full-timeContact details: -Contact No.:  94643-29006Address: - Plot No: E-91, Ground Floor, Phase 8, Industrial Area, Mohali, PunjabJob Type: Full-time",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=43f33619b5306e69,43f33619b5306e69,indeed,ZOHO
new,Experienced PHP Web Developer,Inspire IT Solutions,"Mohali, Punjab",2020-01-16,"Job Summary.In depth knowledge of object-oriented PHP and Laravel, Codeigniter Framework..1-4 years of experience in PHP (Codeigniter, Laravel), JQuery, JavaScript, AJAX, MySQL, CSS and HTML is required..MySQL profiling and query optimization.Creative and efficient problem solverRequired Experience, Skills and Qualifications-: - Good Knowledge of HTML,CSS, Bootstrap, Javascript.- Must have strong knowledge in Wordpress, Shopify, Squarespace, Zoho CRM.- Must have strong knowledge in Codeigniter, Core PHP and PHP(MVC) and API.- Logically sound and hard working.Key Skills-: PHP, HTML, CSS, WordPress, React Native, ReactJS, JavaScript, laravel,jQuery, XML, JSON, AJAX etc.Required Experience and Qualifications-: . Any Graduate/B.E./B.Tech/MCA/BCA/PGDCA or Diploma Holder.. Basic Knowledge about development.. Basic Knowledge of .net/CSS/JavaScript/JAVA/PHP/ANDROID etc.. Willing to join immediately.Required Experience and Qualifications-: Experience- 1 year to 2 yearsBenefits : -Good Salary PackageHealthy & Safe Work EnvironmentJob Type: - Full-timeAddress : - Mountcode Technology, E-91, Ground Floor, Industrial Area, Phase 8, Mohali(PUNJAB)Contact : - 94643-29006Job Type: Full-timeJob Type: Full-time",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=2b5290e9bf888185,2b5290e9bf888185,indeed,ZOHO
new,CRM Executive,RADHA SMELTERS,"Hyderabad, Telangana",2020-01-11,"Location: Hyderabad
Qualification: Graduate in any Stream
Openings: 1
Experience: Minimum 2 Years of experience in related field
Job Description: Good Command in English, Tech Savvy, strong CRM knowledge and experience in Zoho will be an advantage
Duties and Responsibilities:
Planning and delivering CRM strategies across the organisation with a view to retaining existing customers.
Making sure the customer database is correctly segmented for targeted marketing activities
Coordinating with Zoho Consultant and Deciding on a final CRM structure and architecture that will work seamlessly across the business and capture crucial information along the sales funnel
Ensure that the CRM strategy works well for every aspect of the business.
Coming up with creative ideas for the changes we can make in CRM structure to make it more user friendly.
Send Resume/CV to careers@radhatmt.com",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=77ffbf8210776b05,77ffbf8210776b05,indeed,ZOHO
new,Salesforce Consultant,Screen Magic Mobile Media Pvt. Ltd.,"Pune, Maharashtra",2020-01-11,"This position is to speed up resolution of Technical Customer queries which needs more expertise and time and It should save time of development team.

Skills required :
Good Experience in Salesforce development and iteracting with the customers.

Should possess good knowledge of past, current and in-development features of the product

Good problem solving skills

Good writing and verbal communication skills

Good research skills

Good training/presentation skills

Database knowledge

Log Monitoring - Log file reading and filtering

Debugging Skills

Key responsibilities :
Train Customer Success - Level 1 team on new features and measure the quality.

Testing/Trial/UAT of in-house product with New releases of SFDC and training QA on the same.

Resolve issues escalated by Level 1 team according to the SLA defined.

Keep in touch with latest product features of SFDC or any other external integrated systems such as vendors, zoho, oracle etc. Identify impacting feature forward to product team

Do POCs on new ideas

Try out new features of external systems.

Carry out customizations requirement of in-house products - Prepare SRS, Quotes, SDDs. Work with QAs to test.

Be Single point of contact for Level 1 support and tech/product team.

Filing cases with Salesforce team and work with them to resolve cases.

Change set deployment in Sandox/Production org

See Logs and send it to Dev Team

Contribute in setting automation testing for products

Manage external outsourcing vendor for customization or Do customization on Own

Vendor Managment and Solving issues

9ZynDi",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=df6ede4d3e274ad7,df6ede4d3e274ad7,indeed,ZOHO
new,WordPress Developer,innofied,"Kolkata, West Bengal",2020-01-11,"WordPress Developer
Job Id TC-DV-300819-001
Experience 3 - 4 years
Job Location Kolkata, Pune
Education Any Graduate
Marks 60% throughout (preferable)
Salary Upto 4 Lacs
Job Description:
Good understanding of front-end technologies, including HTML5, CSS3, JavaScript, jQuery.
Ability to hand-code WordPress sites that are well structured, clean, and semantic.
Proficient understanding of code versioning tools (such as Git, SVN).
Must have experience in creating a multilingual site on WordPress.
Proficient understanding of how to set up a new theme.
Capability to add and use your own custom post type.
Hands-on experience in creating plugins that should also use the hooks in WordPress.
Should have hands-on integration experience with one or more third party services like payment gateways, live chat, Google APIs, Etsy, Shopify, Zoho leads, Mailchimp etc.
For job application, send your resume to career@innofied.com",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=2c3fab466532c9d6,2c3fab466532c9d6,indeed,ZOHO
new,Inside Sales Lead / Senior Inside Sales Executive,HoloPundits,"Chennai, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-11,"Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Experience working with in any of the following technology platforms
Augmented Reality/Virtual Reality, Web / Mobile Apps, Data Analytics & Business Intelligence, Cloud Technologies
Source new sales opportunities through inbound lead follow-up and outbound cold calls and emails
Building effective relationships with customers
Support field-based Sales team members
Gain a thorough understanding of the customers' business and the industry in which they compete
Route qualified opportunities to the appropriate sales executives for further development and closure
Achieve quarterly quotas
Research accounts, identify key players and generate interest
Maintain and expand your database of prospects within your assigned territory
Support sales campaigns for onsite sales team
Manage client relationship through all phases of the sales cycle
Track record of over-achieving quota
Willing to work on additional tasks and responsibilities that will contribute towards team, department and company goals.
Strong phone presence and experience dialing dozens of calls per day
Analytical skill set, strong presentation skills, ability to interact with any level within an organization
Experience working with any CRM, Sales Intelligence, Campaigning Tools
Excellent verbal and written communications skills
Strong listening and presentation skills
Ability to multi-task, prioritise, and manage time effectively
Extensive knowledge of Sales and Marketing
Education and/or Work Experience Requirements:
Educational qualification: Graduate / Postgraduate / MBA, as MBAs they drive more into future rather than working on current
Minimum 5 years experience
Excellent verbal and written communication skills, including ability to effectively communicate with internal and external consultants
Excellent computer proficiency (MS Office  Word, Excel and Outlook)
Must be able to work under pressure and meet deadlines, while maintaining a positive attitude and providing exemplary customer service
Ability to work independently and to carry out assignments to completion within parameters of instructions given, prescribed routines, and standard accepted practices
Experience with Tools like, DiscoverOrg, Rainking, Tellwise, Hubspot, Salesforce or Zoho is a plus",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=f7c8779c96488147,f7c8779c96488147,indeed,ZOHO
new,Business Development Professional,Mangalam Information Technologies,"Ahmedabad, Gujarat",2020-01-11,"Job Location : Ahmedabad, Gujarat

Job Description:
Looking for PASSIONATE, AMBITIOUS and RESULT Oriented Business Development Professionals. They should be self-driven, Result oriented having Founders Mentality. Rewards would be BEST IN THE INDUSTRY.
We are strengthening Business Development team for IT Services which is focused on Salesforce, PHP, Dot Net and other IT development services for the global clients.
Candidate should have insight of IT & ITES outsourcing business for the overseas B2B and B2C clients in one or more of the following technologies/ services:
Business Development Work Experience :
CRMs likeSalesforce, Hubspot, ZOHO, MS Dynamix etc.
Application Development of Windows/IOS/Android
Knowledge of Popular Web Technologies used in Web Design & Web Application Development
Should be well versed with the digital marketing

Roles and Responsibilities:
Researching organizations and individuals to identify new leads and potential new markets
Use tools like Linkedin Sales Navigator and other Data Mining techniques
Build and nurture contacts with potential clients
Communicate with the potential leads through calls, emails, LinkedIn and other media
Support in writing new business proposals and basic content writing required for marketing material and website enhancement
Write relevant post in Linkedin, blogs, company websites which draws the attention of the clients
Maintain knowledge of all product and service offerings of the company
Arrange meetings for senior management with prospective clients
Use market place like Upwork for bidding
Attending conferences, meetings, and industry events
Skills:
Excellent verbal & written communication and negotiation skills
Excellent Computer proficiency is MUST in MS EXCEL, WORD , PWERPOINT, Web Browsers , Google search techniques and data mining
Analytical and presentation skills
Ideally a good team player as well as individual achiever
Qualification:
BE/BTech, MBA, MCA

Experience:
Candidate should have 2 to 7 years experience of Business Development in IT/ITEs Small and Medium companies which serving global clients. Exceptional candidates may be relaxed for the qualification criteria.
Salary is not a constraint for Result Oriented candidates
Interested candidates may Walk-in between 10:00 AM - 07:00 PM or send their resume at: jobs@mangalaminfotech.com",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=3009ffef71043e0d,3009ffef71043e0d,indeed,ZOHO
new,Experienced WordPress Developer,MountC0de Technology,"Mohali, Punjab",2020-02-06,"Job SummaryWe are looking for an outstanding WordPress Developer to be responsible for the coding, innovative design and layout of our website.Must have knowledge of wordpress,PHP,MYSQL,HTML,CSS,JavaScript, jQuery, XML, JSON, AJAX etc.Responsibilities and Duties-: - Good Knowledge of HTML,CSS, Bootstrap,Javascript.- Must have strong knowledge in Wordpress, Shopify, Squarespace, Zoho CRM.- Must have strong knowledge in Codeigniter, Core PHP and PHP(MVC) and API.- Logically sound and hard working.Qualifications and Skills-: *Wordpress*Theme Customisation*Plugin Customisation*PHP*MY SQL*Woocommerce*Payment integrationExperience: Wordpress: 1 year (Preferred)PHP: 1 year (Preferred)Benefits : -Good Salary PackageHealthy & Safe Work EnvironmentJob Type: - Full-timeContact :  94643-29006,01724081195Address :  Mountcode Technology, E-91, Ground Floor, Industrial Area, Phase 8, Mohali(PUNJAB)Job Type: Full-time",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=d60fff6c906126d9,d60fff6c906126d9,indeed,ZOHO
new,Business Developer (BDE / BDM),The One Technologies,"Ahmedabad, Gujarat",2020-01-11,"Must have strong experience working with any CRM (like Zoho CRM)
Experience in the IT outsourcing industry is a must
A good communication skill in English is a must
Emailing & Calling to Prospects
Lead Generation, Client Retention & achieving targets
Good Team Player
To apply for any of the below position, email your updated CV to career@theonetechnologies.com",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=7cfc1b815ad3d958,7cfc1b815ad3d958,indeed,ZOHO
new,Business Development Manager,BIZGO,India,2020-01-11,"Job Description:

We are seeking a dynamic and proactive Business Development Manager to increase revenue, market share and profitability within product space. You will be responsible for preparing and implementing business plans in support of achieving product line objectives. You will work directly with sales, marketing, channel partners and customers to expand our presence in the market.

Responsibilities:

Manage all related strategic activities within the assigned territory  develop and implement business plans to achieve key revenue, share and profit goals. This includes preparing budgets, quotes and analysing costs of custom products.
Promote BIZGO products and solutions throughout the assigned territory, including but not limited to product seminars, sales and distribution training, and customer presentations. Assist in product releases and development of marketing collateral as required.
Identify all product applications and opportunities that BIZGO has to offer in the assigned territory. Conduct opportunity assessment to identify the most promising programmes and ensure optimal return on resources. Build a pipeline of programmes and capitalise on opportunities to ensure revenue and profit growth.
Keep the business unit informed of trends, opportunities and needs within the assigned territory and relevant markets. Research and analyse competitive position, market trends and technological needs of the assigned territory.
Build strong relationships with internal and external stakeholders to promote new and existing products. Coordinate with other areas of the organisation to provide technical, operational and service support.
Identify new product opportunities and support the development of these products.
Maintain a high level of product, industry and market knowledge.
Prepare reports and track the progress of performance goals, forecast business demand, identify new opportunities and implement programmes. Update and maintain current portfolio management system.

Requirements:

Bachelors degree, preferably in Accounting, Marketing or a business-related discipline
7+ years sales/marketing/business development experience in SaaS software product (experience in SME accounting product would be an advantage)
Understand basic accounting principles
Strong leadership and communication skills
Bilingual in English and Hindi
Excellent organisational skills to anticipate, plan, prioritise and self-monitor workload
Able to convey business and technical details to a broad range of audience
Strong team work and interpersonal skills to effectively work with co-workers and external parties
Self-motivated and goal oriented
Knowledge or experience with competitive products would be a bonus (SAP B1, Microsoft Dynamics NAV, Tally, QuickBooks Online, Zoho, etc.)
Familiar with SaaS infrastructure, SLAs, pricing and contracts
Willing to travel

Send your application to careers@bizgo.com stating your current and expected salary and notice period.

BIZGO is committed to equal employment opportunity for applicants and employees. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, disability or age.",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=d1bf0a7930317060,d1bf0a7930317060,indeed,ZOHO
new,Sr. Executive : Enterprise Sales,Spectra Technovision India Pvt. Ltd,"Mumbai, Maharashtra",2020-01-11,"Job SummaryGreetings for the day!We have got an opening for Enterprise Sales Executive in our organization. I am sending you the job details & company details. If you are interested for the below job opening, kindly revert with your convenient time to discuss about the job opportunity.Position:  Sr. Executive - Enterprise SalesJob Location :  Ahmedabad / MumbaiResponsibilities and Duties*Job description**: ***Lead Generation **Generate Leads from assigned Industry / Location segment.Use various campaign methods i.e. Mailing, Cold calling, exhibitions and seminars, forums and databases etc.Identify Key decision makers, Interact with CXOs / various functional heads.Represent the company and solutions to key decision makers, make presentations, case studies and related documents.Analyze client pain areas, size up requirement and propose a solution.2. *Pre-Sales Consultation *Understand Client requirements.Understand key pain areas.Design a solution based on the selected hardware platform / technology.Find out Software customization requirement, document them, and coordinate with development team to prepare feasibility report.Get a sign off from the client on agreed upon scope of customizations.Get a sign off from the client on overall scope of project.**Sales Activities  Prepare commercial quotes / bids.Prepare timelines for the proposed projects taking into consideration the need of client on timelines. Establish an agreement with client on timelines.Carry out commercial negotiations with client representative.Strategize pricing and negotiation policies based on client, requirement and competition.Negotiate commercial terms with client representative.Based on agreed upon pricing and terms, ensure timely receipt of orders.**Post Sales Activities  Due diligence of the order received.Prepare requisition for arrangement of materials according to agreed upon timelines. Follow up for timely delivery.Prepare internal order for customization. Follow up for timely delivery.Assist Payments team for timely collection of advances (if any) / payments as per the milestones agreed upon with the client.Assist Support team if required for execution of project as per agreed upon scope.**Marketing  Assist Marketing team on competition study.Assist in collecting client feedback / testimonials.Share inputs on marketing materials.Participate in various marketing campaigns.**CRM & Data management  Manage all open leads / potentials on ZOHO CRM.Keep all the records updated.Maintain all versions of BoQ, quotations and other project related document of each client handled.Report periodically on progress of the current cases.Achieve sales targets as assigned.**Job Type: Full-timeExperience:Sales: 1 year (Preferred)work: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 2 years (Preferred)Education:Secondary(10th Pass) (Preferred)",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=32d34640424cffe3,32d34640424cffe3,indeed,ZOHO
new,Sr. Laravel Developer,innofied,"Kolkata, West Bengal",2020-01-11,"Sr. Laravel Developer
Job Id TC-DV-270619-002
Experience 4  10 years
Job Location Kolkata/Pune
Academics B.Tech / M.Tech / BCA / MCA / B.Sc (Computer Sc.)
Marks 60% throughout (preferable)
Salary As per Industry Standard
Requirements:
Backend Rest API development and project experience with Laravel framework.
Strong programming skills in PHP with Object oriented programing skills.
Good conception in Linux, Apache, and databases SQL and No-SQL.
Must have experience in version control software such as GIT.
Skilled in writing documented code.
Good analytical and logical skills.
Good communication skills in English (both written and verbal).
Job Responsibilities:
Understand technical specifications and follow best practices.
Write clean, well designed codes, using MVC/MVP/MVVM etc and design patterns.
Contribute to all phases of development cycle.
Develop and deploy new features to existing projects.
Passion for best design and coding practices and a desire to develop new bold ideas.
Lead a team of developers and assign work among team members equally to meet deadlines.
Training team members to enhance their skills for meeting companys objectives.
Research on new architecture pattern and implement those. Stay up-to-date on emerging technologies.
Contribute to the continuous improvement of the development process.
Good To have
Experience in developing Clean Architecture and TDD approach.
Experience in building complex application.
Payment gateway integration like stripe , paypal etc.
Experience MQTT or any other protocol for real time communication.
Experience in continuous integration with Docker.
Experience in various AWS services like EC2, S3, Cloudfront , Load balancing etc.
Experience in Oauth protocol.
Experience in various third party service integrations like Twillio , Salesforce, ZOHO etc.
Your Gain
You will be working with dynamic and dedicated team in various complex projects and will get guidance from seniors regarding scalable architecture.
For job application, send your resume to career@innofied.com",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=9528f8865eaf79d1,9528f8865eaf79d1,indeed,ZOHO
new,PHP Developer (1+ Years),MountC0de Technology,"Mohali, Punjab",2020-01-31,"Job SummaryMin. 1+ Years of experience in developing website using PHP, MVC, FRAMEWORKS, MySQL, HTML, and JavaScript, Wordpress,Shopify, Squarespace, Zoho CRM. CSS,Keep to learn and work on other new technologies.Excellent verbal and written communication skills.Responsibilities and Duties-: - Good Knowledge of HTML,CSS, Bootstrap, Javascript.- Must have strong knowledge in Wordpress, Shopify, Squarespace, Zoho CRM.- Must have strong knowledge in Codeigniter, Core PHP and PHP(MVC) and API.- Logically sound and hard working.Qualifications and Skills-: -BE ( IT, EEE, ECE, COMPUTER SCIENCE ) & interested Graduates can also apply-Should have good knowledge and understanding of the Software Development Life Cycle-If You have below skills then, you can also apply:1. Web Development2. Web Design3. PHP Language4. JQuery and JavaScript5. CSS And HTMLBenefits-: Best salary Structure5 days workingJob Types-:  Full-time,Experience-: software development: 1 year (Preferred)php: - 1 year (Required)total work: - 1 year (Required)Contact details: -Contact No.: - 94643-29006, 01724081195Address: - Plot No: E-91, Ground Floor, Phase 8, Industrial Area, Mohali, PunjabJob Type:  Full-timeJob Type: Full-time",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=63e13c81af2cdb42,63e13c81af2cdb42,indeed,ZOHO
new,Business Development Manager,Arcedior Pvt Ltd.,"Ahmedabad, Gujarat",2020-01-11,"Job Summary:

We are looking for an enthusiastic Business Development Executive to contribute in generating sales for our company. You will be responsible for closing sales deals over the phone and maintaining good customer relationships.
An effective Business Development Executive must be an excellent communicator and have superior people skills. They must be comfortable presenting products or services over the phone.
The goal is to help the company grow by bringing in customers and developing business.

Responsibilities and Duties

Contact potential or existing customers to inform them about a product or services
Answer questions about Services or the company
Ask questions to understand customer requirements and close sales
Direct prospects to the field sales team when needed
Enter and update customer information in the database
Handle grievances to preserve the companys reputation
Keep records of calls and sales and note useful information
Required Experience, Skills and Qualifications

Candidate must have excellent communication skills in English
Should have 2 to 4 years of B2B outbound calling experience or should be willing to make calls to customers/Clients directly and get an appointment or setup an appointment for Business Development Team.
Should have good internet knowledge for research
Should have at least 2-4 years of co-ordination experience
Ability to learn about services and describe/explain them to prospects
Cool-tempered and able to handle rejection


Job Overview
We are looking for a strategically efficient and doting Business Development Manager. Your role is to ensure that profitability ratio increases by implementing new strategies for business and modifying the existing ones according to the circumstances. You are expected to develop good relations with our partners and customers. You should be well aware of the new marketing methods and trends and provide best solutions for the growth of our company.
If you think you are capable of this job and want to be the part of our team then do send in your application for this role.

Responsibilities
Determine potential business growth opportunities.
Develop good relationship with the customers and partners.
Implement new business development strategies to maximise profit and sales.
Determine new investment opportunities through market research and trends.
Provide customer satisfaction through negotiation.
Implement operational changes with proper planning and strategy.
Understand the need and preference of the customer and ensure that they are fulfilled.
Meeting the customers and brief them with the policies and procedures of the company.
Train and mentor the staff whenever required.
Discuss the new strategies and policies with other concerned departments.
Develop new business strategies according to the law and legal procedures.
Requirements
Bachelor in Business Administration, Marketing or relevant field.
5 years experience of working as a Business Development Manager or Sales Manager.
Excellent communication skills.
Outstanding leadership skills
Good Project Management and Organisational Skills.
Proficient in MS Office and CRM softwares like Zoho, Base CRM, etc.
Excellent Time Management skills.",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=f24808a41af05cbc,f24808a41af05cbc,indeed,ZOHO
new,CIEL/SEL/2489: Billing System Analyst,CIEL HR Services,"Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-01-11,"Job Description -

Seeking a candidate for the Billing Systems Analyst role to design solutions and deliver initiatives related to subscription billing systems and e-commerce platforms. Qualified candidate must have a good background in financial systems/Rev Rec/Billing Areas.

Desired Skills and Experience
Key requirements
:Technical Skills
Total 6+ years of hands-on experience in IT / enterprise applicationsPrior experience of subscription billing(Zuora, Aria, Braintree,chargebee,chargify,zoho,stripe )or ecommerce applications (Demandware etc.) will be a big plus

4-5 Years of experience in business analysis3-5 years of hand-on experience with Revenue Recognition/Billing systemsStrong understanding of general business processes, financial process and best practicesAwareness of web, database, and object oriented software technologiesGood project management skills in order to organize and implement business process solutions; ability to track and document project deliverables.Experience in working for a company of similar business model or market SegmentExperience in hands on design, prototyping, development, configurations, testing and other implementation activities

Soft Skills
Strong Technical background, Analytical, and Problem-solving skills are requiredExcellent written and verbal communication skills.Ability to work collaboratively within a team environment of cross functional and cross vendor teams, and deliver to aggressive timelinesAbility to adapt and learn new technology platforms, conduct POC and guide solution designAble to manage multiple activities across multiple projects simultaneously

Responsibilities
: Primary role will include hands-on support for subscription billing systems (Aria System)
Manage configuration and setup of subscription billing systems and ecommerce platform.Work with internal/external vendor for development billing applications and/or mobile applicationsWork closely with product managers, software engineering teams and QA teams on end-to-end flow development and testingAct as solution architect for multiple initiatives and program related to enhancing subscriptions sales and other business initiativesDesign, test and support integrations with Tax systems, ERP, Data Warehouse and reporting systems.Build strong relationships with internal customers, peers, and business stakeholdersProvide support to finance and other business teams for quarterly and yearly financial close cycle and reporting.Partner with Internal Control and Audit function to establish, test and document key application controls and ensure compliance.",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=fb243a5ac6a576d3,fb243a5ac6a576d3,indeed,ZOHO
new,Business Development Executive,eTechno Lab,"Pune, Maharashtra",2020-01-11,"eTechno Lab Pvt. Ltd., an extreme technology company that had been growing 100% year to year, in terms of both employee count and year end revenue, looking for hands on Business Development Executive for its inside sales department for its operations in India and US locations.

Sounds exciting? Please read the job criteria below and drop us an email at hr@etechnolab.com.
QUALIFICATION
7-8 Years
Should have bachelors or master degree in any stream.
LOCATION: eTechnolab, Pune
TYPE : Full Time
SKILLS REQUIRED:
Must possess strong logical and analytical bent of mind.
Must have strong common sense.
Computer literacy is a MUST.
Exposure to some CRM systems (SalesForce OR Zoho) is desirable.
Identifies trendsetter ideas by researching industry and related events, publications, and .
announcements; tracking individual contributors and their accomplishments.
Screens potential business deals by analyzing market strategies, deal requirements, potential,
Develops negotiating strategies and positions by studying integration of new venture with company strategies and operations; examining risks and potentials; estimating partners needs and goals.",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=b192b7ccd24ef802,b192b7ccd24ef802,indeed,ZOHO
new,Sales Executive,ShepHertz,"Gurgaon, Haryana",2020-01-11,"Job Description:
The Demand Generation Specialist/Executive will be responsible for reaching out to inbound leads for the companys line of products. Responsible for creating qualified leads with a set criteria and transition them to Sales Manager for closure. Experience with solution selling in the software space is highly desirable. We are looking for someone who has an ability to over achieve targets and set new benchmarks for others.
Responsibilities:
Make B2B telephone calls to inbound prospects, and also answer to inbound queries
Interacting with decision-makers and build strong strategic relationships
Prospecting, lead qualification and requirement gathering
Develop sales-ready opportunities by qualifying accounts
Execute effective campaigns to maximize coverage (via Email and Calls)
Follow-up on Marketing-generated leads in order to qualify them in an efficient manner
Ensure high translation of lead to revenue
Communicating the value propositions for the customer
Possess forecasting accuracy, along with skills for customer and opportunity management
Adopt Consultative Selling approach
Possess skills Lead Management and Follow Ups
Skill Set:
MBA with minimum of 1-3 years of relevant experience (Global Market  IT Sales experience preferred)
Familiarity with Customer Relationship Management Software (such as SalesForce / Zoho / Vtiger)
Be proactive, friendly and well spoken
Demonstrate effective time management and organization skills
Possess a natural ability to network and build lasting business relationships
Display excellent written and verbal communication skills
Be able to communicate effectively with high level decision makers over the telephone and mail
Self-starter/can do attitude
Have a working knowledge of the industry and relevant marketplace
Learn to establish accurate plans for forecasts, prioritize effort",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=4aada82dcf6f6110,4aada82dcf6f6110,indeed,ZOHO
new,Senior Data Analyst,Builder.ai - What would you Build?,"Gurgaon, Haryana",2020-01-14,"Why we need this role

We are looking for a Senior Data Insights Analyst to join our newly established and fast-paced Growth team at a stage where you can really make a difference. We plan to run hundreds of paid social and paid campaigns globally as well as to increase our in-product conversion and k factor and we need someone to analyse data and provide actionable insights for the entire business.
Why you should join
This is an exciting opportunity to join a Growth team in its early stage - therefore we are looking for someone who thrives in a fast paced environment and is proactive and thinks outside the box. The Growth team is data-driven and results focused. We are seeking a talented professional who thrives at the intersection of data, product and performance marketing. This is an amazing opportunity for someone to dive into data sets and drive business decisions based on insights and help the business grow. You will have the chance to work across all departments, supporting the constant improvement of our product and overall business growth, as well as automating data pipelines and integrations.
First Six Month Deliverables / OKRs
Establish A/B testing strategy
Insights into lead re-/targeting
Correct & reliable reporting
Requirements
Advanced SQL and Tableau skills
Experience in A/B and multivariate testing
Have working experience with some of the following: Adstage, Google Ads, Facebook / Instagram Ads, LinkedIn Ads, Zoho/Hubspot, Salesforce
Working experience with 3rd-party tracking vendors and integrating with social platforms.
You will have the ability to interpret complex data sets and come up with actionable recommendations
Good technical and analytical communication skills
Commercially minded and always thinking of the customers' current and future needs
You live and breathe data, and can use it to help teams make the right decisions
Are excited by technology and will enjoy working in the fast pace of a start-up.
Are passionate about loosely held values and ideas. We want someone who has experience but is not blinded by the path already taken.
Benefits
Performance-based bonuses and stock options
Generous vacation and time off benefits including paid holidays
Generally flexible working hours
A collaborative culture where unconventional thinkers come together to solve interesting problems and having fun while doing it
Mission-driven company that is making the world a better place
Healthcare package",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=2cdecd0fb053cfbc,2cdecd0fb053cfbc,indeed,ZOHO
new,Web Developer (PHP),MountC0de Technology,"Mohali, Punjab",2020-02-04,"Job SummaryNeed 1 year to 3 years experienced candidate in PHPRequired Experience, Skills and Qualifications-: - Good Knowledge of HTML,CSS, Bootstrap, Javascript.- Must have strong knowledge in Wordpress, Shopify, Squarespace, Zoho CRM.- Must have strong knowledge in Codeigniter, Core PHP and PHP(MVC) and API.- Logically sound and hard working.- Strong experience in PHP based development. Preferred candidates will have experience in WooCommerce related API's.Required Experience and Qualifications-: Experience- 1 year to 3 yearsQualification - Any Bachelor degreeBenefits: 5 days workingGood Salary PackageJob Type:  Full-timeContact details: Contact No.:  94643-29006 ,01724081195Address:  Plot No: E-91, Ground Floor, Phase 8, Industrial Area, Mohali, PunjabJob Type: Full-time",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=858292428b0f6c2f,858292428b0f6c2f,indeed,ZOHO
new,Sales - BRM - SAP/Oracle/ AI & ML/Salesforce,Prowess Enterprise (I) Pvt Ltd,"Hyderabad, Telangana",2020-01-24,"Job SummaryThe primary purpose of the Business Relationship Manager is to achieve their overall revenue goal. In order to achieve this goal, the Senior Solution Sales Executive must create a complete territory business plan that generates at least 3x their quota in pipeline opportunity. The Senior Solution Sales Executive is responsible to identify and qualify opportunities, develop and drive strategy. The Senior Solution Sales Executive will develop an opportunity plan containing the value proposition for all technologies like SAP, Oracle Applications, Artificial & Business Intelligence, Blockchain, Salesforce etc targeted line of business solutions and services to potential customers & prospects across APAC region. It is expected that the Senior Solution Sales Executive be adept at creating and nurturing executive relationships on their own while positioning the technology teams.Responsibilities and DutiesWorks with the Management and team to develop and execute programs to drive pipeline & close deals.Works to uncover and run sales cycle based opportunities.Leads efforts to establish, develop, and expand market share and revenue attainment with existing and prospect clients.Works to attain various sales objectives related to securing new business opportunities.Develops sales best practices securing repeatable and expansive opportunities across APAC region.Key SkillsSAP applications: HANA, ECC, SuccessFactors, Concur, BI/BOBJ/SAC, MII, MDG, Ariba, Hybris etc. AI/BI and Blockchain, IoT Sales - BI/BOBJ, Tableau, Power BI, Micro strategy, Blockchain supply chain and financial trade. Microsoft Technologies: Azure, Microsoft Dynamics, Web & Mobile Applications. Cloud - Salesforce, Zoho, Microsoft Dynamics, Oracle CPQ, AWSRequired Experience and Qualifications5+ years of experience selling business software and/or IT solutionsBachelor's degree in related fields (Business / Engineering or Technology)Experience selling to CXOs and top management.Proven track record in target achievementCompletion of Sales Methodology training preferredCommunication skillsTeamwork & CollaborationPresentation skillsSales Product Solution KnowledgeOpen to work in any of the mentioned locations - Delhi/NCR, Pune, Bangalore, Visakhapatnam, Hyderabad, Mumbai and ChennaiJob Type: Full-timeExperience:Selling business software and/or IT solutions: 5 years (Preferred)Business Development: 5 years (Preferred)Sales Experience:Account Management (Required)Lead Generation (Required)Benefits:Health insuranceProvident fund (PF)Paid leaves / Leave encashmentPhone / Internet reimbursementSales role:AcquisitionRetentionTravel requirements:Yes - ~75%Industry:Software Development",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=3ff2eb3b69c52bd0,3ff2eb3b69c52bd0,indeed,ZOHO
new,Accountant & Office Administrator,KOVAI DIGITECH,"Coimbatore, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-11,"Job SummaryAccountant for projects based company dealing with Automation, security and surveillance products.Responsibilities and DutiesBilling, accounting, collection followup, work with auditor for GST filing and yearly returnsRequired Experience, Skills and QualificationsExperience in accounts. Good system knowledge of excel and Tally or similar ERPZoho Books experience is an added advantageBenefitsHealth insurance, training in Zoho books. Opportunity to handle end to end accounting cycle and gain experience in modern erp operationsJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 8,000.00 to 15,000.00 /monthExperience:Accounting: 1 year (Required)work: 2 years (Required)Education:Bachelor's (Required)Location:Coimbatore, Tamil Nadu (Preferred)Benefits:Health insuranceTravel allowanceIndustry:Installation & Maintenance",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=c73b9aff2601d24f,c73b9aff2601d24f,indeed,ZOHO
new,Lead Consultant,gosonix,Karnataka,2020-01-11,"Job Description

For the end client:

Develop understanding and knowledge of clients business end to end
Analyze clients existing practices and make recommendations for improvements
Conduct market research specific to the clients industry
Research into the company, its financials, the competition etc
Prepare a GTM for the client for a new product, new market across sales, marketing, account management, channel management including:
Sales approachSales modelRecommended organizational structure and job description
Formulate and implement end to end sales process (including tools and collaterals)
Monitor and review progress of the recommended GTM for the client
Understand product/service benefits and prepare strategies to articulate the message for the target audience
Enable clients' team to prospect, pitch & close sales; Pipeline Management
Provide training to the existing sales team and the newly hired team as and when needed
Analyze customer buying trends and provide forecasts sales plan for new markets and trends
Forecast and target setting for annual, quarterly and monthly revenue streams. Ensure the team owns and runs this
Ability to gather and articulate competitive intelligence on product/service offerings of the client
For gosonix:
Maintain healthy pipeline of prospects for gosonix
Ensure that the end client is satisfied with delivery
Responsible for P&L of the account being handled
Continuous improvements to the current processes and repository of tools available with gosonix
Prospect, pitch & close sales; Pipeline Management
Train and onboard new hires in the team
Gather market and customer information
Understand customer objections and address them  technical, legal and financial
Cross-sell and upsell to new & existing customers
Requirements:
PG from premier institutions in India or Abroad
Sales experience in a Product / Technology firm or Consulting firm
Ability to do market analysis, competition analysis through both primary and secondary research
Experience in opportunity qualification, account management, account development, and working with sales targets
Experience in selling software solutions to large enterprises
Experience in mapping and engaging decision makers at the enterprise level
Ability to work through sales cycles of different enterprises
Excellent verbal & presentation skills along with strong written communication skills
Experience with CRM tools like ZOHO / Salesforce / Sugar etc
Experience in handling a sales team
Good to have:
Prior experience in Sales & Strategy consulting
MBA with a specialization in sales is an added advantage
Why gosonix?

Gosonix is a Bangalore based startup specializing in GTM strategies for high growth startups which have raised VC funding from the likes of Accel Partners, Sequoia etc. We love working with startups, learning new business models and getting our hands dirty in taking the business to the next level on revenues and performance.

Sales function forms the core of an organizations growth and success. We strive towards bringing a scientific approach to the art of selling. We are a small team of consultants with rich experience in delivering sales across the globe and in executing GTM strategies for organizations.
forward your resume at careers@gosonix.com.",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=14343420683fec97,14343420683fec97,indeed,ZOHO
new,Cost Accountant,CDET Explosive Industries Pvt Ltd,"Nagpur, Maharashtra",2020-01-11,"We are looking for a Cost Accountant to join our accounting department. Youll be responsible for performing cost analyses and preparing budget reports. You should possess excellent analytical skills along with the ability to combine different data and calculate profit margins. Our ideal candidate should be able to create detailed reports that present cost-effective solutions for our company. Ultimately, you should build updated databases and manage cost information to maximize profitability for our company.ResponsibilitiesCollect cost information and maintain an expenses databaseConstruct data accumulation systemsDetermine fixed costs (e.g. salaries, rent and insurance)Plan and record variable costs (e.g. purchases of raw material and operations costs)Review standard and actual costs for inaccuraciesPrepare budgeting reports (for the company and for each department)Analyze and report profit marginsPrepare (monthly, quarterly and annual) cost forecastsAssisting in month-end and year-end closingIdentify and recommend cost-effective solutionsSkillsProven work experience as a Cost Accountant, Cost Analyst, Accountant or similar roleThorough knowledge of accounting proceduresIn-depth understanding of Generally Accepted Accounting Principles (GAAP)Experience with accounting software, like FreshBooks and ZohoComputer literacy, MS Excel in particular (familiarity with VLOOKUPs and pivot tables)Excellent analytical skills with an attention to detailStrong time management skillsIntegrity, with an ability to handle confidential informationJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 25,000.00 to 35,000.00 /monthExperience:total work: 5 years (Required)Production costing: 3 years (Preferred)Education:Master's (Preferred)Licence:CMA (Required)Language:English, Hindi & Marathi (Preferred)Benefits:Provident fund (PF)Paid leaves / Leave encashmentTravel allowanceIndustry:Chemical EngineeringJob Duties:Monitoring company accounts and conducting quarterly reviewsExpense reportsCost reduction proposalsBudgetsPresenting budgets and reports to upper managementAdditional Duties:RecordkeepingAccount reconciliationData entry",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=fd08434880aadd23,fd08434880aadd23,indeed,ZOHO
new,Enterprise Sales: Business Development Associate,FloatIQ,"Gurgaon, Haryana",2020-01-11,"The Business Development Associate role is an instrumental component to FloatIQ's Enterprise Sales efforts to expand our current customer base. The primary objective of this role is to identify prospective clients while also partnering with our Managing Directors in driving the initial stages of our sales cycle within assigned industry verticals. The Business Development Associate will be responsible for prospecting new clients, assisting in the creation and execution of account and territory plans and supporting Enterprise Marketing campaigns and lead qualification activities. Collaboration with cross-functional teams (Sales, Sales Operations, Marketing and other organizations) is critical.
Job Duties:
Conduct call campaigns and set meetings with key stakeholders in Finance, Treasury, Procurement, Accounting, Shared Services and IT organizations of our target customers.
Assist the Sales Managing Directors in the creation and execution of their account and territory plans.
Support our strategic and ongoing marketing awareness campaigns and drive prospect participation to internal and external events & webinars.
Qualify inbound marketing leads.
Aid the assigned Sales Managing Directors to accelerate the initial stages of our sales cycle.
Assist with other sales support functions such as account and industry research, sales presentations, analysis and more.
Basic Qualifications:
2 to 3+ years of inside sales or business development experience in a finance, technology or relevant industry with strong selling and communication skills (written and verbal).
Individuals need to be confident, self-starter, competitive and enthusiastic with a strong sense of self-discipline, drive and urgency.
Ability to quickly learn, adapt and become a go-to resource on a dynamic team.
Must be very strong in managing multiple priorities.
 Experience in utilizing sales methodologies, metrics, processes and tools. Experience with Zoho Customer Relationship Management (CRM) software is a plus.
Proficiency in Microsoft suite (especially Outlook, Excel and PowerPoint).
Bachelor's degree in a business or technology-related field or commensurate experience.
Salary & Benefits:
This is a unique opportunity to join one of the fastest growing young financial technology companies and build something from the ground up. The position includes an excellent compensation package, equity ownership and more.",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=7392b104cfc316d8,7392b104cfc316d8,indeed,ZOHO
new,Manager - IT Sales,the it man,"Chennai, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-24,"Key Responsibilities:- Acquire in depth knowledge of our services.- Enhance & build the existing pipeline.- Lead generation & Follow-up.- Deliver presentations, proposals and demonstrations.- Qualify and manage opportunities including writing proposals and responding to queries.- Identify key buying influencers within these prospects.- Monitor and report on all activities and pipelines.- Maintain excellent customer satisfaction through effective account management.Candidate Profile:- Minimum 4-6 years sales/business development experience in the IT Sales segment.- Experience in CRM & ERP applications at a Corporate/Enterprise level- Experience in SaaS/Cloud Services/IT-Infrastructure/Data Center is an added advantage- Ability to influence decision makers at all levels- Excellent negotiation and communication skills, both oral and written- Self-motivated and target driven- Should be prepared to travelTechnical Experience:- Proficient in O365 (Word, Excel, Powerpoint, Outlook)- Experience in ZOHO & Sharepoint is an added advantage- Experience with CRM Software functioning & Cloud Services is preferredRole Sales/Business Development ManagerIndustry Type IT-Hardware & NetworkingFunctional Area Sales, Retail, Business DevelopmentEmployment Type Full Time, PermanentRole Category Retail SalesEducationUG : Any Graduate in Any SpecializationPG : Post Graduation Not RequiredDoctorate : Doctorate Not RequiredJob Type: Full-time",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=ffed9fca4acda3fa,ffed9fca4acda3fa,indeed,ZOHO
new,Business Development - Client Relations,StarClinch,"New Delhi, Delhi",2020-01-30,"Company Description

Are you tempted by the excitement of start-ups? StarClinch offers the thrill of working with a young team, the ability to make an immediate impact and the opportunity to work with a game-changing product that is disrupting the Live Entertainment Business forever. In simple words, StarClinch is Indias Largest Artist Booking and Discovery Platform. We are a young motivated team focused on delivering our best. We are looking for Self Directed and Empathetic Business Developers to join our team and be a part of the wonderful journey.

Job Description

We're looking for a Business Development - Client Relations Associate, whose responsibilities include:-
You will be StarClinchs Ambassador who will be the bridge between the Clients and the Artists
Work on Inbound Leads from the Website and help clients book Artists
Understand the requirement of the client and provide options accordingly
Work efficiently to convert Interest into Business
Churn bookings from the sales funnel via regular follow-ups
Responding in a timely and effective manner to all Communication
Fully Responsible for meeting targets as assigned Periodically
No cold calling or random calling

Qualifications

Good Communication Skills, Smart Worker
Brilliant Negotiations Skills
Flexible, Able To Shift Priorities To Accommodate Changing Demands
The ability to break the ice, and engage in extensive networking & socializing at various platforms
Experience in working on CRM (eg- PipeDrive, Salesforce, Zoho) would be a plus
Additional Information

Exposure to how things work in a startup.
Health care benefits.
Extensive learning in the media and entertainment industry.
A fun-filled & open-cultured workplace.
Opportunity to connect with several big names in the glamour world
Fun and rewarding work atmosphere
We encourage communication and constructive collaboration
We believe in personal growth of individuals
Medi-claim Insurance
Paid Leaves
Team Parties  we go by the work hard and party harder principle",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=3082af77caa1d438,3082af77caa1d438,indeed,ZOHO
new,Enterprise Sales || Field Sales,Spectra Technovision India Pvt. Ltd,"Ahmedabad, Gujarat",2020-02-07,"Job SummaryHi,Greetings for the day!We have got an opening for Enterprise Sales Executive in our organization. I am sending you the job details & company details. If you are interested for the below job opening, kindly revert with your convenient time to discuss about the job opportunity.Position:  Sr. Executive - Enterprise SalesJob Location :  Ahmedabad*About Spectra Technovision (INDIA) Pvt. Ltd. *(www.spectra-vision.com)Spectra Technovision India Pvt. Ltd.Founded in 1999, Spectra has re-defined identity solution offerings over these years. Backed by a dedicated, experience-rich team we understand industry-specific needs better. With every solution we touch-base with our clients, listen to them with patience, answer their queries, inform them of all nitty-gritty, guide them through the process of building effective systems and provide reliable after sales support. Spectra boasts of a team of talented and dedicated minds. Lot of team members have been integral part of this growth journey for praiseworthy long tenures and has contributed to the success story of Spectra. Their time is invested in creating value-driven offerings and exceptional customer service for our various client verticals. Together, their passion and undivided attention made Spectra a force to recognize with, in a short span of its existence. From launch of its first to second and now third generation of products and solutions, Spectra has been a consistent player in its field.With eyes firmly set on the future, Spectra brings to you the most cutting-edge, dynamic and note-worthy products and solutions. At Spectra, we believe each day is a sparkling new opportunity to break barriers and create something new. Our experts strive to bring to your desk ever refined identity solutions, in tune with the buzzing trends. We have thus recorded a strong presence in India and now expanding footprints globally with 500+ channel partners. *Today we are backed by a strength of 150+ human capital serving 7500+ client base including 120+ top of the league marquee corporate clients.*Responsibilities and Duties*Job description**: ***Lead Generation **Generate Leads from assigned Industry / Location segment.Use various campaign methods i.e. Mailing, Cold calling, exhibitions and seminars, forums and databases etc.Identify Key decision makers, Interact with CXOs / various functional heads.Represent the company and solutions to key decision makers, make presentations, case studies and related documents.Analyze client pain areas, size up requirement and propose a solution.****Pre-Sales Consultation **Understand Client requirements.Understand key pain areas.Design a solution based on the selected hardware platform / technology.Find out Software customization requirement, document them, and coordinate with development team to prepare feasibility report.Get a sign off from the client on agreed upon scope of customizations.Get a sign off from the client on overall scope of project.**Sales Activities  Prepare commercial quotes / bids.Prepare timelines for the proposed projects taking into consideration the need of client on timelines. Establish an agreement with client on timelines.Carry out commercial negotiations with client representative.Strategize pricing and negotiation policies based on client, requirement and competition.Negotiate commercial terms with client representative.Based on agreed upon pricing and terms, ensure timely receipt of orders.**Post Sales Activities  Due diligence of the order received.Prepare requisition for arrangement of materials according to agreed upon timelines. Follow up for timely delivery.Prepare internal order for customization. Follow up for timely delivery.Assist Payments team for timely collection of advances (if any) / payments as per the milestones agreed upon with the client.Assist Support team if required for execution of project as per agreed upon scope.**Marketing  Assist Marketing team on competition study.Assist in collecting client feedback / testimonials.Share inputs on marketing materials.Participate in various marketing campaigns.**CRM & Data management  Manage all open leads / potentials on ZOHO CRM.Keep all the records updated.Maintain all versions of BoQ, quotations and other project related document of each client handled.Report periodically on progress of the current cases.Achieve sales targets as assigned.Job Type: Full-timeExperience:sales: 2 years (Preferred)",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=0f314c321b77139f,0f314c321b77139f,indeed,ZOHO
new,SEO Manager,WizIQ,"Mohali, Punjab",2020-01-11,"Location: Mohali
Qualification: Bachelor's degree or higher
Role Overview
The ideal candidate will be working as a part of WizIQs Marketing team and will be directly responsible for all SEO activities focused towards link-acquisition; utilizing social media for link acquisition and traffic; and monitoring, analyzing traffic and rankings data via Google Analytics and Google Webmasters tools.
Responsibilities:
Provide SEO support for all on-going activities such as new pages set up, site changes, and more.
Develop, initiate link acquisition strategy through content generation (guest blogging, reviews, coverage from bloggers) and other campaigns.
Develop and implement a social media strategy from a link acquisition and rankings and traffic increase perspective (Google+, Twitter, Pinterest, Facebook, LinkedIn, relevant forums, questions and answers sites etc.).
Monitor incoming links on an on-going basis and work on towards removal of undesired links.
Use Google Analytics, SEO tools, and Zoho CRM to analyze and optimize website traffic activity, SERP rankings, and lead acquisition metrics.
Monitor and data-mine SEO data regularly and assist in identifying new content opportunities.
Actively support and participate in social, PR, blog and product related content activities.
Track and monitor ranking of WizIQ and competitors on weekly and monthly basis.
Develop and enhance internal link structure and maintain implement features to enhance usability and SEO.
Develop and deliver comprehensive page-level and site-level recommendations for all products and services on WizIQ.com, blog and all other WizIQ web properties.
Stay current with all search engine algorithm changes and SEO industry trends.
Technical Skills
Experience with SEO tools, Google Analytics, Google Webmasters tools, data analysis, and strategic planning
Deep knowledge of Google Search Algorithm and its continuous evolution
Excellent verbal and written skills
Experience: 2+ years of experience in developing and implementing organic search marketing strategies
Send your cover letter and resume to hr@wiziq.com",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=038e64f719901382,038e64f719901382,indeed,ZOHO
new,Project Coordinator,Stark Edge,"Mohali, Punjab",2020-01-14,"Job SummaryGreetings from Stark Edge!!**We are hiring Jr. Project Coordinator for Stark Edge IT company Mohali. Interested candidates can share their resume at given mail ID and call at 8968675055.**(Male candidates only Required)**Salary: 10-12k*Experience Required: 06 Months (Fresher can also apply with excellent communication and must have IT skills)*****Responsibilities and DutiesResponsible for effective delivery of projects at the right Cost, Quality and TimeDiscussing and understanding the client's requirements and to suggest suitable solutions in consultation with the Technical team.System Requirement Specification document preparation so as to have an understanding of the requirement and scope at both ends.Client coordination and documentationManaging and coordinating resources involved with the software implementation.Effectively track issues and risks, communicate status and escalate concerns via status reports and communication to management.Work in concert with Clients, Analysts, Development Team and QC Testing Team throughout the Project life cycle.Use of project management tools like Zoho, JIRAInterested candidates can share their resume at given mail ID and call at 8968675055.Required Experience and QualificationsRequired Experience, Skills and QualificationsKnowledge on website technologies - static sites, dynamic/CMS sites, eCommerce sites, web portals.Agile Project Management , Mobile development managementUse of project management tools like Zoho, JIRAJob Type: Full-timeInterested candidates can share their resume at given mail ID and call at 8968675055.BenefitsExperience: 06 Months ( Fresher can also apply with Excellent skills and Must have IT skills)Education: Candidates Must have done BCA,MCA, Btech, Mtech ( Computer science only)Bachelor's (Preferred)Industry:Software DevelopmentInterested candidates can share their resume at given mail ID and call at 8968675055.Job Type: Full-timeSalary: 10,000.00 to 12,000.00 /monthBenefits:Health insurancePaid leaves / Leave encashmentFlexible work hours",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=9040743f5ffec8c7,9040743f5ffec8c7,indeed,ZOHO
new,Accountant cum Administrator,Goyam Infotech,"Hyderabad, Telangana",2020-01-20,"Need to take care of Purchase/ Sales Bills data entry and GST. Also Take care of Admin Role and purchase execution.Job Type: Full-timeSalary: 12,000.00 /monthExperience:Zoho: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)accounting: 1 year (Preferred)Language:English, Hindi, Telugu (Preferred)Benefits:Travel allowancePhone / Internet reimbursementIndustry:IT Operations & HelpdeskJob Duties:Monitoring company accounts and conducting quarterly reviewsAccounts payableAccounts receivableAdditional Duties:Account reconciliationInvoice processingRunning errands (bank deposits, etc.)Data entry",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=991c78689aa1bc2e,991c78689aa1bc2e,indeed,ZOHO
new,Assistant Manager - Accounts Receivables,Builder.ai - What would you Build?,"Gurgaon, Haryana",2020-01-11,"We are looking for a versatile & experienced professional who shall have the responsibility of managing the accounts receivables and collections process of Engineer.AI group.
Excellent interpersonal skills and a natural flair for associating and connecting with people at all levels. Must have a strong background in accounts receivables management and expert knowledge base of finance and accounting, ability to manage the receivables and collections piece in an individual contributor role. Person should have a strong desire to become a part of a dynamic team.
Why We Need This Role
The requirement is for an objective candidate for position title AM/DM to add value and ensure organization receivables cycle and the collection process is effectively managed. Candidate should bring a systematic and disciplined approach towards the assigned job responsibilities. The successful candidate will possess a thorough knowledge of receivable process and must showcase effective communication that can enhance his/her capabilities in maintaining sound and effective relationship with our clients. The selected person shall be responsible for tracking revenue and ensuring payments are received and accurately recorded in books in accordance with specified standards. The successful candidate shall be responsible for circulating the AR and Collection Reports on weekly basis and highlight concern areas, to escalate them and bring to attention of senior management.
Why You Should Join
This is a challenging and diverse role that requires you to handle entire gamut of receivables management and collection functions of a rapidly growing organization from the ground up. Only join this role if you are comfortable with trying fast and innovative ways in the rather staid and standardized functions and not fearing to fail.
First Six Month Deliverables
Managing the Accounts Receivable function of the Engineer.ai Group in an individual contributor role.
Performing daily review such as verifying, calculating and posting accounts receivable data.
Reconciling the accounts receivable ledger to ensure that all payments are accounted for and accurately posted.
Working closely with finance managers and other team members within the team.
Supporting the month end closing process.
Generating Accounts Receivables Ageing Reports and preparing management reporting as and when required.
Communication regarding list of debtors which exceed the specified ageing period and process to be undertaken for bad debts.
Review status of defaulting customers and analyse impact of Companys Credit Risk Insurance Policy to ensure parameters defined within the Policy are complied at all times so that any bad debt remains a valid insurance claim under the Credit Risk Insurance Policy.
Review of existing receivables and collection process identifying gaps and showcasing effective communication to build sound relationship with our customer base to reduce collection cycle.
Coordinate with legal team and provide them necessary data for taking legal action against defaulters.
Reconcile periodic cash receipts to payment register.
Design and implement changes for improving the Accounts Receivable processes and procedures.
Requirements
The successful candidate must possess the following :
Passionate about loosely held values and ideas. We want someone who has experience but is not blinded by the path already taken.
The incumbent must have some relevant professional qualifications.
4 to 6 years of experience preferably in a Start-up or an IT Company.
Proficiency in online accounting packages (Xero is a plus) and Spreadsheets and ability to work in appliars of experience in industry in managing similar functions.
Previous applications like Zoho.
Lots of energy and multitasking.
Good understanding of commercial issues.
Ability to work in tight deadlines.
Benefits
Health and Wellness benefits including competitive medical for self.
Performance-based bonuses.
Generous vacation and time off benefits including paid holidays.
Generally flexible working hours.
Working in our newly constructed beautiful office space based out at Gurugram.
A collaborative culture where unconventional thinkers come together to solve interesting problems and having fun while doing it.
Mission-driven company that is making the world a better place.",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=9e314121b6e15059,9e314121b6e15059,indeed,ZOHO
new,Executive - Accounts,TVS Accessories,"Delhi, Delhi",2020-01-11,"Min. Experience : 2 Years
Location : Delhi-Head Office


Job Responsibilites


Execute day-to-day accounting activities like book-keeping, payables management, receivables management, inventory control and audit
Review and manage banking entries, bank reconciliations
Operate Zoho books software (Zoho books experience not essential)for accounting / book-keeping and reporting purpose
Prepare financial reports for internal controls and auditors reference
Ensure full tax compliance and timely & accurate return filing of GST
Good Exposure in Financial analysis
Must Have Skills
Thorough accounting experience mainly in the area of sale/purchase of goods and VAT
Ability to lead team
Excellent communication skills
Good knowledge of advance functions of MS Excel",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=cf75da82cca95015,cf75da82cca95015,indeed,ZOHO
new,Channel Marketing Manager/ Executive,CLOUD ASSERT,"Coimbatore, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-11,"Responsibilities:

Develop marketing strategy in partnership with leadership team to identify, qualify and deliver sales leads as required for all markets
Plan, create and execute multi-channel marketing campaigns and nurturing cadences and proactively communicate progress and results to stakeholders
Supervise marketing team to plan and conduct campaigns, participate in conferences and other promotional events.
Manage the integration of CRM and Marketing Automation platforms and monitor performance to ensure precise targeting of campaigns and cadences to appropriate audiences with correct coding and tracking
In partnership with senior leadership team, design and maintain automated reporting on marketing KPIs and other business metrics  reporting results and learnings on a monthly, quarterly and campaign basis
Ensure that customers and channel partners are up to date with new products and enhancements.
Evaluate existing marketing programs and recommend changes for improvements.
Develop profitable marketing plan based on industry trends and competitor activities.
Inform management on potential competitive threats and propose corrective actions.
Developing and promoting a marketing toolkit consisting of overview slides, credentials decks, corporate decks and brand templates for use by Cloud Assert marketing leads
Monitor and manage expenses within allotted marketing budget.
Provide excellent customer services to ensure customer satisfaction and retention.


Key Skills

Plan Digital Campaigns: Planning and executing digital, channel-specific campaigns is a key part of a channel marketing managers role. This includes determining which media platform to advertise on and how to adapt campaigns to suit the channel theyre being used on.
Perform Market Research: Staying ahead of the curve and following the latest digital trends and searches, as well as the newest technologies. Also, carry out competitor research to monitor what other companies are doing.
Develop Channel Strategies: Develop channel-specific marketing strategies for the forthcoming year. These strategies are worked out with department heads to discuss topics such as budgets or contracts, and to make sure all teams are aligned with the marketing plans.
Report on Results: Gather data on the Marketing campaign results and create reports to show what worked and what was less effective for different markets and audiences.
Communication skills: Requires communicating effectively, so strong interpersonal and communication skills are a must for success.
Analytical abilities: Channel marketing managers analyze data, observe trends, and report and evaluate the success of campaigns and social engagement, which requires strong analytical abilities.
Teamwork: Often collaborate with a team and other departments or external contacts. For this reason, its important to be polite, professional, and courteous with colleagues, and work well in a team.
Organization skills: Often work with different colleagues and teams on multiple projects at one time, so the ability to prioritize tasks and stay organized is essential.

MBA in marketing, advertising, or equivalent, would be a plus. Preference given to candidates from a Tier 1 Engineering / A level Business Schools.
Minimum of 3 years in B2B Channel Marketing role (Cloud/SaaS experience a plus).
Must have hands-on experience using Zoho or similar CRM software; must be familiar with the principles of design and management of a customer database.
Direct experience with marketing automation software (e.g. Zoho) or work experience in an active B2B marketing communications team preferred.
Proficient in SEM, email marketing, SEO, display and social media advertising, and affiliate marketing.
Strong data evaluation skills with the ability to extract and interpret data from various sources to drive creative marketing solutions.
Proven expertise in effective, predictable lead generation for inside sales teams.
Experience creating enterprise case studies, white papers, and client stories is preferred.
Must be a self-starter with initiative and drive, capable of executing rapidly with limited strategic direction.
Must have an exceptional eye for quality in marketing collateral and an unwillingness to compromise on the quality of both messaging and design.
Ability to work under pressure and adhere to tight deadlines while never sacrificing quality.
Ability to build and scale in a fast-growing company with a focus on execution.
Strong communication skills, including copy writing, presentation skills, and negotiation.
Must be a world-class individual contributor first and foremost to thrive at Cloud Assert; not be here just to tell other people what to do.",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=354f4186c76e4eb7,354f4186c76e4eb7,indeed,ZOHO
new,Position: IT Manager,Virtue Insight,"Chennai, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-11,"Job Description

Computer Hardware and Software Responsibilities
Network and Internet Related Responsibilities
SQL Server Database Handling
Data Center Related Responsibilities
Manage Software Installations in every System (Computer or laptop)
Configure Mails
Taking Backup and restore or critical data
Maintaining the SharePoint, Project Tracker, Dashboard
Maintaining the Zoho Project (if we have)
Maintenance of other online trackers like Experience Database, timesheet etc.


SEO/SMO Capabilities
Social media strategy across identified digital platforms (i.e. Twitter, Facebook, YouTube, Blogs, and RSS etc.);
Inputs into company social media strategy.
Administer search engine programs (XML sitemaps, shopping feeds, webmaster tools).
Keyword research in coordination with company business objectives to optimize existing content and uncover new opportunities
SEO/SMO analysis and recommendations for structure of websites and web pages
Provide recommendations and execute strategies for content development in coordination with SEO goals  general and keyword specific
Development and execution of communication/content strategies via social communities in coordination with SEO/SMO goals
Keep pace with SEO, search engine, social media, internet marketing, digital marketing industry trends and developments
Monitor and administer web analytics dashboards, reports and key reporting tools, and point out key areas of importance in accordance company goals
Monitor and evaluate search results and search performance across the major search channels

Graphic Designing Capabilities (Added advantage)


New design concepts, graphics and layouts for product illustrations, logos, and websites.
Creating PPT design templates.


Compensation: Negotiable
Location: Chennai
Apply now!! Please Contact Us for detailed information.
All application CVs should be submitted by e-mail to info@virtueinsight.com",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=5c54d1a9221a3f4e,5c54d1a9221a3f4e,indeed,ZOHO
new,Back Office Executive,R.Tulsian & Co. LLP,"Kolkata, West Bengal",2020-02-08,"Job SummaryJob Description for Back Office ExecutiveFEMALE CANDIDATES ONLY**Job Summary-The candidate should be able to speak English fluently.- The candidate needs to coordinate with clients, branch office, teams, calling team etc.- The candidate should have experience of drafting of letters, notices, contents, emails.- The candidate should have experience of Cold Calling/interaction with clients.-The candidate should be able to manage CRM and online and offline Databases.- The candidate has to carry out regular daily back-office administrative work as directed.-The Candidate has to look into hiring, recruitment and HR work.- The candidate has to carry out any other back office work assigned from time to time.Required Experience, Skills and QualificationsExcellent Command over English, Hind and Bengali.Thorough Knowledge of Microsoft Excel, word and powerpoint.Excellent email drafting skills in English.Experience in working with Google Drive, Google sheets and Google Docs, Zoho CRM, Running Email Campaigns, PDF editing software.Working Experience in Tally ERP 9.Minimum experience of 1 year in Back office Management.Freshers are not preferred to apply.Job Type: Full-timeSalary: 10,000.00 to 15,000.00 /monthWork Timings: Mon to Fri- 10:30AM to 7:30PM including lunch break, Sat- 10:30AM to 5:30PM.Head Office location: 7/1C Jatindra Mohan Avenue, First Floor, Opposite CCD Cafe, Near Beadon Street, Kolkata-700006Hiring required immediately.Responsibilities and DutiesJob Summary-The candidate should be able to speak English fluently.- The candidate needs to coordinate with clients, branch office, teams, calling team etc.- The candidate should have experience of drafting of letters, notices, contents, emails.- The candidate should have experience of Cold Calling/interaction with clients.-The candidate should be able to manage CRM and online and offline Databases.- The candidate has to carry out regular daily back-office administrative work as directed.-The Candidate has to look into hiring, recruitment and HR work.- The candidate has to carry out any other back office work assigned from time to time.Qualifications and SkillsRequired Experience, Skills and QualificationsExcellent Command over English, Hind and Bengali.Thorough Knowledge of Microsoft Excel, word and powerpoint.Excellent email drafting skills in English.Experience in working with Google Drive, Google sheets and Google Docs, Zoho CRM, Running Email Campaigns, PDF editing software.Working Experience in Tally ERP 9.Minimum experience of 1 year in Back office Management.Freshers are not preferred to apply.BenefitsOut of Pocket reimbursementsQuick increment of salary based on excellent performanceInternational working exposureQuick growth into Managerial roleJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 120,000.00 to 180,000.00 /yearExperience:Back office administration: 1 year (Preferred)work: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Language:English, Hindi, Bengali (Preferred)Benefits:Phone / Internet reimbursementIndustry:AccountingSpeak with the employer+91 9830503550",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=7e27825dc74c9df0,7e27825dc74c9df0,indeed,ZOHO
new,Software Developer,Mark3,"New Delhi, Delhi",2020-01-11,"Location: New Delhi- Department: Development

Position: SE/SD

Qualification: Post Graduate/Graduate in any stream

Domain: Application Development

Experience:
A minimum of 1 year of Zoho experience. ( Note: Freshers can also apply )

Bachelor's degree in computer science or related field
Extensive experience configuring and Customizing Zoho products for different industry verticals.
Specialized in integration of Zoho with other services.
Experience in PHP, Java, HTML, Mobile Apps, Zoho Creator tool, deluge scripting.
Well versed in creating customer portal, appointment module, HTML page views, creating dashboards, creating reports, embedding forms/reports/pages, email and SMS campaigns, invoice generation, tracking work progress, pivot charts, and implement custom search modules across the app using Zoho Creator.
Zoho Developer Certification
Communication Proficiency
Leadership
Decision Making
Problem Solving
Technical Capacity
Thoroughness

Job Description:
 Development, Implementation, customization and administration of suite of Zoho applications including Zoho Creator, CRM, One etc.

Understand the business process and requirements of the team and to implement and customize various modules (Sales, Accounts, HR etc.)
Develop custom workflow. Work with support team to resolve any reported issues. Track issues and provide periodic updates.
Create custom tools and scripts to automate the manual business processes, within or outside Zoho. Effectively utilize modules features to automate various business processes.
Monitor, Control and ensure the sustained effective usage of Zoho products throughout the organization.",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=07df3cbe5393f522,07df3cbe5393f522,indeed,ZOHO
new,IT Infrastructure Engineer,Cohere Recruit,"Jaipur, Rajasthan",2020-01-11,"Relevant Microsoft, VMWare, and/or LinuxCertificationsMandatory Technical Skill(s) :  * Hardware  Rack, UPS, Servers, NAS, Routers,Switches, Desktops, Laptops, Android MobilePhones, Multi-function Printer, Time &Attendance MachineEnvironment  SuperMicro Server with RAID5,Synology NAS with RAID5, VMWare 6.7, CiscoRouters & SwitchesSecurity Policies  Network, Desktops, Servers,Cloud ApplicationsServer OS  Windows Server 2016, CentOS LinuxServer Apps  Domain Controller, ActiveDirectory, Citrix NetScaler, GITLabs, JIRA, DNS,MySQL 5.6+, Apache Tomcat, ApacheDS 2.0,Liferay 6.2+, VPN, ManageEngine Service Desk+,JDK 1.7, Angular 6+Desktop OS  Microsoft Windows 8/10Desktop Apps  Microsoft Office, Eclipse,JDK 1.7, MacAfeeCloud Services  JIRA, Office 365, ZOHO, VMHosting, Domain Registration, DNSDR  Replication, Backup & RecoveryLicensing  Windows, Office 365Job Type: Full-timeExperience:VMware, UPS, Cloud: 2 years (Required)Education:Bachelor's (Required)Language:Good English (Required)Industry:Software Development",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=f9a316f1b34f0f51,f9a316f1b34f0f51,indeed,ZOHO
new,Angular Developer,imobigeeks Software Technologies Ltd.,"Hyderabad, Telangana",2020-01-11,"Job SummaryStrong Knowledge of developing web applications using Angular 4, 5, 6 or 7Strong understanding of front-end web technologies.Strong UI development experience using XHTML, CSS, JavaScript, AJAX, and JSONProficiency in Javascript, Node JSDevelop User interfaces for Modern Rich Internet Applications with the latest Front-End Technologies.Experience in delivering and consume the REST API web serviceHands on experience in Linux environmentExperience in subscription handling through 3rd party APIs Zoho Subscription,ChargifySource Control tools:  SVN,GITResponsibilities and DutiesExcellent communication skills including ability to communicate clearly with both technical and non-technical audiencesTranslate business and technical requirements into well-designed applicationsLead the programming efforts on all projectsDelegate work to and manage junior engineersConduct code and technical reviews of work produced by junior engineersQualifications and SkillsStrong Knowledge on Angular web/mobile application UI design skillsKnowledge in HTML5, CSS, and BootstrapShould be able to develop or maintain applications with MVC architectureStrong debugging and problem-solving skillsStrong RDBMS skills and experience in DB/SQLSphinx (or any full-text search engine) experience a plusDetail oriented, strong analytical skills and resourceful in issue resolutionComfortable with fast-paced schedule driven product cyclesBonus points if you have worked on high traffic website development or have a prior startup experienceJob Type: Full-timeExperience:software development: 4 years (Preferred)Angular: 5 years (Preferred)total work: 5 years (Preferred)javascript: 3 years (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Housing rent subsidy:NoIndustry:Software Development",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=c5ccc72eaf6cdd35,c5ccc72eaf6cdd35,indeed,ZOHO
new,Senior Business Development Manager,VSH SOLUTIONS,"Pune, Maharashtra",2020-01-11,"Overview
We are hiring a Senior Manager, Business Development who will manage the inside sales team and own the process. You will be required to manage a team of inside sales professionals and also be an individual contributor on the team. You will report to the Chief Sales Officer (CSO) & work closely with the management team. This position requires experience in scaling outsourced product engineering services business with lead generation. We offer a competitive salary with an attractive incentive structure and opportunities for future growth.

Experience: 6  8 years

Responsibilities:

Develop and execute outreach strategies for targeting ISVs and Enterprise customers with outsourcing needs.
Support Inside sales teams to achieve their target and lead with example
Develop a thorough understanding of VSHs service offerings and identify key growth and lead generation strategies.
Generate leads through targeted account-based approach, outbound prospecting, and calling on inbound leads
Build and expand the lead database and maintain CRM data quality. Design and execute campaigns working closely with the CSO and management team.
Lead the day to day operations of the team to ensure effectiveness, efficiency and scalability, proficiency in sales automation systems (Salesforce/Zoho) analytics and reporting, plus managing teams to update and enforce the system.

Qualifications:

4-6 years of sales experience in the outsourcing industry with exposure to international markets (US)
Graduate or Post Graduate in Business, Sales & Marketing, Technology or similar
Excellent verbal and written communication, negotiation and social media skills for lead generation
Ability to develop executive level relationships and lead strategic initiatives with the customer, and present VSHs value proposition to C-level executives.
Superior writing, presentation and overall communication skills, ability to develop proposals and presentations that convey the business need and client benefit.
Ambitious, self-motivated, goal-oriented and number driven.

Location: Pune, India To apply for this job, please write to us at jobs@vshsolutions.com",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=1b2c00a878f91f2b,1b2c00a878f91f2b,indeed,ZOHO
new,Digital Media Specialist,Biophlox Global,"Mumbai, Maharashtra",2020-01-11,"Job type
Full-time/Part-time
Position type
Permanent
Vacancies
2
Minimum experience
one year
Education
B.Tech/B.E./MCA/BCA

Job Description


Mode: Full Time, Part-time

Location: Mumbai or Remote


Roles and Responsibilities:

Give creative direction and maintain high levels of engagement on social media, with a focus on Facebook, LinkedIn, YouTube, Twitter, Google Plus, Instagram and the company blog

Develop engaging social media content and promote content through social advertising

Develop email marketing campaigns using online email marketing platforms such as Zoho, Mailchimp
Generate, edit, publish and share daily content (original text, images, video or HTML) that builds meaningful connections and encourages community members to take action

Set up and optimize company pages within each platform to increase the visibility of companys social content
Continuously improve by capturing and analyzing the appropriate social data/metrics, insights and best practices, and then acting on the information


Requirements:

Proven working experience in social media marketing or as a digital media specialist
Excellent consulting, writing, editing (photo/video/text), presentation and communication skills
Demonstrable social networking experience and social analytics tools knowledge
Knowledge of online marketing and good understanding of major marketing channels
Positive attitude, detail, and customer oriented with good multitasking and organizational ability


Company Description


Biophlox is an Online Marketplace for Biotech equipment and Laboratory Equipment in Asia. The Biophlox Group envisions to solve the problem of SMEs, Distributors, Laboratories and Research Institutes by bringing all on a single platform f for business. It further aims to support SMEs in expanding across the globe through its huge network of biotech professionals.
Email your application directly to info@biophlox.com",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=68c89d5d06f2695d,68c89d5d06f2695d,indeed,ZOHO
new,Inside Sales Specialist,Rahi Systems,"Pune, Maharashtra",2020-01-11,"Job Title: Inside Sales

Job Type: Full-time
Location: Pune

Work Hours: 9 hours

Main Duties and Responsibilities:


The prospect role holder will be selling to top accounts and working with Fortune 500 caliber clients. You will execute on the account plan to deliver maximum revenue potential. Manage complete and complex sales-cycles often presenting to C-level executives the value of our full suite of applications- Project coordination, order entry, follow up, and scheduling. Forecast sales activity and revenue using Zoho.com, while creating satisfied customers. Evangelize the RAHI SYSTEMS vision through product demonstrations, in-market events, and account specific initiatives.
Cold calling; making multiple outbound calls to potential clients.
 Understanding client needs and offering solutions and support 
 Researching potential leads from business directories, web searches, or digital resources. Qualifying leads from digital campaigns, conferences, references, tradeshows, etc. 
Creating and maintaining a list/database of prospect clients. Presenting and delivering information to potential clients.
 Answering potential client questions and follow-up call questions.
Working with sales team when closing sale.
Tracking weekly, monthly, and quarterly performance and sales metrics.
Building pipelines with channel partners and team members to close sales. 
 Maintaining database (ERP and Zoho CRM, Excel, etc.) of prospective client information.
Closing sales and working with client through closing process
Skills and Experience: 
Excellent verbal and written communication skills;
The ability to call, connect and interact with potential customers 
Persuasive and goal-oriented 
Possesses an energetic, outgoing, and friendly demeanour 
Eager to expand company with new sales, clients, and territories 
Self-motivated and self-directed.
Able to multitask, prioritize, and manage time efficiently.
In-depth understanding of IT and Network product and solutions, computing, virtualization services , Data centre (preferable) services
Knowledge of sales process from initiation to close
Ability to work independently or as an active member of a team


Personal Qualities and Behaviour traits:
Be a good team worker demonstrating loyalty and commitment to the organization and team members.
Good organizational and communication skills and excellent attention to details.
Interact with individuals to provide needed information.


Performance Goals:
Able to handle multiple complex assignments simultaneously.
Ensures timely response to client and internal peers.",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=cbefdfaf215ef126,cbefdfaf215ef126,indeed,ZOHO
new,Business Development Manager,Mark3,"New Delhi, Delhi",2020-01-11,"Location: New Delhi- Department: Sales

Position: BDE/BDM

 Qualification: Post Graduate/Graduate in any stream


 Domain: CRM Selling, Application Development Services


 Experience:
2 year + of experience of being an over achiever sales professional of selling Software Products in one or more of following spac

CRM, Sales Automation, Marketing Automation, Business Process Automation to chief marketing officers of any kind of B2C or B2B businesses Experience of selling software as a service is a plus Demonstrating a software solution over the web meeting is a breeze for you Bachelor's degree (or equivalent work experience) business, marketing and sales or related field of study Ability to analyze the customer needs and map them to software solution which addresses the needs is going to be extremely desirable.
Ability to self-motivate and multi-task and work independently or within a team Outstanding written and verbal communication skills
Amicable personality who customers will not hesitate to approach when they are looking to upscale business processes, are in problem or call you because they love to talk to you
Requires Travel within India

 Job Description:
Mark3 is Zoho Partner and is actively looking for high energy sales professionals who have got the drive and passion of building profitable businesses from ground up.

The sales professional should be able to identify and prospect high value target accounts for new business, maintain existing accounts as well as establish opportunity for cross sell and up sell within an account.
The sale professional should have relevant experience in selling technology solutions to sales, marketing and management teams of B2C / B2B businesses.
Experience in telephone sales is a must.
This position reports to the Business Head of the organization
Essential Duties & Responsibilities.

Responsible for new business development via prospecting high value target accounts, qualifying the customer needs and closing the business Manage client relationship through all phases of the sales cycle Giving online and face to face presentations and demos to the clients Provide consultative solutions sales process to prospects Conducts one-on-one and group sales presentations
Responsible for tracking customer information, forecasts and reports Owns the revenue responsibility",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=7b64b1b600e528c2,7b64b1b600e528c2,indeed,ZOHO
new,Accountant in retail sector,AVA Placement Services,"Gurgaon, Haryana",2020-01-22,"AccountantAbout Company :As pet parents, we realize that information on the lifestyle, nutritional and behavioral needs of pets is all across the internet but probably paucity of time is an impediment for pet parents to know what really works best for their petsLocation : GurgaonExperience : 1.5  3 YearsFunction : Finance & AccountsVacancy : 1Job Description :ABOUT USPetSutra was created with the ambition to be an ecosystem for pets and pet parenting for India. While we are still in our fledgling days, we aim to source the best of the products from manufacturers and brands, small or big, and bring them to the loving pet parents across the country.As pet parents, we realize that information on the lifestyle, nutritional and behavioural needs of pets is all across the internet but probably paucity of time is an impediment for pet parents to know what really works best for their pets. So, we simply decided: If its not good, its not on PetSutra.So we are slowly and steadily building the PetSutra platform on 3 pillars: Fulfilment, Information and Connection with the intent to provide high quality products at affordable prices creating value for you, curated content as per your pets breed and age, and ultimately connecting you to the best service providers such as Canine behaviourists, Groomers and Walkers in your vicinity to facilitate a better lifestyle for your pet.It has been a short and fulfilling journey and we hope to create this entire ecosystem in its entirety using technology and AI in all the time to come.Position: AccountantPrimary responsibilities are: - General Accounting, Auditing, and TaxationExpectations: Working knowledge of Tally/QB/ZOHO/SAPGood understanding of general legal, financial and accounting principles,Prior experience in e-commerce is an advantageWorking Days : 6 Days a Week (9:30 AM to 6:30 PM)Job Nature : Full TimeInterested candidate what's app you resume 8373946272Job Type: Full-timeSalary: 20,000.00 to 25,000.00 /monthExperience:Tally: 1 year (Preferred)GST: 1 year (Preferred)Auditing: 1 year (Preferred)Accounting: 1 year (Preferred)Industry:Retail",Apply securely with Indeed Resume,https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=45d7fec9b147c540,45d7fec9b147c540,indeed,ZOHO
new,Accounts & Finance Manager (Max. experience should be 8 yrs),Dermacy Healthcare Private Limited,"Gurgaon, Haryana",2020-02-08,"Job SummaryThis is going to be a key position in the company and reports directly to Director of the Organization.Key SkillsZoho BooksRequired Experience and QualificationsCA with min. 6 months experience OR total 5 years of experience.Job Type: Full-timeSalary: 360,000.00 to 600,000.00 /yearExperience:work: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Finance: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Master's (Preferred)Location:Gurgaon, Haryana (Preferred)Benefits:Health insurancePaid leaves / Leave encashmentFlexible work hoursPhone / Internet reimbursementIndustry:Beauty & WellnessJob Duties:Accounts payableAccounts receivablePayrollBudgetsExpense reportsTax preparationInternal audits for policy adherenceInternal audits for tax codesCost reduction proposalsProfit-and-loss statementsMonitoring company accounts and conducting quarterly reviewsAdditional Duties:RecordkeepingAccount reconciliationInvoice processingRunning errands (bank deposits, etc.)Data entry","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=09edd28575c85d00,09edd28575c85d00,indeed,ZOHO
new,Digital Marketing,Bioindustrial Entrepreneurship Development consult...,"Durgapur, West Bengal",2020-02-10,"Job SummaryDigital Marketing Intern / Trainee /Junior ExecutiveRs.3000. per month. Durgapur, West BengalComputer Operation. The Internet search, Email communication, Social network, etc.Boy / Girl residing around SEPCO, MAMC, Amarabati, Fuljhor, Sankarpur, Bidhanpally, Bidhannagar, Dhbani are preferred.Responsibilities and DutiesThe Digital Marketing Specialist is primarily responsible for : -The oversight and management of SuperProcure's online presence and reputation.The creation and maintenance of SuperProcure's intranet and external website and the management and execution of SuperProcure's digital marketing strategy. Responsibilities:- Develop marketing campaigns that will drive website traffic and attract new clients. - Oversee digital advertising campaigns to ensure positive ROI.-Update website with SEO best practices. - Optimize the company website for conversion and optimal user experience.- Partner with internal teams and external vendors to ensure marketing campaigns are executed on time and within budget.- Develop the content strategy and manage the creation of helpful, engaging blog content.- Partner with internal stakeholders and external vendors to develop marketing communications that promote SuperProcure's brand and values online.- Create and distribute engaging, shareable content appropriate for specific social platforms.- Disseminate feedback to the appropriate parties to promote information flow and continuous improvement.Develop and manage digital marketing campaignsManage the organizations websiteOptimize content for the website and social networking channels such as Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Google Plus, etcTrack the website traffic flow and provide internal reports regularlyFix any error in online content andarrange webinars and webcastsAttend networking events and product launches.Identify new digital marketing trends and ensure that the brand is in front of industry developments.Work on SEO of the website pages.Edit and post content, videos, podcasts, and audio content on online sites.Promote the companys products and services in the digital space.Execute social media efforts to improve KPIs, likes, shares, tweets, etc.Creating and executing SMS, and email-based marketing campaigns.. Lead generation from Mobile AppUploading Video in YouTubeexperience in Online Paid advertisementAbility to manage PPC campaigns using multiple networks  e.g. Google Adwords, Bing, Facebook, LinkedIn, etc.Analyze and test behavior-based marketing techniques, retargeting techniques and help develop a paid strategyLanding page optimization to ensure quality leads  * Also required is an experience in web analytics like Google AnalyticsGenerate weekly and monthly client reporting for all major metrics, goals tracking, revenue tracking, and other paid search initiatives.Boy / Girl residing around SEPCO, MAMC, Amarabati, Fuljhor, Sankarpur, Bidhanpally, Bidhannagar, Dhbani are preferred.Qualifications and SkillsSecondary Schooling / Diploma / GraduateAge 18 to 49 yrs. Male or female. English Medium schooled.MS-Office, Google Doc,The Facebook business page, LinkedIn, Youtube, CRM, Workflow task management software.CPC, Google Ads, Google Forms, Google calendar,Mailchimp or similar.Hubspot / Zoho or similarExcel advanced, VB Macro,SEOWindows 10Fluent in EnglishBenefitsFlexible working hourIncentive on performance.Bonus on 100% attendanceMediclaim insuranceSkill developmentJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 3,000.00 /monthEducation:Secondary(10th Pass) (Required)Location:Durgapur, West Bengal (Preferred)Language:English (Preferred)Benefits:Health insuranceTravel allowanceFlexible work hoursEducation assistancePhone / Internet reimbursementShift allowanceIndustry:Information Design & Documentation","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=cca7750ffab86c34,cca7750ffab86c34,indeed,ZOHO
new,Python/Django Developer,Flying Penguins,"Nagpur, Maharashtra",2020-02-04,"Job SummaryWe are looking for a Python developer with 1-4 years of relevant experience. The person/s must be efficient, task-oriented and ready to take responsibilities. Being part of the Professional Services team you will be responsible for estimation, development, testing, implementations, etc. to different environments for all of our projects. You'll be enthusiastic with a positive attitude, dedication and willingness to work hard. The position will include a lot of interaction with foreign clientResponsibilities and DutiesExperience ranging from 1-3 years of strong technical and Analytical Skills- Good hands-on experience in Python development and Django framework- Expertise in database and SQL- Hands-on experience in developing APIs and building Web Services- Experience in Zoho tools. (will be plus)- Experience on deploying on AWS Cloud.- Passionate Team Player and solo developer with Can-do attitude- Ability to be gracefully persuasive in discussions to get things done. Ability to drive quality- Strong communication & collaboration skills- Ability to see the big picture and think innovative- Good to have: UX/UI design experience, Django, Django Rest Framework, Zoho/other reporting toolsRoles and Responsibilities: You'll be helping our clients working with them to develop solutions in a diverse range of applications. Analyze requirements, create estimates and interact with the client. A motivated person with self-learning skills.Interested and ready to learn new technologies as and when required.Immediate Joining.Other Job Responsibilities:1. Full-Stack Product & Features Development using Python2. Product / Feature Design & Architecture3. Product Customizations4. Product Deployment & Testing5. Product Documentation.Key SkillsPython Development, Django Framework, AWS-EC2, IOS & Android application.Required Experience and QualificationsQualifications- Bachelors in computersExperience- 1 to 4 yearsJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 15,000.00 to 30,000.00 /monthIndustry:Software Development","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=22dcd41ac2ac34c9,22dcd41ac2ac34c9,indeed,ZOHO
new,Project Coordinator / Project Manager,Acodez IT Solutions Pvt Ltd,"Calicut, Kerala",2020-01-13,"Job SummaryResponsible for effective delivery of projects at the right Cost, Quality and TimeDiscussing and understanding the client's requirements and to suggest suitable solutions in consultation with the Technical team.System Requirement Specification document preparation so as to have an understanding of the requirement and scope at both ends.Client coordination and documentationManaging and coordinating resources involved with the software implementation.Effectively track issues and risks, communicate status and escalate concerns via status reports and communication to management.Work in concert with Clients, Analysts, Development Team and QC Testing Team throughout the Project life cycle.Use of project management tools like Zoho, JIRARequired Experience, Skills and QualificationsKnowledge on website technologies - static sites, dynamic/CMS sites, eCommerce sites, web portals.Agile Project Management , Mobile development managementUse of project management tools like Zoho, JIRAJob Type: Full-timeExperience:Zoho or Jira: 1 year (Preferred)Project Management: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Industry:Software Development","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=add7e52509be319a,add7e52509be319a,indeed,ZOHO
new,Business Development Executive- Client Relations,STARCLINCH,"East of Kailash, Delhi, Delhi",2020-02-03,"Job SummaryAre you tempted by the excitement of start-ups? StarClinch offers the thrill ofworking with a young team, the ability to make an immediate impact and theopportunity to work with a game-changing product that is disrupting the LiveEntertainment Business forever. In simple words, StarClinch is Indias Largest ArtistBooking and Discovery Platform. We are a young motivated team focused ondelivering our best. We are looking for Self Directed and Empathetic BusinessDevelopers to join our team and be a part of the wonderful journey.Responsibilities and DutiesWe're looking for a Business Development - Client Relations Associate, whoseresponsibilities include: -You will be StarClinchs Ambassador who will be the bridge between theClients and the ArtistsWork on Inbound Leads from the Website and help clients book ArtistsUnderstand the requirement of the client and provide options accordinglyWork efficiently to convert Interest into BusinessChurn bookings from the sales funnel via regular follow-upsResponding in a timely and effective manner to all CommunicationFully Responsible for meeting targets as assigned PeriodicallyNo cold calling or random callingKey SkillsSales Experience, Client Relations, Client Management, Client Relationship Management, Client Services, Salesforce, Revenue ManagementRequired Experience and QualificationsBrilliant Negotiations SkillsGood Communication Skills, Smart WorkerFlexible, Able To Shift Priorities To Accommodate Changing DemandsThe ability to break the ice, and engage in extensive networking & socializingat various platformsExperience in working on CRM (eg- PipeDrive, Salesforce, Zoho) would be aplusBenefitsWe encourage communication and constructive collaborationWe believe in the personal growth of individualsFun and rewarding work atmospherePaid LeavesTeam Parties  we go by the work hard and party harder principleChance to meet the stars!Job Types: Full-time, InternshipSalary: 18,000.00 to 30,000.00 /monthExperience:Sales: 1 year (Preferred)business development: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Language:English (Required)Benefits:Paid leaves / Leave encashmentPhone / Internet reimbursementOtherSales role:InboundTypical team size:4-6Travel requirements:NoIndustry:Arts & Entertainment","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=d321a40117fb1956,d321a40117fb1956,indeed,ZOHO
new,QA Analyst/Tester (Support),I-XL Technologies,"Mumbai, Maharashtra",2020-01-23,"Job SummaryJob Responsibilities.1. To read all the project documents and creating test plans2. Based on the information procured & test plans Develop test cases and prioritize testing activities.3. Execute all the test case and report defects, define severity and priority for each defect.4. Carry out Unit/ Integration/ Regression testing during re-testing5. Defect Reporting6. Prepare the status report of testing activities.7. Updating project Coordinator/ Manager regularly about the progress of testing activities.8. Working closely with the Project Coordinators9. Managing project MIS and project tracking report- weekly/ monthly/10. Sending daily reportsKey Skills1. Experience in testing all type of application  Native , Hybrid , web App & wapsite2. Experience in  Black box and white box testing3. Experience in working online bug reporting tracking tool- preferred ZIRA & ZOHO4. Experience in Software testing of performance/ functional/ integrations / unit / cross-platforms/ security testing/ system & Platform testing / Gateway testing/ Load testing5. Experience in working with any software Automations Testing tools in mobile application.6. Experience in testing of web services/ APIs7. Preferred Mobile App Automation tester8. Communications skills9. Basic knowledge of the HTML, PHP, limitations of the mobile software development, Knowledge of software application compatibility testing and reports, creating IPA / APK , Installing certificate, Making store Accounts Ready & uploading Application on store, Developing test cases, Bug reporting,test plans10. Basic knowledge of the database.11. Experience in testing of multiple type of projectRequired Skills: Good Communication skillsTechnical knowledge required based on Mobile TechnologyPresentation Skills, Client Relationships, __Pleasant and Presentable PersonalityJob Type: Full-timeExperience:total work: 1 year (Required)Education:Bachelor's (Required)Benefits:Provident fund (PF)Paid leaves / Leave encashmentTravel allowanceFlexible work hoursIndustry:IT Operations & Helpdesk","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=9b3859ad197c0baa,9b3859ad197c0baa,indeed,ZOHO
new,Accountant,Yo Hr Consultancy,"Gurgaon, Haryana",2020-01-18,"Job SummaryExperience :  1.5  3 YearsFunction :  Finance & AccountsVacancy :  1Job Description : Primary responsibilities are: - General Accounting, Auditing, and TaxationExpectations: Working knowledge of Tally/QB/ZOHO/SAPGood understanding of general legal, financial and accounting principles,Prior experience in e-commerce is an advantageWorking Days :  6 Days a Week (9:30 AM to 6:30 PM)Job Type: Full-timeSalary: 300,000.00 to 400,000.00 /monthExperience:Accounting: 2 years (Required)Location:Gurgaon, Haryana (Required)","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=0c7eabfe99a3c4ca,0c7eabfe99a3c4ca,indeed,ZOHO
new,Accountant,Acots Print Pack,"Gurgaon, Haryana",2020-01-11,"Job SummaryThe Accountant is responsible to ensure the smooth and efficient running of the accounting functions within the Accounting Department. Must know how to work in Tally & Zoho Books.Responsibilities and DutiesInvoice MakingFilling GST Returns via CATDS FillingQualifications and SkillsIdeally with a relevant degree or diploma in Finance, Commerce or Manufacturing Industry. Minimum 2 years work experience as Accountant or Accounting Clerk in larger operation. Good problem solving, administrative and interpersonal skills are a must.Job Type: Full-timeSalary: 15,000.00 /monthExperience:Tally: 2 years (Preferred)total work: 2 years (Preferred)Accounting: 2 years (Preferred)Benefits:Travel allowanceEducation assistancePhone / Internet reimbursementIndustry:Retail","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=2468378cc9dd5732,2468378cc9dd5732,indeed,ZOHO
new,Financial Accountant,Easton Media Private LImited,"Chennai, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-24,"Job SummaryManage all accounting transactionsHandle monthly, quarterly and annual closingsReconcile accounts payable and receivableEnsure timely bank paymentsCompute taxes and prepare tax returnsManage balance sheets and profit/loss statementsReport on the companys financial health and liquidityAudit financial transactions and documentsReinforce financial data confidentiality and conduct database backups when necessaryComply with financial policies and regulationsRequired Experience and QualificationsWork experience as an AccountantExcellent knowledge of accounting regulations and procedures, including the Generally Accepted Accounting Principles (GAAP)Hands-on experience with accounting software like QuickBooks, Zoho books.Advanced MS Excel skills including Vlookups and pivot tablesExperience with general ledger functionsBSc in Accounting, Finance or relevant degreeJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 13,000.00 to 18,000.00 /monthExperience:Taxation: 1 year (Preferred)Bank reconciliation: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Benefits:Paid leaves / Leave encashmentFlexible work hoursIndustry:Media & CommunicationsJob Duties:Monitoring company accounts and conducting quarterly reviewsAccounts payableAccounts receivableProfit-and-loss statementsTax preparationExpense reportsCost reduction proposalsInternal audits for policy adherenceInternal audits for tax codesPresenting budgets and reports to upper managementAdditional Duties:Invoice processingRunning errands (bank deposits, etc.)Data entryRecordkeepingAccount reconciliation","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=2451e041306f57f7,2451e041306f57f7,indeed,ZOHO
new,Software Developer Trainee(CRM),10X Biz,"Madhapur, Hyderabad, Telangana",2020-01-11,"Job SummaryWe are looking for talented Fresher / Entry Level candidates who are interested in starting their career in Zoho, Saleforce and other CRM as a developer and who want to help our 100+ customers around the world use 10XBiZ services to transform their business with CRM and business process automation technologies. We are presently a small team looking for an ambitious, talented, self-starter who is passionate about working on the award-winning CRM platforms.Responsibilities and DutiesResponsible for developing, implementing, maintain custom CRM and other business applications (on Zoho Platform) including coding, agile team principlesWorking and build strong relationship with Solution Architects and Platform Architects to fit in 10XBiZ standards and guidelines to champion best practices and guide and influence team on leveraging such practices.Taking impactful features from idea to implementationElegantly bring designs to life using standards-compliant dynamic HTML, CSS, and Javasript.Brainstorm and prototype new concepts and approaches fast, turning prototypes into real things.Work with product manager to meet the demands of our customers, while at the same time continuing to innovate far beyond the competition.Build strong relationships across the business, that may be leveraged to produce better products and solutions. Be a team player in a highly collaborative environment.Required Experience, Skills and QualificationsGood programming and analytical skills.Experiences with any of the following JavaScript frameworks/libraries: React, jQuery, Angular or similar would be a plus.Understand web standards & technologies (ex. HTTP, REST and JSON).Bachelors degree, preferably Computer Science, IT and Electronics.Knowledge of Agile/Scrum methodology.Experince of working with any CRM platform would be an advantage.Able to design and write well-structured, easily maintainable, well-documented code that balances beauty and pragmatism.Knowledge of Object Oriented (OO) design patterns.Knowledge working at-scale by reusing components and code to push apps out fastPassionate about web development and up to date with the latest developments in your field.BenefitsThe opportunity to learn tons at a rapidly growing startupWill always respect the IdeasWe have a policy of No Work Hour (3 times in a week ) Which will allow you to Brainstorm and Deep thinking and Idea Pitchingwill form part of Our 10x Innovative TeamJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 200,000.00 to 400,000.00 /yearExperience:total work: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Secondary(10th Pass) (Preferred)Industry:Software Development","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=866b940e79611822,866b940e79611822,indeed,ZOHO
new,Tele-Sales Associate,Foyr,"Hyderabad, Telangana",2020-02-06,"Job SummaryThe associate will be responsible for tele calling, managing and updating Leads on Zoho CRM daily.He/ She should coordinate with the design and sales team to fix meetings, share portfolio and welcome email to the prospective client. He/ She will be provided leads to prospect but will additionally be expected to identify other prospective customers. A team player with a service, go-getter attitude, strong communication skills.Responsibilities and DutiesBuild strong sales relationships with our preferred tele-sales customers.Follow up inquiries from prospective clients.Send and relay information to prospective client via email, mail or telephone.Outbound sales campaigns via phone.Setting up meetings with BDMs.Generating leads through online/ offline channels as needed.Qualifications and SkillsStrong verbal communication skills in English, Hindi & TeluguStrong written and email communication skillsExcellent peoples skills.Software skills MS Office, Excel, EmailJob Type: ContractSalary: 20,000.00 to 22,000.00 /monthBenefits:Phone / Internet reimbursementHealth insuranceShift:NoIndustry:ArchitectureSpeak with the employer+91 8886017722","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=87ded50826a559ae,87ded50826a559ae,indeed,ZOHO
new,Urgent Hiring_ Zoho CRM Implementation Expert,Light Speed Web Inc.,"Coimbatore, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-11,"Job DescriptionImplement and customize ZOHO CRM and all the apps in the ZOHO Suite to make sure we can make the ZOHO apps do what our customers want. You will have strong experience working with and administering CRM / ERP systems.ResponsibilitiesImplementation, customization, and administration of suite of Zoho one applications including ZOHO CRM, Analytics, Projects, Desk, CRM, Books.Understand the business process and requirements of the team and to implement and customize various modules (CRM, Sales, Accounts, HR, etc ).Work with the support team to resolve any reported issues. Track issues and provide periodic updates.Effectively utilize module features to automate various business processes. ZOHO Social, SalesIQ, Analytics and Reports,Monitor, Control and ensure the sustained effective usage of Zoho products throughout the organization.Develop custom CRM features and functionalities in support of customer needsLead the delivery of projects and solutions to completion in a team environment while demonstrating a consultative personality, leadership mindset, and collaborative communication styleQualifications / ExperienceAround 2 -5 years of experience in CRM ImplementationGood Communication SkillsWork on Zoho, Zoho Desk, Zoho Creator, Zoho other productsRequirements : Proven experience as a Solution Architect or Solution Consultant or Project Management in ZOHO CRM.-Hands-on experience with a full cycle of CRM Consultation.Ability to train a team of 5-6 members in the modification and customization of ZOHO CRM.Job Type: Full-timeExperience:work: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Location:Coimbatore, Tamil Nadu (Preferred)Industry:Marketing","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=db8342bb9175d06b,db8342bb9175d06b,indeed,ZOHO
new,Junior Accounts Executive,Durafit Fitness Equipment's,"Tiruchchirappalli, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-15,"Responsibilities and DutiesKRA's (Key Responsibility Areas): Maintenance of Book of Accounts for the business in Zoho books.Verification and Accounting of all invoices/bills received from Vendors.Ensuring on time payments for Vendors/Customers.Managing Office Expenses.Reconciliation of Accounts Payable and Accounts Receivable.Reconciliation of Bank Accounts.Co-ordination with banks regarding company accounts, loans etc.Processing monthly GST Liability & Filing of GST Returns.Ensuring all regulatory compliance like ROC, ITR, etc.Assist in all company documentation-related work.Required Experience, Skills and QualificationsExperience: Min 6 months to 1 Year Experience.Skills: Book-Keeping knowledgeTaxes (GST)Knowledge in accounting package like Quick Books/ZOHO/XEROMS office**Qualifications: B.Com/M.Com, BBAJob Type: Full-timeExperience:Accounts / Finance: 1 year (Preferred)Location:Tiruchchirappalli, Tamil Nadu (Required)Industry:Sports","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=48958ab4517b1f6d,48958ab4517b1f6d,indeed,ZOHO
new,Customer Experience Executive,Ketto Online Ventures Pvt. Ltd.,"Andheri, Mumbai, Maharashtra",2020-01-11,"Job Summary**Responsibilities and DutiesHandling inbound queries from Kettos customers through email, chat, IVR and WhatsApp.Resolve escalations through outbound calls as and when requiredWork with the sales, finance and tech teams to resolve customer queriesProvide customer feedback to the product and sales teamsIdentify patterns and devise ideas to improve Kettos customer support ecosystemQualifications and SkillsAbility to thrive in a dynamic, fast-paced startup environment.Holding a Bachelors degree or an equivalent diploma with more than 1 year of total work experience. Prior experience of at least 6 months in a customer support role is a must.Saturdays and Sundays will be working. You will be working a 5-day workweek with any 2 weekdays off.Experience working with support tools eg. Zendesk Support, Zoho Desk, etc. is highly preferred.Strong communication skills - verbal and written. Knowing at least one language apart from English and Hindi is a strong plus.Multi-tasking ability - You can efficiently prioritise and quickly resolve multiple queries.Empathy - Ketto works with patients and their caregivers. Empathy is an essential trait.Desire to learn - Youre a highly motivated self-starter, with an eagerness to learn and grow.Open to handling queries during off-work hours, on occasion.Job Type: Full-time","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=487665a37972fed4,487665a37972fed4,indeed,ZOHO
new,Accounting Specialist,139bizops.com,"Hyderabad, Telangana",2020-01-27,"Job SummaryCPA/CAQualification with 1-5 years of experience.Shared Service Experience a plus.Prior experience with Zoho Books and other Zoho products a big PlusUnderstanding and working knowledge of GAAPDemonstrated problem solving skills and Strategic thinking.Ability to analyse data, understand trends and recommend actions.Advanced MS-Excel, Word, PowerPoint skillsJob Type: Full-timeExperience:work: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Accounting: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Secondary(10th Pass) (Preferred)","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=b1d9e6edb8e3bd3a,b1d9e6edb8e3bd3a,indeed,ZOHO
new,software Product Manager,10X Biz,"Hyderabad, Telangana",2020-01-11,"Job SummaryWho We Are*10xBiZ (https://www.10xbiz.co/):""Automation is the Game Changer in New Era As per the Forbes Magazine Published on Jan 2019 Automation expected to replace almost half of the global workforce. Multiple industries, from Manufacturing to Banking, are adopting Automation to drive productivity, safety, profitability, and quality"".We help the organizations to achieve top-notch performance by Completely automation of the business process (Sales Automation, Marketing Automation, Finance Automation, Project management, Customer Support Management etc) to enrich the full potential and effective utilization of resources to reach 10x results. We align the team and technologies for 10x results. We have helped hundreds of organizations to achieve their 10x results within a short span of time using Robust Applications which was built on Salesforce and Zoho.This Job is not for everyone. This is only for the people who believe themselves as an out of the box thinker and growth hacker, who can approach the solutions to the problems in a different way (Blue Ocean Way)Come and Join Hands With us into Creative World with Smart People who help you to grow 10x Smarter With our 10x CultureResponsibilities and Duties Product Manager one who responsible for gathering the list of features to be developed for a product by analyzing the market and competitors and problems faced by the industry and responsible to deliver the product within the stipulated time We believe a Product Manager is the person responsible for the success of a product. Product Management straddles the fence between UX, technology, and business. As a Product Manager, you will be responsible for our Products end to end. The key focus for this role is about Why and What to build. To succeed in this role, you need to be outstanding in at least one of these things and know how to get the best out of people across all three disciplines. The Product Management team works closely with our engineers to guide products from conception to launch. You should have a bias towards action and can break down complex problems. As a Product Manager, you will be part of the core of 10xbiz teamWhat do you get to do?Gain a deep understanding of customer experience, identify and fill product gaps and generate new ideas that grow market share, improve customer experience and drive growthCreate buy-ins for the product vision both internally and with key external partnersTranslate product strategy into detailed requirements and prototypesScope and prioritize activities based on business and customer impactDrive product launches including working with PR team, R&D, design, sales & marketingEvaluate promotional plans to ensure that they are consistent with product line strategy and that the message is effectively conveyedAct as a product evangelist to build awareness and understandingRepresent the company by interacting with customers to solicit feedbackAssesses market competition by comparing the company's product to competitorsAssesses product market data by calling on customers with field salespeople and evaluating sales call resultsTechnical Requirements : Business Requirement Document BRDFunctional Requirement Document FRD  Use CasesData Grid / Field MatrixGap AnalysisWireframes andPrototypeTest Case ReviewUser Acceptance TestEliciting Requirement andRequirement OrganizationUpdate StakeholdersPlanning and MonitoringPrioritize requirements and createProduct BacklogUser StoriesRequirement GatheringRequirement WorkshopWorkflow DiagramAgile Scrum toolsUnderstanding of Software Development life cycle (SDLC)Client DemonstrationKnowledge of: Waterfall Methodologies and Agile MethodologiesPrepare Business requirement Documentation and Convert into functional requirementsTools: Rally, Axure, Visio, Ms Word, Ms PowerPoint and Ms ExcelPosition Requirements: Excellent verbal and written communication skills Action oriented and seizes opportunitiesStrong analytical and problem solving skillsQuickly grasps new concepts when faced with unfamiliar tasksTechnical Aptitude and skill setGood business acumen and business process knowledgeEffectively utilizes time and organizes priorities wellBenefitsThe opportunity to learn tons at a rapidly growing startupWill always respect the IdeasWe have a policy of No Work Hour (3 times in a week ) Which will allow you to Brainstorm and Deep thinking and Idea Pitchingwill form part of Our 10x Innovative TeamEducational Qualification:  Any GraduateCTC:  2.5L - 5L Per annumNo of Positions:  2Experience: 1-3 YearsJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 250,000.00 to 500,000.00 /yearEducation:Bachelor's (Preferred)Industry:IT Operations & Helpdesk","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=210ef0ad0cf81b8d,210ef0ad0cf81b8d,indeed,ZOHO
new,Associate Sales,AIMBIX CONSULTING SERVICES,"Delhi, Delhi",2020-01-23,"Job Summary**Responsibilities and Duties** Selling products and services using solid arguments to prospective customers through cold calling. Present, promote and sell products/services using solid arguments to prospective customer. Perform cost benefit and needs analysis of existing/potential customers to meet their needs. Reach out to customer leads through cold calling. Expedite the resolution of customer problems and complaints to maximize satisfaction. Achieve agreed upon sales targets and outcomes within schedule. Coordinate sales effort with team members and other departments. Analyze the territory/markets potential, track sales and status reports. Supply management with reports on customer needs, problems, interests, competitive activities and potential for new products and services. Keep abreast of best practices and promotional trends Continuously improve through feedback.Key SkillsSales and Service Skills: The customer is always right. You will need to be able speak in a friendly way to customers and potential customers, listening to their needs and helping to buy the product.  * Communication Skills: You will need to speak to customers about a product's different features, and answer any questions they might have and convince.  * Persistence: Not every customer is going to be a sale. So maintain high patience level.  * Knowledge of Accounting & GST compliances is desired  * Preferred knowledge of Tally/Busy/Clear tax/Marg/Tax Mann/ ZoHo/ Quick Books softwareRequired Experience and QualificationsB.Com /Finance/Accounting certification/MBA/ or similar educationJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 20,000.00 to 30,000.00 /monthIndustry:Accounting","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=0ce5ac17f407da9e,0ce5ac17f407da9e,indeed,ZOHO
new,Sales Support Executive,Simpliance Technologies,"Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-01-11,"Job SummaryYou will be the Customer Champion of Simpliance to our visitors online.Responsibilities and Duties Call and connect with relevant contacts to sell Simpliance Products. Generate online leads Receive calls of potential leads and engage with them to answers queries on Simplianceand its products Co-ordinate with the sales team to meet customers at their offices Maintain the Customer Relationship Management (CRM) system of Simpliance Work on lead generation tools such as Linkedin Sales Navigator and generate new leadsRequired Experience and Qualifications A fresh graduate (females preferred) or above with excellent spoken and written English Savvy with online platforms such as Zoho, Microsoft Office etc. Flair to engage senior people with a pleasant conversationJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 280,000.00 to 300,000.00 /yearIndustry:Legal","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=369807d90efad04e,369807d90efad04e,indeed,ZOHO
new,Customer Support Executive,Extension technologies,"Delhi, Delhi",2020-02-03,"Job SummaryCommunicating with customers, making outbound calls to potential customers, and following up on leads.Understanding customers' needs and identifying sales opportunities.Answering potential customers' questions and sending additional information per email.Keeping up with product and service information and updates.Creating and maintaining a database of current and potential customers.Explaining and demonstrating features of products and services.Staying informed about competing products and services.Up selling products and services.Researching and qualifying new leads.Closing sales and achieving sales targets.Should be able to generate contact information generation (email, phone etc)Should use social media platform to generate leads.Valid Data Base generation through LinkedIn and similar websites.Data filtration and validation experience.Lead Generation through campaigns like Cold Calling and E-mails.Generating meeting with prospects.Experience in managing data using CRM.Responsibilities and DutiesHigh school diploma/Bachelors.Previous experience in an outbound call center or a related sales position preferred.Proficiency in Microsoft Office and CRM software such as Salesforce.com, zoho, etcExcellent communication skills, both verbal and written.Good organizational skills and the ability to multitask.Excellent phone and cold calling skills.Exceptional customer service skills.Strong listening and sales skills.Ability to achieve targets.Experience in managing data using CRM.Job Type: Full-timeSalary: 12,000.00 to 15,000.00 /monthExperience:Customer Service: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Client calling/cold calling: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Higher Secondary(12th Pass) (Preferred)Location:Delhi (Preferred)Language:English (Preferred)Customer issues handled:Taking new ordersTraining provided:Yes - Training providedIndustry:Software DevelopmentJob Duties:Answer incoming customer inquiriesCollaborate with management teams to stay updated on new products, services, and policiesRecord customer information within our customer service databaseEngage with clients in a friendly and professional manner while actively listening to their concernsOffer support and solutions to customers in accordance with the company's customer service policiesOther duties as requested","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=bf137ccc145b66d2,bf137ccc145b66d2,indeed,ZOHO
new,Zoho Expert,thaagam foundation,"Chennai, Tamil Nadu",2020-02-05,"Job SummaryTo Implement Zoho CRM and other Zoho Products into our companyResponsibilities and DutiesTo Implement Zoho CRM and other Zoho Products into our companyKey SkillsComputer SkillsJob Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: 300,000.00 to 500,000.00 /yearExperience:work: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Secondary(10th Pass) (Preferred)Benefits:Provident fund (PF)Paid leaves / Leave encashmentFlexible work hoursMeal card / Food couponsPhone / Internet reimbursementShift allowanceOtherHealth insuranceIndustry:Uncategorized","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=9e378f5c46bb36b3,9e378f5c46bb36b3,indeed,ZOHO
new,Zoho Developer,SoftSet Software,"Puducherry, Puducherry",2020-02-05,Job SummaryWanted Zoho Developer immediately. Interested candidate can pin me in the what's app7449093279.Job Type: Part-timeExperience:software development: 1 year (Preferred)work: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Industry:Software Development,"Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=5416e3dc131531eb,5416e3dc131531eb,indeed,ZOHO
new,Finance Executive,Hello World,"HSR Layout, Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-02-04,"Job SummaryWe are looking for a reliable Finance Executive who will be responsible for day to day accounting like posting entries in the ERP, Bank reconciliations, etc. and subsequently provide advice and guidance to ManagerResponsibilities and DutiesManaging records and receiptsReconciling daily, monthly and yearly transactionsProcessing invoicesMarking collection and payment entries in ERPProviding customer service to clients both internal & external related to accountingResolve financial disputes raised by the customer service and sales teamsBeing a key point of contact for other departments on financial and accounting mattersSupporting the Finance Manager and executives with projects and tasks when requiredTo ensure payment of advance taxes, proper tax deducted at source and payment of public owings related to all the properties in time.Ensure preparation and filing of TDS & GST Returns on time.Establish and maintain financial policies and procedures for the companyUnderstand and adhere to financial regulations and legislation.Liase with auditors to ensure appropriate monitoring of company finances is maintained.Any other work as and when assigned to you by your Manager.Qualifications and SkillsA person should have 2 / 3 years of experience with B.Com / M.Com or equivalentProficient user of finance software preferably in ZohoStrong interpersonal, communication and presentation skillsWorking knowledge of MS Office (excel, word, etc)CA internsJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 450,000.00 to 500,000.00 /yearExperience:total work: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Required)Benefits:Health insuranceProvident fund (PF)Paid leaves / Leave encashmentMeal card / Food couponsFlexible work hoursIndustry:Real Estate","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=d3cbc8a27324c505,d3cbc8a27324c505,indeed,ZOHO
new,Accounts Executive | Koramangala | Freshers,PropertyAngel management Pvt Ltd.,"Koramangala, Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-02-04,"Job SummaryAbout the CompanyPropertyAngel is a leading Luxury property management company, with properties across Bangalore, Chennai and Goa. We are a young startup, but extremely fast growing, offering candidates a platform for exponential career growth. The office is based in Koramangala.As the city's leading Luxury Property Management firm, our portfolio covers units of top builders, such as Adarsh, Prestige, Mantri, Salarpuria, Shobha and more. Our clients are spread across the US, Europe, the Middle East, South Asia. Our corporate networks span Honda, Mitsubishi, Singapore Airlines, CMS, and more. Headquartered in Bangalore, we also manage units in Chennai, Goa and Delhi.Job SummaryWe are looking for an Accounts Executive for our fast-growing Property Management firm.We are looking for a bright, well-spoken, well organized, hardworking go-getter looking for career growth.Responsibilities and DutiesYour responsibilities would include:Maintaining Accounting Records/BookkeepingMaintain incoming and outgoing records. Responsibilities include deposit and rent collection; payments for vendors, association maintenance, utility bills across all properties; manage petty cash; update financial dashboards; generate rent receipts. Manage rental and deposit payments.Statutory PaymentsEnsure that TDS, Service Tax payments are made in a timely manner and the same is filed.Documentation/taxesTrack all property tax payments, khata/Bescom transfers, etc.Petty Cash & Vendor Accounts handlingQualifications and SkillsRequirements: Knowledge of accounting applications like Zoho or Tally.Very well organizedShould live close to office Location at Koramangala.Education and Experience: Minimum  Bachelors Degree in Commerce/allied subjects, or certified training for Accounts ExecutiveCandidates with 0 to 1 years of experience can apply.Job Type: Full-timeBenefitsHealth InsuranceTrainingFull TimeJob Type: Full-timeExperience:account executive: 1 year (Preferred)Location:Koramangala, Bengaluru, Karnataka (Preferred)Benefits:Health insuranceFlexible work hoursIndustry:Real Estate","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=535533fc9b452bb6,535533fc9b452bb6,indeed,ZOHO
new,Travel Product Specialists,SUVdigital,"Gurgaon, Haryana",2020-01-29,"Job SummaryExperienced in creating global travel packages?**You could be part of our Product team with your results-driven approach as a Travel Product Specialist. We are startup based in Sydney, setting up a office in Delhi soon. We are looking for 5 years experienced in the Industry.Responsibilities and DutiesA strong track record as a Travel Product Specialist, with preference to having travel industry experienceExtensive network of hotel contacts Internationally.Strong Knoweldge of Negotiation with Hotels, Transfers, ActivitesWorked with group travelling packages.People with a PASSION for Travel and unique destinations.People with an EYE for DETAIL and accuracyPeople who are CONFIDENT communicators, friendly and personable when on the phone, and clear and concise when writing an emailApplicants with knowledge of Tour plan, previous experience with product and data loading, or first-hand travel experience in the destinations we specialise in, like Bali, Fiji, Hawaii, Dubai, Maldivies, Malaysia, Singapore, Sri Lanka, Europe, UK,USA may have an advantage.Strong negotiation and communication skills with ability to build and nurture client relationsAbility to work in the shift based timings.Key SkillsStrong knowledge of Geographical location, CRM Software, Hotel ManagementRequired Experience and QualificationsBachelor's degreePrevious Travel Product Specialist Experience MandatoryZoho CRM / Sales Force / HubspotJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 400,000.00 to 550,000.00 /yearExperience:work: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 3 years (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Industry:Hospitality & Tourism","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=3cbe821c7f55c247,3cbe821c7f55c247,indeed,ZOHO
new,Head of Customer Support.,Thinvent Technologies Private Limited,"Gurgaon, Haryana",2020-02-10,"Job SummaryHead of Customer Support.Responsibilities and DutiesPlan, develop and implement customer service policies, strategies, and processes for the support team.Generate tickets from Zoho Desk or other ticket generating systems and assign them to the particular support engineer.Managing and leading the support team with the objective of ensuring all tickets are analyzed and resolved.Perform root cause analysis of issues.Help manage the work allocation of project team members.Regular project tracking and status reporting to management.Should be able to solve issues related to Linux.Qualifications and SkillsUG:  Any Graduate Engineer - Any SpecializationCandidate with good communication skills will be preferred.Candidate with knowledge of Linux will be preferred.Job Types: Full-time, Fresher, Walk-InExperience:Linux: 1 year (Preferred)Required travel:25% (Preferred)Benefits:Phone / Internet reimbursementTravel allowanceHealth insuranceSelection rounds:HR InterviewTechnical InterviewIndustry:Software Development","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=bcdc781aa88f183c,bcdc781aa88f183c,indeed,ZOHO
new,Asst Backend Manager,PaintMyWalls,"Marathahalli, Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-01-30,"Job SummaryJD : Candidate must be Graduate and1. Must be having good experience in Zoho CRM software, excel2. Must be having experience in Sales as he needs to do Quotation followups with customers3. Must be having interest in Tele calling as he may require calling in absence of any telecaller (If its is require in emergency)4. Must be having clear understanding of Customer care and customer expetations, as he/she needs to work closly with Customer relation managers to keep monitoring of Sales executives if they are following SOP point to point while handling customersJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 20,000.00 to 25,000.00 /monthExperience:retail management: 1 year (Preferred)work: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Secondary(10th Pass) (Preferred)Benefits:Health insuranceIndustry:Civil Engineering","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=c3b6f50a24996e73,c3b6f50a24996e73,indeed,ZOHO
new,Zoho(Creator) Module Experience,Chaitanya Energy Private Limited,"Hyderabad, Telangana",2020-01-27,"Required Experience, Skills and QualificationsExperience of 1 to 3 years in Zoho Creator developmentExpertise in 1 or more Zoho modules (Creator)Experience in one or more within Zoho modules - development, configuration, Integration, administration, maintenanceExperience or knowledge in REST, SOAP APIs is an advantage.Job Type: Full-timeSalary: 300,000.00 /yearExperience:work: 2 years (Preferred)zoho: 2 years (Preferred)total work: 3 years (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Industry:Construction","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=d924bfb17264aca0,d924bfb17264aca0,indeed,ZOHO
new,Sr. Client Servicing Manager,FRAME Events & Productions,"Andheri, Mumbai, Maharashtra",2020-02-10,"Job SummaryAbility to handle events and accounts for the companyCommunicate, present and influence all levels of the organizationTo manage and execute multiple key accounts and event projectsSpearhead meetings and presentation brief with creative and innovative out of box thinking.Identify trendsetter ideas by researching industry and related events, publications, and announcements.Passion to over achieve targets of 35% Margin for every eventGreat negotiating skills and closing the deals in line with the company standardsWillingness to travel. Travelling onsite for execution, coordinating with vendors as per specification and within time lines and with short notice.Research on recent developments in the event industry, make economic and market forecast.Proactively handle any arising issues and troubleshoot any emerging problems on the event dayEfficient risk management skills requiredTrack and manage PO and billing /invoicing of monthly event expenses.Responsible for establishing relationship with the clients of the company.Ensuring that the needs of the clients are met so that they are satisfiedResponsible for attending meetings with clients or interacting with them via telephone or written communication.Responsible for overcoming the resistance of the clients and their objections to products.Responsible for maintaining accurate data base about current as well as potential clients.Responsible for advising the higher management about the client needs.Responsible for taking enquiry details from client accurately.Achieving 100% client satisfaction and client retentionResponsible for preparing and providing weekly scheduled of planned activities through ZOHO CRMActive problem solving skills, proactive and passionate personalityCustomer FocusAbility to handle work pressureExcellent presentation skills and well knowledgeable in Microsoft PPTJob Type: Full-timeExperience:work: 2 years (Preferred)total work: 4 years (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Industry:Media & Communications","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=d9eedac02282efb1,d9eedac02282efb1,indeed,ZOHO
new,Assistant Accountant,PROSCUBA,"Puducherry, Puducherry",2020-02-01,"Responsibilities and DutiesServe as the lead point of contact for all customer account management mattersBuild and maintain strong, long-lasting client relationshipsNegotiate contracts and close agreements to maximize profitsDevelop trusted advisor relationships with key accounts, customer stakeholders and executive sponsorsEnsure the timely and successful delivery of our solutions according to customer needs and objectivesClearly communicate the progress of monthly/quarterly initiatives to internal and external stakeholdersDevelop new business with existing clients and/or identify areas of improvement to meet sales quotasForecast and track key account metrics (e.g. quarterly sales results and annual forecasts)Prepare reports on account statusCollaborate with sales team to identify and grow opportunities within territoryAssist with challenging client requests or issue escalations as neededQualifications and SkillsProven work experience as an Account Manager, Key Account Manager, Sales Account Manager, Junior Account Manager or relevant roleDemonstrable ability to communicate, present and influence key stakeholders at all levels of an organization, including executive and C-levelSolid experience with CRM software (e.g. Salesforce, Zoho CRM or HubSpot) and MS Office (particularly MS Excel)Experience delivering client-focused solutions to customer needsProven ability to juggle multiple account management projects at a time, while maintaining sharp attention to detailExcellent listening, negotiation and presentation abilitiesStrong verbal and written communication skillsBenefitsBreakfast and Lunch will be provided by the companyJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 25,000.00 to 40,000.00 /monthExperience:work: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Accounting: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Benefits:OtherIndustry:MarketingJob Duties:Monitoring company accounts and conducting quarterly reviewsAccounts payableAccounts receivableProfit-and-loss statementsTax preparationExpense reportsCost reduction proposalsPayrollBudgetsInternal audits for policy adherenceInternal audits for tax codesPresenting budgets and reports to upper managementAdditional Duties:RecordkeepingAccount reconciliationInvoice processingRunning errands (bank deposits, etc.)Data entry","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=73de432be545a1e5,73de432be545a1e5,indeed,ZOHO
new,Tele calling Associate,The/Nudge Foundation,"Marathahalli, Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-02-06,"Experience: 0-2 yrsType Of Employment: Full time employment (6 days a week)Salary: As per industry standardsProfessional Qualification: Bachelors in Psychology/Masters In Social Work/PUC Pass/GraduateAge: 20-25 yrsAbout Gurukul:Gurukul is an educational institution that was started in 2015 by The/Nudge Foundation to help the most underprivileged youth of the country train themselves on a specific skill and get employment opportunities. We have trained more than 1500 students from all over Karnataka in the last 2 years.About life/guard:The life/guard team at The/Nudge Foundation is responsible for supporting Gurukul alumni in their jobs. We do this by working directly with the beneficiaries and by providing a breadth of services to them such as affordable housing, counselling support, documentation support, financial assistance and more. These services ensure that the Gurukul student, who is migrating from rural parts of the country to the city for his/her first job, has everything he/she needs to adjust to the new environment, do well in their jobs and achieve career growth.At The/Nudge you will:Speak to at least 40-50 Gurukul alumni in a day through both inbound and outbound callsCollect alumni data such as job retention statistics, survey questionnaire responses and report to the team lead on a daily basisAddress concerns raised by alumni through counselling support and by leveraging life/guard field teamDocument and report daily work on Zoho CRM platform and MS excel trackersSkills Required:Fluency in spoken Kannada and HindiProficiency in using MS Excel is preferableAbility to motive and counsel youth from an underprivileged backgroundYou need toHave an attitude of learningStrong empathy for underprivileged communitiesBe comfortable with working in a high paced environment and in a results-oriented organisationJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 14,500.00 to 19,000.00 /monthExperience:Cold Calling: 1 year (Preferred)sales: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Higher Secondary(12th Pass) (Preferred)Language:Telugu/Hindi (Preferred)Kannada (Required)Benefits:Health insurancePaid leaves / Leave encashmentTravel allowanceFlexible work hoursPhone / Internet reimbursementShift:Yes - Day ShiftIndustry:Education & Instruction","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=e29a44f547e30efa,e29a44f547e30efa,indeed,ZOHO
new,"Webmaster, Web Hosting Technical Support Executive  Bangalo...",Regent Research Writing Pvt Ltd,"Richmond Rd, Karnataka",2020-01-24,"Job Summary1.Domain, Hosting management, Server Management- disk space, server usage management, backups, configuration, renewals, L1 Tech support2.Installation of Web panels - WHM/WHMCS, Cpanel, Plesk3.Basic Troubleshooting,Monitoring, Backup4.Doing Email configuration-Outlook, Zoho and GSuiteResponsibilities and Duties1. Should be aware of Linux terminal commands, shell scripting, Cloud Platforms - AWS & Azure2.Must handle support ticket for Linux / windows Hosting Clients on call / ticket / chat3.Practical knowledge of WHM / CPanel / plesk / WHMCS is mustJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 25,000.00 to 30,000.00 /monthExperience:Technical Support: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Benefits:Provident fund (PF)Paid leaves / Leave encashmentFlexible work hoursIndustry:Education & Instruction","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=525ec84128d494a3,525ec84128d494a3,indeed,ZOHO
new,Business Development Manager,Techvaria Solutions Pvt ltd-www.techvaria.com,"Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-01-17,"Job SummaryNote: Candidates please read the JD before applying.We are looking to hire a senior Business Development Manager head to work with our ERP delivery team to drive and develop our strong footing in the Oracle NetSuite and Zoho ERP for Private Sector customers in India.This role is for a dynamic and enthusiastic Business Development Manager to join our Bangalore team, specialising in the sale of enterprise services and solutions both implementation projects and recurring managed services. The role has a strong entrepreneurial flavour and will suit an individual who has the drive to carve out their own niche while having the support of a successful delivery teams behind them.You will be an excellent communicator who knows how to work with senior level stakeholders in the private sector. You will have a track record of selling IT business-led solutions in ERP in India or outside India. You will naturally be a self-starter with the ability to work on your own initiative with minimum direction.Responsibilities and Duties- Identification of new opportunities and markets for the Oracle NetSuite ERP Practice through market knowledge, relationships and through targeted marketing campaigns, events and direct calling initiatives.- Working close with Oracle NetSuite team for speedier project closures- - Preparation and delivery of presentations and solution proposals and the active management of the full sales cycle.- Contract negotiation covering license software, consulting services, fixed price applications development/Implementation and managed services contracts.Key Skills02-05 years experience in the IT industry selling Enterprise solutions is must.  * Experience of business development/sales processes, including the use of pilots, pre-sales, demonstrations and implementations  * A demonstrable understanding of the software development life cycle from envisioning to solution implementation to managed services.  * A clear and demonstrable track record of sales with achievement of targets Personal Attributes: - Customer focused with excellent communication, presentation and interpersonal skills. - Excellent verbal and written communication - Ability to work and collaborate productively across sales, marketing, sales support and customer delivery teams, even when under pressure - Ambitious, confident, enthusiastic individual with a can-do attitudeRequired Experience and QualificationsEnterprise software sales/consultingB.E/MBABenefitsPF/Paid Leaves/CommisionsJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 300,000.00 to 700,000.00 /yearExperience:work: 1 year (Required)total work: 2 years (Required)Education:Bachelor's (Required)Sales Experience:Lead Generation (Required)Benefits:Paid leaves / Leave encashmentProvident fund (PF)OtherSales role:AcquisitionRetentionTypical team size:2-3Travel requirements:Yes - ~25%Industry:Software Development","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=c95175f9a2c8bb7a,c95175f9a2c8bb7a,indeed,ZOHO
new,Account Manager,Proscuba,"Pondicherry Ho., Puducherry",2020-01-31,"Responsibilities and DutiesResponsibilitiesServe as the lead point of contact for all customer account management mattersBuild and maintain strong, long-lasting client relationshipsNegotiate contracts and close agreements to maximize profitsDevelop trusted advisor relationships with key accounts, customer stakeholders and executive sponsorsEnsure the timely and successful delivery of our solutions according to customer needs and objectivesClearly communicate the progress of monthly/quarterly initiatives to internal and external stakeholdersDevelop new business with existing clients and/or identify areas of improvement to meet sales quotasForecast and track key account metrics (e.g. quarterly sales results and annual forecasts)Prepare reports on account statusCollaborate with sales team to identify and grow opportunities within territoryAssist with challenging client requests or issue escalations as neededRequired Experience and QualificationsProven work experience as an Account Manager, Key Account Manager, Sales Account ManagerDemonstrable ability to communicate, present and influence key stakeholders at all levels of an organization, including executive and C-levelSolid experience with CRM software (e.g. Zoho CRM ) and MS Office (particularly MS Excel), TallyExperience delivering client-focused solutions to customer needsProven ability to juggle multiple account management projects at a time, while maintaining sharp attention to detailExcellent listening, negotiation and presentation abilitiesStrong verbal and written communication skillsBenefitsBreakfast and Lunch will be providedJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 25,000.00 to 45,000.00 /monthExperience:management: 1 year (Preferred)work: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Accounting: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Benefits:Travel allowanceIndustry:MarketingJob Duties:Manage multiple accounts, ensuring that a high level of customer retention and satisfaction is maintainedMeet monthly quotasEngage with multiple customers on a daily basis by reaching out to new clients, and by developing campaigns for maintaining customer loyaltyImplement strategies for retaining customers requesting to terminate or downgrade their accountRecord changes to customer accounts, updating service packages, adding accounts, and removing accounts as neededOther duties as requested","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=a886ee877f1b3a2d,a886ee877f1b3a2d,indeed,ZOHO
new,Zoho Developer,Extension technologies,"Delhi, Delhi",2020-02-07,"Job SummaryWe are hiring Zoho Developer 2-4 years experience with ZOHO CRM platforms in configuration, customisation, integration and administration.Responsibilities and DutiesImplementation, customization, and administration of suite of Zoho one applications including Creators, Projects, Desk, CRM, Books, Expense.Understand the business process and requirements of the team and to implement and customize various modules.Develop custom workflows and handy with Deluge. Track issues and provide periodic updates.Create and develop CRM according to the requirementEnsure speedy development in all the modulesCreate custom tools and scripts to automate the manual business processes, within or outsideShould be able to manage the entire tool efficientlyJob Type: Full-timeExperience:total work: 1 year (Preferred)zoho developer: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Location:Delhi (Preferred)Industry:Software Development","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=649df159f56297c8,649df159f56297c8,indeed,ZOHO
new,Zoho Developer,Digital Marketing Careers,"Noida, Uttar Pradesh",2020-01-19,"Job SummaryJob DescriptionJob Summary1. Implementation, customisation and administration of Zoho applications including Creators, Orchestly, Flow, Projects, CRM, Books.2. Understand the business process and requirements of the team and to implement and customise various process and modules.3. Develop custom workflows and support the team to resolve any reported issues.4. Effectively utilize modules features to automate various business processes.5. Monitor, Control and ensure the sustained effective usage of Zoho products throughout the organisation.Responsibilities and Duties1. Create and develop the process flow according to the requirement2. Create custom tools and scripts to automate the manual business processes.Required Experience and Qualifications1. 6 Months to 2 Years experience with Zoho CRM, Zoho Creator2. Good Development Knowledge Zoho CRMKey Skillsdevelopment, InstallationRequired Experience and Qualifications0-2 yearsBenefitsOthersJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 30,000.00 /monthExperience:work: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Benefits:Paid leaves / Leave encashmentHealth insuranceFlexible work hoursPhone / Internet reimbursementOtherHousing rent subsidy:YesIndustry:Industrial Engineering","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=e5c729946dae8db2,e5c729946dae8db2,indeed,ZOHO
new,Zoho developer,Tzar Industries Pvt Ltd,"Tiruchchirappalli, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-11,"Job SummaryJob Title:  Zoho DeveloperLocation:  TrichyKRAs: Implementation of Zoho one applications including CRM, Books, Projects and more.Automate any manual business process within or outside Zoho.Develop and maintain all the websites of Durafit.Integration of Zoho with Third party application like Amazon, Flipkart, SMS magic.Skill sets required: HTML, JavaScript, PHPQualifications & Experience Required/Preferred: Bachelor / Master's degree in CS/ME/IT/ Related Technology.Bonus if you have experience with;Knowledge of RESTful APIsExperience in SalesForce or Zoho Applications.Ecommerce ExposureJob Types: Full-time, Fresher, Walk-InExperience:SalesForce or Zoho Applications: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Selection rounds:Written testHR InterviewTechnical InterviewIndustry:Sports","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=0d6ad4b374297463,0d6ad4b374297463,indeed,ZOHO
new,Technical Support Engineer,Affinity Technology Solutions,"Mumbai, Maharashtra",2020-02-05,"-Strong on basic troubleshooting of Servers, Desktop & Laptop Hardware.-Strong on MS Windows Server & Desktop OS Installation & Deployments.-Sound knowledge on MS Active Directory, ADFS, DHCP, DNS & Exchange Server.-Sound knowledge of Office 365, G-Suite, Zoho & other POP / IMAP based email systems.-Sound knowledge of VMware & Hyper-V platforms.-Understanding on Public Cloud like Azure & AWS.-Knowledge and working experience on Endpoint Security Solution like SEP / Trend Micro / McAfee-Knowledge and working experience on Firewall & UTM appliances.-Knowledge and working experience of Backup Solutions like Acronis / Commvault / Veeam.-Knowledge and working experience on Infrastructure / Platform migration lifecycles shall be preferred.Job Type: Full-timeSalary: 18,000.00 to 25,000.00 /monthEducation:Bachelor's (Required)Location:Mumbai, Maharashtra (Required)Language:English & Hindi (Required)Benefits:Paid leaves / Leave encashmentIndustry:IT Operations & Helpdesk","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=ff8396d2b234f7b2,ff8396d2b234f7b2,indeed,ZOHO
new,Business Analyst,Nexivo Consulting Pvt Ltd,"Hyderabad, Telangana",2020-01-23,"Job SummaryThe Zoho Specialist/Business Analyst/Developer works directly within our solutions team to design, build, deploy, and services of ZOHO products that meet client needs. The Zoho Specialist/ Developer performs a range of activities that span traditional product and service roles, including CRM, Creator, People, Recruit. Our BA will be an active advisor to both our customers and our product team: they are data curious, learning-oriented, and enjoy analytical problem solving while collaborating with other team members to solve a variety of business problems.Responsibilities and DutiesCollaborate internally and with customers from across several functional areas to understand key functional needs and translate these needs into the creation of new product features and enhancements to existing product featuresManage roll-out of new product features to customers, including training relevant users and communicating updates with managementMigrate data from different systems into Zoho One or other platformsExecution of new functionality such as layouts, custom objects, and fields, reports and dashboardsSchedule and manage emailed reports to client sales teamsCollaborate with SFDC architect/developer as needed to test new functionality and implement sandbox change setsEnsure data quality in customer deliverables via rigorous quality review prior to releaseDesign and build the user functionality on customer-facing layer of our product, including various role interfaces and the creation of reports and dashboards as neededQualifications and SkillsExperience in CRM or software deployment is a mustAbility to learn new technology and take creative approaches to problem-solving and a relentless passion for qualityTrack record of working in teams and managing customer-focused projectsExcellent written and oral communicationJob Type: Full-timeExperience:business analyst: 1 year (Required)work: 1 year (Required)total work: 1 year (Required)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Language:English (Required)Telugu (Required)Hindi (Required)Benefits:OtherPaid leaves / Leave encashmentIndustry:Software Development","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=c446fad6789e1dc4,c446fad6789e1dc4,indeed,ZOHO
new,Application Developer,PIXEL STUDIOS PVT LTD,"Chennai, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-28,"The Senior Application Developer play a key role in building the next generation of ecommerce, mobile, and social sites. Senior developers design, maintain and deploy software applications to meet user and business needs. This role works directly with our designers and clients to create cutting-edge experiences across a variety of platforms and technologies.Technology StackExpertise in PHP MVC frameworkExperience in Ajax / JQuery framework implementationLaravel / Code Igniter frameworkSQL / Mysql databaseBootstrap / Angular JSRest API Web servicesMain Task &ResponsibilitiesAble to work on building of web, ecommerce, and mobile applicationsParticipate with developer team members in shaping user experiences through demonstrating latest technology tools, constraints, and interfacesMaintain knowledge of current web and mobile technologies and best practicesCreate custom system-to-system interfaces through dataAssist clients in deployment process of webLearn new languages and platforms quicklyResponsible for the analysis, design, implementation, and support of business critical systemsZoho entries has to update dailyUpdating Quality Records of the organizationReporting to your higher authority on a periodical basisExpected ParametersAnalytical and knowledgeableSupporting and Handling critical projectsKnowledge in debugging and resolving the issuesCoordinating with testing team to closing the testing scenariosDomain/application/technology knowledge and willingness to learnKnowledge in writing Rest APIsExpert level in PHP with MVC frameworksKnowledge in Laravel frameworkAble to write complicate queries in optimizing the databaseAble to handle multiple projects in parallelWorking knowledge and desire to master HTML5 and emerging technologiesJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 32,000.00 to 45,000.00 /monthExperience:work: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Developer: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=c7726ed69af0ac75,c7726ed69af0ac75,indeed,ZOHO
new,Marketing & Event Manager,Panther planner,"Janakpuri, Delhi, Delhi",2020-02-06,"Job SummaryUrgent hiring for Janakpuri DelhiJob Summary: Job Description : **Cold CallsGenerate LeadTravelling Delhi & NCRHotel Bookings (Domestic & International)Itinerary for Group BookingsGeographical KnowledgeGood Communication SkillsNegotiation SkillsThis position is responsible for arranging all MICE (including leisure Group) operations and RFP preparation, working with the sales manager/representative to promote our services and increase sales, performing data analysis, and engaging in quality assurance as well as customer service activities.The ideal candidate will fully understand both the company and departmental goals and assist the manager in achieving them. Responsibilities also include destination research, developing ideas to increase business, and creating promotional ideas to expose our product and services to clients. It also requires selling TCC preferred carriers and other preferred vendors.**Responsibilities and DutiesEssential Functions: Conduct overall group operations including proposal preparation, manifest creation, cost management, and air and land arrangements.Conduct thorough financial management for MICE operations to maximize revenue.Arrangement of airline reservations, hotels, and other travel related arrangements for MICE customers.Look for every opportunity to sell TCC preferred carriers, hotel and other preferred vendors to maximize commission revenue.Serve as tour escort as needed.Plan and conduct site inspections for potential venues for MICE business.Assist Sales Manager with sales activities and operations.Effectively utilize marketing resources such as Cvent, RegOnline.Effectively utilize sales resources such as Zoho, iBank.Update job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities.Participate in outbound group/incentive sales strategy and outreachDevelop marketing and promotional materials to promote KIE group and incentive services.Conduct additional business tasks/special projects in addition to above essential functions as needed.Qualifications and SkillsQualifications: College degree preferredMICE operation experience is preferred TCC MICE CoordinatorTravel industry operation background is helpfulBilingual desirableComputer & PC literate with working knowledge of ExcelApollo experience preferredProficient in communication with a wide range of peopleAbility to multi-taskBenefitssalary 20k to 38kexp - 1 years to 2 yearscall@9289842661,8810309929Job Type: Full-timeSalary: 20,000.00 to 32,000.00 /monthExperience:work: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Event Management: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Industry:Hospitality & Tourism","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=c9bea8af209e8fe1,c9bea8af209e8fe1,indeed,ZOHO
new,HR and Admin Executive,proficio advisors Private Limited,"Mumbai, Maharashtra",2020-02-10,"Responsibilities and DutiesJob Description: JD Preparation, getting it approved and Posting jobs on websites. Conducting Telephonic and face to face interview Joining formalities and induction. Documentation of employee files Bank Account opening Attendance consolidation Salary Calculation and processing Preparing pay slips Dealing with employee queries. Following up with employees for weekly timesheet and other data Birthday Celebrations and other team activities Exit Formalities OPE preparation of & calculation Employee monthly / quarterly TDS calculation, Involvement Declaration Employee annual appraisal, Bonus calculation in jointly with business head.. Employee career planning. Zoho implementation and Review. Planning of employee engagement activitiesAdministration Stationery arrangement IT Support and Backup; data cloud migration ,hardware update & Integration Arranging for Visiting Cards Asset Numbering and Maintaining asset register Rental Agreement Finalization Other General Office Activity. Employee manual update & Discussion with team (Joining & Routine). Employee Orientation and Presentation. Team management of Admin / account/ office boyJob Type: Part-timeSalary: 10,000.00 to 15,000.00 /monthExperience:work: 1 year (Required)total work: 1 year (Required)Human Resources: 1 year (Required)Education:Master's (Preferred)Industry:Banking & Finance","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=4f56ddeff0d26276,4f56ddeff0d26276,indeed,ZOHO
new,Center Head/ADMIN-Ex Serviceman Preferred,Innvy IT Solution,"Chinchwad, Pune, Maharashtra",2020-01-26,"Job SummaryJob DescriptionRoles & Responsibilities: -Daily Bank Deposition (In between 1 PM to 3 PM)Center HygineDaily Work Allocation Of Each & Every EmployeeMonitor Daily Zoho Updation Inflow & OutflowLeaves Allotment To Be Done By Center Manager With The Help Of HOResolve Center Queries With The Help Of HOFollow The Budget SheetTo achieve budgeted targetsMeetings with team on daily basisCoordinate With (Center) Admin, Sales & Medical TeamSend Requirements (Medical & General) To HO MonthlyMotivating the team for sales and helping them to achieve their goalsInteraction with clients and handling the escalations and concerns of clients.Should maintain high level of professional environment in CenterProper Documentation Of Procedures Done In Igraft Post Procedure PanelEach Queries Should Come To HO From Center Manager OnlyTo Monitor Weather Admin, Sales & Medical Teams KRA Followed By Them, Or To Help & Guide Them So That The KRA Should Follow.1st Of Every Month PRP Sheet, Consent Form Sent To HO With SignConsultation Feedback Has To Be Update In Consultation Module Panel On Daily BasisResponsibilities and DutiesJob DescriptionRoles & Responsibilities: -Daily Bank Deposition (In between 1 PM to 3 PM)Center HygineDaily Work Allocation Of Each & Every EmployeeMonitor Daily Zoho Updation Inflow & OutflowLeaves Allotment To Be Done By Center Manager With The Help Of HOResolve Center Queries With The Help Of HOFollow The Budget SheetTo achieve budgeted targetsMeetings with team on daily basisCoordinate With (Center) Admin, Sales & Medical TeamSend Requirements (Medical & General) To HO MonthlyMotivating the team for sales and helping them to achieve their goalsInteraction with clients and handling the escalations and concerns of clients.Should maintain high level of professional environment in CenterProper Documentation Of Procedures Done In Igraft Post Procedure PanelEach Queries Should Come To HO From Center Manager OnlyTo Monitor Weather Admin, Sales & Medical Teams KRA Followed By Them, Or To Help & Guide Them So That The KRA Should Follow.1st Of Every Month PRP Sheet, Consent Form Sent To HO With SignConsultation Feedback Has To Be Update In Consultation Module Panel On Daily BasisKey SkillsGood Communications, Basic Computer KnowledgeRequired Experience and QualificationsQualification: GraduateBenefitsSalary + IncentiveJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 15,000.00 to 20,000.00 /yearExperience:total work: 1 year (Preferred)Industry:Beauty & Wellness","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=2aa681843d3eebea,2aa681843d3eebea,indeed,ZOHO
new,Charted Accountant,GoKwik Technologies Private Limited,"Malad, Mumbai, Maharashtra",2020-02-07,"Job SummaryResponsible for managing the overall accounting and finance function of the companies. Leading a team of accountants and overseeing their activities. Working knowledge of indirect tax , awareness about direct taxes. Also knowledge to incorporate new company process.Responsibilities and DutiesGST returns and reconciliationTDS returns and reconciliationLedger reconciliationsTCS workingsDebtors and creditors updatesKey SkillsTally, Quickbook or Zoho CRM invoice Software, MS Office, Excel, Mailing, AccountingRequired Experience and QualificationsMinimum Two YearsJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 20,000.00 to 25,000.00 /monthExperience:Tally: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Accounting: 1 year (Preferred)quickbooks: 1 year (Preferred)Licence:CA-Inter (Preferred)Benefits:Provident fund (PF)Paid leaves / Leave encashmentPhone / Internet reimbursementIndustry:Software DevelopmentJob Duties:Monitoring company accounts and conducting quarterly reviewsAccounts payableAccounts receivableProfit-and-loss statementsTax preparationExpense reportsCost reduction proposalsPayrollBudgetsInternal audits for policy adherenceInternal audits for tax codesPresenting budgets and reports to upper managementAdditional Duties:Account reconciliationInvoice processingRecordkeepingRunning errands (bank deposits, etc.)Data entry","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=fe9007ce1c983583,fe9007ce1c983583,indeed,ZOHO
new,BDM- Enterprise Accounts,Yakkaspace Services Pvt. Ltd.,"Thanjavur, Tamil Nadu",2020-02-06,"Job SummaryA good conceptual knowledge on IT Infrastructure (Cloud/Server/Storage/Network/Security/ DC Build & Operation, Surveillance etc. & IT Service Management).Knowledge and experience in IT Solution selling; IT Infrastructure management services will be an added advantage.Capability to translate the customer business issues into IT Infrastructure requirements.Engage with the customer, identify triggers, identify key IT issues which impact the business and make recommendations to customer.Develop sales strategies and business growth plan.Deal with existing and new major customer accounts with minimal supervision.Will work together with solution engineering team, interface and negotiate with the customer and their consultants.The successful candidate will have 4-7 years experience in IT Infrastructure/Networking/Security/IT solution sales.Must have exposure to dealing with Senior level professionals like CTO and IT Head.Ability to manage a demanding workload, balance multiple tasks and switch gears while maintaining priorities.Negotiation skills, resource stewardship and an ability to handleSource and mine database of qualified prospects from various web directories, social networks, and LinkedInResponsible for creating new opportunities consistently & meeting pipeline and revenue goalsCreate daily / weekly / monthly calling plans to make sure sales team have a steady pipeline for appointmentsResponsibilities and DutiesSourcing new sales opportunities through inbound lead follow-up and outbound cold calls and emailsUnderstanding customer needs and requirementsRouting qualified opportunities to the appropriate sales executives for further development and closureClose sales and achieve quarterly quotasResearch accounts, identify key players and generate interestMaintain and expand your database of prospects within your assigned territoryTeam with channel partners to build pipeline and close dealsPerform effective online demos to prospectsRequired Experience and QualificationsExcellent communication skills; speaking, writing, listening.Articulate and persuasive; can communicate difficult and complex matters in a straightforward, transparent mannerStrong organizational, analytical, detailed planning and project management skills.Ability to grasp concepts quickly, think beyond traditional methods to exceed clients expectationsProactive and self-motivated. Action bias with a strong sense of urgencyGenerate new database & mining existing database, market research, referrals driving.Generate & Maintain strong sales funnel all the time.Proven inside sales experienceTrack record of achieving sales target consistentlyStrong phone presence and experience dialing 30-50 calls per dayProficient with corporate productivity and web presentation toolsExperience working with CRM, preferably Zoho CRMExcellent verbal and written communications skillsAbility to multi-task, prioritize, and manage time effectivelyMust have been exposed to corporate/PSU/DRDO/BFSI/Pharma segment sales acumen.Specifically dealing with CTO and IT Head will be an added advantage.Market study in terms of competition mapping, market intelligence and market share.Generate and maintain a strong sales funnel, prepare customized proposal presentations to provide the strategy and solutions for various clientele.Keen market insight to preempt market needs and develop and implement strategies for new products and services accordingly.Job Type: Full-timeExperience:total work: 5 years (Preferred)Industry:IT Operations & Helpdesk","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=2b33b9c297080971,2b33b9c297080971,indeed,ZOHO
new,Finance & Accounts Officer,MakersCart (TheYellowBag),"Madurai, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-11,"Job SummaryWe are a fast growing mid sized production based organizationWe are looking for an dynamic, self driven individual who could setup an Accounts department in consultation with our advisorsWithin the organization, candidate should independently handle Accounts function and build processesResponsibilities and DutiesCash management, Accounts payable, Accounts Receivable, Day to day entries updating in software, Sales, Purchase, Inventory.Daily, weekly & Monthly reports.Preparing MIS ReportsShould have good knowledge in cash and bank operation,Salary Processing and auditsKey Skillszoho books, tally, excel, microsoft, Microsoft ExcelRequired Experience and Qualifications- Formal Accounts education is a plus- Candidates preparing for CA and who would want to take up a challenge of setting up an accounts function are also welcome to applyBenefits- A happy working environment with challenges and opportunities to upgrade your skillsJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 10,000.00 to 18,000.00 /monthExperience:account executive: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Location:Madurai, Tamil Nadu (Preferred)Industry:Accounting","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=2a52e119558630aa,2a52e119558630aa,indeed,ZOHO
new,Project Co-Ordinator / Manager (Construction),Sudyog InfraProjects Private Limited,"New Delhi, Delhi",2020-01-11,"Job SummarySudyog InfraProjects Private Limited is constructing a luxury residential building in South Delhi, and we are looking for a Project Co-Ordinator Manager who will be involved with the complete construction project.The ideal candidate has experience as Project Manager / Co-Ordinator with luxury residential projects in the Delhi NCR region. Preference will be given to candidates who have worked on projects of independent houses / builder floors.Responsibilities include:1. Project planning and co-ordination with Architect.2. Defining project schedules, timelines and budgets.3. Managing project tasks and schedules using Project Management Tools such as Zoho Projects.4. Co-ordination between architect, contractor and different vendors.5. Preparing reports to monitor and track progress on site.6. Checking of bills and quantities.7. Co-ordinating with the various vendors and consultants on the project.8. Overall project supervision, liasoning and co-ordination.Responsibilities and DutiesResponsibilities include:1. Project planning and co-ordination with Architect.2. Defining project schedules, timelines and budgets.3. Managing project tasks and schedules using Project Management Tools such as Zoho Projects.4. Co-ordination between architect, contractor and different vendors.5. Preparing reports to monitor and track progress on site.6. Checking of bills and quantities.7. Co-ordinating with the various vendors and consultants on the project.8. Overall project supervision, liasoning and co-ordination.Required Experience, Skills and QualificationsPreference will be given to candidates with experience in supervision / management of construction of builder floors / independent bungalows.Job Type: Full-timeSalary: 50,000.00 to 75,000.00 /monthExperience:work: 5 years (Preferred)Education:Higher Secondary(12th Pass) (Preferred)Industry:Construction","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=8ed9aab825f64f2d,8ed9aab825f64f2d,indeed,ZOHO
new,Account Manager,Express Stores,"Gurgaon, Haryana",2020-02-04,"Job SummaryExposure of ZOHO Books to do accounting and invoicingExposure of Tally to do accountingPrevious startup exposure shall be preferableGood excel exposure (Vlookup, Sumif and pivot tables)Handling Accounts Receivable and PayablesBasic knowledge of TDS and GSTResponsibilities and DutiesExposure of ZOHO Books to do accounting and invoicingExposure of Tally to do accountingPrevious startup exposure shall be preferableGood excel exposure (Vlookup, Sumif and pivot tables)Handling Accounts Receivable and PayablesBasic knowledge of TDS and GSTJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 250,000.00 to 300,000.00 /yearExperience:work: 2 years (Preferred)total work: 2 years (Preferred)ZOHO: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=04ab5c61e977ca55,04ab5c61e977ca55,indeed,ZOHO
new,Walkin for Tele caller,Magnatek Enterprises ( Group of Companies),"Hyderabad, Telangana",2020-01-11,"Job Summaryob Summary1)Preparing Mis reports by end of the month2)Preparing tour plans of sales team3)Daily updation for Sales Teams in their Dsr reports4)Cold ,hot ,warm calls to customers about requirement5)Need to search for Mot, medical gas pipeline,hospital architects,hospital consultants for tieing up purposes with company and fix appointments if they are interested with our sales team6)Search and work on exhibitions7)Zoho crm updations on daily basis.8) Sending coatations to send the customers9) Follow up pending payments10) Drafting and sending mails with proper repliesPreferred FemaleInterested Candidates Directly Walk-in Between MON-SAT( 9:00AM to 4:00PM)****Interview Venue: Magnatek Enterprises ( Group of Companies)Flat no #501, Sanali Castle,Opp: Polo Services ApartmentNear Roots college,Near Hotel Katriya,Somajiguda, Hyderabad 500082Contact HR : Mr. SrinivasExperience in Excel, Drafting mails, and typingJob Type: Full-timeJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 13,000.00 to 16,000.00 /monthExperience:Tele calling: 4 years (Required)Education:Bachelor's (Required)Industry:Customer Service","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=d3c8ece209c6b11a,d3c8ece209c6b11a,indeed,ZOHO
new,Pre Sales Support Executive,Millennia Global Soft P Ltd,"Chennai, Tamil Nadu",2020-02-03,"Job SummaryJob Description :Responsibilities:You will assist in presenting our technology and our vision to prospective customers during the sales cycle.You will be expected to gather intelligence on market trends and expectations. Requirements:  * 2 or more years of work experience in a Sales Engineering / Solutions Engineering / Presales role in a SaaS company.Creative problem solver with a proven track record of success.Comfortable delivering technical sales presentations, product positioning, and objection handling.Familiarity and experience with common help desk platforms (Zendesk, Front, Salesforce, Freshworks)Experience with CRM and Sales enablement platforms (Salesforce, Outreach, Hubspot, Zoho CRM)  * Strong problem-solving skills.Ability to build strong relationships with customers and colleaguesResponsibilities and DutiesWork directly with prospects to demonstrate and communicate the value proposition of videos in any business function.Understand any technical requirement of prospects, evaluate the feasibility and communicate to prospects.You will be expected to collaborate with Product Management, Engineering, and other tech teams.Have a comprehensive understanding of the competitive landscape of competing and complementary technologies.Key Skills1-2 years of Pre Sales tools, skills and knowledge of MS OFFICE TOOLS, POWER POINT, VIDEO EDITORS AND PRESENTATION MATERIALSRequired Experience and Qualifications1-2 YEARS OF PROVEN EXPERIENCE IN PRE SALES SUPPORT AND COORDINATIONJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 10,000.00 to 16,000.00 /monthExperience:working pre sales: 1 year (Preferred)","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=09a7e74db01cd570,09a7e74db01cd570,indeed,ZOHO
new,Inside Sales Engineer  Product Engineering Services,Asha Consultancy services,"Ahmedabad, Gujarat",2020-02-06,"Job SummaryJob Description: Reach out prospects by Email marketing, Cold calling, LinkedIn and other online prospecting toolsCold call targeted prospects in the US & UK followed by initial requirement understanding & technical discussionGetting connect to C-level executives like CEOs, CTOs, R&D Managers etc.Quick learner, understand the business unit of Optimized Solutions Ltd and able to discuss/propose solutions & engineering servicesStrike effective conversation during introductory calls which takes forward to schedule technical discussion with teamWork to generate suspects database through online portal, exhibitions and extraction toolAchieve weekly and monthly target for lead generationKey SkillsRequired Skills Competency: 2+ years work experience in internal sales with Product Engineering or IT company only Technical knowledge to understand the challenges in requirement, Exposure to Embedded Systems, IoT, Firmware, Hardware & Software development services Engineering Services Lead generation experience Excellent communication skills with good presentation and logical reasoning skill Eager to meeting Lead generation target using email marketing, Cold Call, LinkedIn, online prospecting tools Comfortable with Google search, LinkedIn and MS Excel to build prospect database Hardworking, energetic and passionate about sales, align with companys vision to achieve the goal Experience and understanding about sales-cycle Prior exposure with online CRM tool or worked with Zoho CRM would be plus Flexible to work in evening part as per requirement (If any call scheduled), No Night ShiftRequired Experience and Qualifications2+ years work experience and Qualification :  B.Tech/B.E. In Electronics/E&C/ComputerJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 0.00 /yearExperience:work: 1 year (Preferred)Customer Service: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Secondary(10th Pass) (Preferred)","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=63f5e642860164f3,63f5e642860164f3,indeed,ZOHO
new,Customer Care Executive,Tzar Industries Pvt Ltd,"Tiruchchirappalli, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-11,"Job Summary*KRA's (Key Responsibility Areas): **Customer Relationship Management: *Answer calls professionally to provide information about products and services, take/ cancel orders, or obtain details of complaints.Keep records of customer interactions and transactions, recording details of inquiries, complaints, and comments, as well as actions taken. Process orders, forms and applications*Crisis & Conflict Management: *Point-of-Contact for all customer-related issues like Product Delivery, Spares dispatch, Warranty call, and other Value-Added-Services provided to the customer.Follow up to ensure that appropriate actions were taken on customers' requests.Refer unresolved customer grievances or special requests to designated departments for further investigation.Co-ordination with Couriers, Service technicians, Online portals (Flipkart, Amazon etc) for to ensure proper delivery of service to customers.*Skill-Sets Required: *Advanced proficiency & Fluency in English & HindiMS Office - Word & Excel*Bonus Skills/Qualifications: *e-commerce ExposureFitness Equipment Domain ExposureZoho One Suite Knowledge*Qualifications & Experience: *Any Under-Graduation DegreeTeam Management Experience (not-mandatory)Customer-Handling Experience (not-mandatory)*Soft Skills Needed: *Ability to listen and DE-escalatetense situations with customersProfessional Communication with Customers, Technicians & other Business partnersInterpersonal Relationship ManagementJob Types: Full-time, FresherExperience:total work: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Location:Tiruchchirappalli, Tamil Nadu (Required)Language:English (Required)Hindi (Required)Selection rounds:Written testHR InterviewTechnical InterviewIndustry:Sports","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=e923d34559d689ef,e923d34559d689ef,indeed,ZOHO
new,Accountant,Jobhunt HR and IT Consultancy,"Ahmedabad, Gujarat",2020-02-07,"Job SummaryAccountant required with knowledge of managing accounts in excel and zoho 4 years of experience.Send your resume to schedule interviews on 19 January, 2020Job Type: Full-timeExperience:Accountant: 4 years (Preferred)Industry:Software Development","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=72cc1a83063083f4,72cc1a83063083f4,indeed,ZOHO
new,Export sales & Marketing executive,Ship Automation,"Ahmedabad, Gujarat",2020-02-04,"Job SummaryPosition : Export Sales & Marketing executive- help increase sales of the company- Lead Generation by Marketing- Customer ManagementResponsibilities and Duties- Email Marketing , Tele calling & LinkedIn Marketing- Manage customer request and orders- Sending Quotations and Invoice to customer- Build new marketing strategies to help generate more leads.Qualifications and Skills- Bachelors in Engineering or Marketing- Good computer skills- Thorough knowledge with MS office- Good proficiency with English- Experience with Zoho CRM , Books and CampaignsBenefits- Our job has no salary limitations . Our salary structure is Fixed + ComissionJob Types: Full-time, Part-time, Internship, CommissionSalary: 20,000.00 to 25,000.00 /monthExperience:total work: 1 year (Preferred)Lead generation: 1 year (Preferred)marketing: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Language:English (Preferred)English , Hindi (Preferred)Marketing Experience:Marketing Campaigns (Preferred)Industry:Sales","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=bd785ba5596a27de,bd785ba5596a27de,indeed,ZOHO
new,Hiring For Digital Marketing Executive,Interfocus Service Private Limited,"Madurai, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-18,"Job SummaryGood Experience in Digital marketing role to handle both B2B and B2C. Need to Build, plan and implement the overall digital marketing strategy. Manage and optimize all Social Media channels. Lead Generation to be done through Paid Marketing channels for both B2B and B2C business. Preparing internal reports, that provide insight into performance, Budget and conversions. Forecast performance trends and indicators. Stay up to date with the latest technology and updates of all social media and search media channels.Key Skills1. Good Experience in SEM/PPC2.Social media optimization - Good knowledge in all social media channels3.Need Effective Skill sets in Social Media Marketing activities in all social media channels FB, Twitter, Instagram, LinkedIn, Youtube Advertising and Experience in Native advertising tools.4.Good Experience in Email marketing and display advertising campaigns.5.Capability to Enhance Marketing database,basic knowledge in Lead generation tools and CRM tools like hubspot,ZohoRequired Experience and QualificationsExperience required is 3 to 5 yearsIndustry Type: All verticals - B2B or B2C . Good scope in HealthCare.Functional Area : Social Media tools Optimization, Paid Advertising, Media Planning, Analytics and Reporting.Employment Type: Full Time, PermanentRole Category: Digital Marketing ExecutiveEducation: UG : BE (or) Bsc Cs/ BCA / BBA (or) other graduates Need any Certification in Digital Marketing.PG : OptionalInterested Candidate please make a call to 9444450037Job Type: Full-timeExperience:work: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 3 years (Preferred)Digital Marketing: 1 year (Preferred)digital marketing campaign: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Benefits:Flexible work hoursIndustry:IT Operations & HelpdeskSpeak with the employer+91 9444450037","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=e233562de49b1035,e233562de49b1035,indeed,ZOHO
new,Business Development Executive,iSN Business Solutions LLP,"Mumbai, Maharashtra",2020-02-07,"Job SummaryBusiness Development Experience in the BPO/KPO/LPO industryKnowledgeable about the end-to-end sales cycle in the US market.Strong Functional/Domain experience in Data Processing, Market Research outsourcing, Lead Generation / Sales Support Process outsourcing, Designing & Web Development / other IT Services/Non-voice BPO servicesEstablished network and contacts in the industryStrong business acumen with an entrepreneurial mindsetExperience and expertise in effectively using CRM tools such as SalesForce, ZOHO, etcShould be an individual contributor.Willing to work in US shift.Responsibilities and DutiesBusiness development for iSNs service offerings in the US marketsLead generation and responding to RFPs/ tenders Managing the entire sales life cycle, starting from prospecting through closure.Farm existing accounts.Achieving revenue targets.Actively engage in social media marketing to promote iSNs service offerings.Qualifications and SkillsGraduation in any discipline, MBA would be a plus.Job Type: Full-timeSalary: 50,000.00 to 250,000.00 /yearExperience:Sales: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)business development: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Location:Mumbai, Maharashtra (Preferred)Language:English, Hindi & Marathi (Required)Industry:IT Operations & Helpdesk","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=c2ab6f085beccec0,c2ab6f085beccec0,indeed,ZOHO
new,Business Development Executive( Night shift),Luminite Services,"Bengaluru, Karnataka",2020-01-23,"Job SummaryJob Title: BDEExperience: 1- 3 yearsNo. of Vacancies: 1Shift - Mid Shift ( 3 PM- 12 Midnight)Work Location: Infantry Road, BangaloreJob Title: BDE*Experience: 0- 3 yearsNo. of Vacancies: 1Shift  US Shift ( 5 PM- 2 AM)Work Location: Infantry Road, BangaloreResponsibilities and DutiesJob Title: BDE*Experience: 0- 3 yearsNo. of Vacancies: 1Shift  US Shift ( 5 PM- 2 AM)Work Location: Infantry Road, BangaloreRequirements:0-3 year of experienceBachelors degree in any courseMBA in Sales/Marketing (preferable)Excellent CommunicationAggressive Sales NatureJob Role:Data mining to identify potential customers from International marketSetting up customer meetings and explaining our capabilitiesCreating Proposals and ContractsNegotiating deals with customers and partnersLiaison with Delivery team for pre-sales and Project scoping activitiesEntering real-time information into CRM system.Liaison with the Marketing team to run email campaigns and convert prospects to customers.Job Title: BDEExperience: 1- 3 yearsNo. of Vacancies: 1Shift - Mid Shift ( 3 PM- 12 Midnight)Work Location: Infantry Road, BangaloreJob Description:Responsibilities:Cold calling prospects to create pipeline for new business opportunitiesBuild contact database for brand awareness and lead generationCall and Reply to email/call responses by prospectsMaintain knowledge of all service offerings of the company and respond accordinglyKeep prospective client database updatedWork closely with the marketing team to analyze and collect information for Data generationSkills:Experience with CRM tools (Salesforce, Zoho, Siebel etc)Experience in using search engines & business research tools to compile dataQuality of data generation is a mustExperience with data tools like LinkedIn, Rainking, Discover.org,Knowledge about marketing tools like zoho, mailchimp will be an added advantageExcellent written and verbal communicationComputer skills  Excel, wordGood attitude and willingness to learn & deliver under pressure and achieve set targetsProactive and self-drivenMust be detail oriented and an active listenerMust have excellent interpersonal skillsQualifications and SkillsBDE*Experience: 1- 3 years( UK Shift) - Any Graduation, post-graduation.BDEExperience: 0- 3 years ( US Shift)1. Bachelors degree in any course2.MBA in Sales/Marketing (preferable)Skills - Excellent communication skills in EnglishTechnical Skills - Zoho, siebel, salesforce.Linkedin, rainking .Job Type: Full-timeSalary: 300,000.00 to 500,000.00 /yearExperience:business development: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Required)Location:Bengaluru, Karnataka (Preferred)Language:English (Required)Shifts:Night (Required)Sales role:AcquisitionTypical team size:7+Industry:Software Development","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=24b41489f1320b1d,24b41489f1320b1d,indeed,ZOHO
new,URGENT HIRING FOR CREATOR DEVELOPER,IMC GROUP,"Chennai, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-17,"Job SummaryGreetings from MC!!!Urgent Hiring for Creator developerExperience : 1 to 5 YearsSkillset:Low-code / rapid application development/ BPM platforms.Zoho CreatorHTML,CSSResponsibilities and DutiesResponsibility: Good experience on Requirement/Design/Code Review & Inspections practicesFamiliar with Java, Java Script, building database applications, HTML, CSS.Experience with low-code / rapid application development/ BPM platforms.Experience working within a global delivery modelProven track record of growing business and exceeding revenue targets.Technical acumen to adapt to new technologies quickly.Must possess strong communication and interpersonal skills. Team player.Excellent problem-solving and debugging skills with a solid understanding of testing practicesJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 400,000.00 /yearExperience:zoho creator: 1 year (Preferred)Lowcode BPM Platform: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Diploma (Preferred)Location:Chennai, Tamil Nadu (Required)Benefits:Paid leaves / Leave encashmentFlexible work hoursHousing rent subsidy:YesIndustry:Software Development","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=47eeb66cb531cc65,47eeb66cb531cc65,indeed,ZOHO
new,Sales & Marketing Executive,Ship Automation,"Ahmedabad, Gujarat",2020-02-01,"Job SummarySales & Marketing Executive -- Find customers & leads globally for company's products- help increase sales of the company- Email marketing - Tele-calling to leads- Customer managementResponsibilities and Duties- Sales & Export documentation- CRM- Prepare marketing material- help develop new strategies for marketing- Linkedin MarketingQualifications and Skills- Bachelors in Engineering , Management, Administration or Computer application- High proficiency in English- MS office - Outlook , Excel , Word and PP- CRM software - ZOHO can be an advantageJob Types: Full-time, Part-time, Temporary, Internship, CommissionSalary: 15,000.00 to 20,000.00 /monthExperience:total work: 1 year (Preferred)Lead generation: 1 year (Preferred)marketing: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Language:English (Preferred)Industry:Electrical Engineering","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=cc545e64d0c4e440,cc545e64d0c4e440,indeed,ZOHO
new,Sales Executive,Four Brothers Softwares,"Bhandup, Mumbai, Maharashtra",2020-01-22,"Job SummaryJob descriptionKey Responsibilities: *- Acquire in depth knowledge of our services.- Enhance & build the existing pipeline.- Lead generation & Follow-up.- Deliver presentations, proposals and demonstrations.- Qualify and manage opportunities including writing proposals and responding to queries.- Identify key buying influencers within these prospects.- Monitor and report on all activities and pipelines.- Maintain excellent customer satisfaction through effective account management.Candidate Profile: - Minimum 4-6 years sales/business development experience in the IT Sales segment.- Experience in CRM & ERP applications at a Corporate/Enterprise level- Experience in SaaS/Cloud Services/IT-Infrastructure/Data Center is an added advantage- Ability to influence decision makers at all levels- Excellent negotiation and communication skills, both oral and written- Self-motivated and target driven- Should be prepared to travelTechnical Experience: - Proficient in O365 (Word, Excel, Powerpoint, Outlook)- Experience in ZOHO is an added advantage- Experience with CRM Software functioning & Cloud Services is preferredRoleSales/Business Development ManagerIndustry TypeIT-Hardware & NetworkingFunctional AreaSales, Retail, Business DevelopmentEmployment TypeFull Time, PermanentRole CategoryRetail SalesEducationUG : Any Graduate in Any SpecializationPG : Post Graduation Not RequiredDoctorate : Doctorate Not RequiredKey SkillsResponsibilities and DutiesLead GenerationAccount ManagementProposal WritingCustomer SatisfactionBusiness DevelopmentIT SalesProposalsData CenterIT ManagementCRMJob Types: Full-time, Part-time, TemporarySalary: 15,000.00 /monthExperience:work: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Secondary(10th Pass) (Preferred)Benefits:Paid leaves / Leave encashmentPhone / Internet reimbursementSales role:AcquisitionInboundOutboundTravel requirements:Yes - ~75%Industry:Software DevelopmentSpeak with the employer+91 7208483620","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=4acb1ea371f72066,4acb1ea371f72066,indeed,ZOHO
new,Finance Executive,Tzar Industries Pvt Ltd,"Tiruchchirappalli, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-11,"Job SummaryJob Type **:  Full TimeQualification **:  B.Com/M.com, BBA/MBA (Finance)Job Location **:  TrichyKRA's (Key Responsibility Areas): Maintenance of Book of Accounts for the business in Zoho books.Verification and Accounting of all invoices/bills received from Vendors.Ensuring on time payments for Vendors/Customers.Managing Office Expenses.Reconciliation of Accounts Payable and Accounts Receivable.Reconciliation of Bank Accounts.Processing of employee payroll.Co-ordination with banks regarding company accounts, loans etc.Processing monthly GST Liability & Filing of GST Returns.Ensuring all regulatory compliance like ROC, ITR, etc.Assist in all company documentation-related work.Skill-Sets R*equired: *MS officeKnowledge in accounting package like QuickBooks/ZOHO/XEROBook-Keeping knowledgeQualifications & Experience Required/Preferred: Any degree in Accounting, Finance, Commerce and BusinessMin 1 year work experience in finance/accounting/commerceBonus if you have experience with: Knowledge of Zoho Books or other advanced accounting tools.Exposure to E-CommerceJob Types: Full-time, Fresher, Walk-InExperience:Financial Accounting: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Required)Location:Tiruchchirappalli, Tamil Nadu (Required)Language:English (Required)Selection rounds:Written testHR InterviewTechnical InterviewIndustry:Sports","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=5b6b871c34ce12bc,5b6b871c34ce12bc,indeed,ZOHO
new,Market Research Executive,Cubedots Pvt. Ltd,"Indore, Madhya Pradesh",2020-01-27,"Responsibilities and DutiesDo secondary research and compile data into presentable formatCollect data on consumers, competitors and market place and consolidate information into actionable items, reports and presentations.Understand business objectives and design surveys to discover prospective customers preferences Compile and analyze statisticalPerform valid and reliable market research SWOT analysisInterpret data, formulate reports and make recommendationsUse online market research and catalogue findings to databasesProvide competitive analysis on various companies market offerings, identify market trends, pricing/business models, sales and methods of operationEvaluate program methodology and key data to ensure that data on the releases are accurate and the angle of the release is correctRemain fully informed on market trends, other parties research and implement best practicesKey SkillsMarket Research, Marketing, Sales SupportRequired Experience and QualificationsProven market research analysis experienceAbility to interpret large amounts of data and to multi-taskStrong communication and presentation skillsExcellent knowledge of databases and MS OfficeSearch engines usageFamiliarity with CRM programs like ZOHO etcAdequate knowledge of data collection methods (polls, focus groups, surveys etc)Working knowledge of data warehousing, modelling and miningJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 200,000.00 to 350,000.00 /yearExperience:total work: 2 years (Preferred)Education:Master's (Preferred)Location:Indore City, Madhya Pradesh (Preferred)Language:English (Preferred)Benefits:Provident fund (PF)Industry:Software Development","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=0773298e039bad83,0773298e039bad83,indeed,ZOHO
new,Accounts Executive,Averest Group,"Ghaziabad, Uttar Pradesh",2020-01-15,"Job SummaryRequired any male or married female candidate,B.Com Graduate2 years of experience of accounts postResponsibilities and DutiesThe candidate should be handle all accounts workGST Portal & FilingTDS Portal & FilingTally or Busy, Zoho books, QuickbooksGood in Excel Bank ReconciliationInventory management .Bank Loan processImport Remittance process.Good typing speed running and numericPreference : Nearby locations of Ghaziabad & East Delhi, Noida.Job Type: Full-timeSalary: 250,000.00 to 275,000.00 /yearExperience:work: 2 years (Preferred)total work: 2 years (Required)Education:Bachelor's (Required)Location:Ghaziabad, Uttar Pradesh (Preferred)Language:english, hindi (Preferred)Benefits:Paid leaves / Leave encashmentOtherIndustry:Production & Manufacturing","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=b69769279d6761a6,b69769279d6761a6,indeed,ZOHO
new,CRM Implementation Specialist,Extension technologies,"Delhi, Delhi",2020-01-16,"Job SummaryPosition: Zoho Implementation SpecialistHave a functional understanding of ZOHO in its entirety, including Zoho CRM Plus, Workplace, Finance Plus, IT management etc.- Be efficient in implementation, getting customizations done and administration work related to Zoho and its related apps i.e. Recruit, CRM, Zoho mail etc.- Have a complete understanding of the process from Development till the end support. A complete knowledge about the system configuration and its setup.- However boring it may sound, but you will need to be able to do technical documentation of the work.- Assist, train and create guidelines for the users to understand the complexities of the product. Because hey! That's what we are getting the money for.- Work closely with the clients and understand their needs and requirements.- Be ready to travel to different onsite locations for work if needed. We provide free trips along with work, we are that awesome.Key SkillsZoho CRM plus,, Finance Plus, workplace, IT Mangement, Zoho, Zoho recruit, Zoho peopleRequired Experience and QualificationsExp: 1-2 yearsJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 20,000.00 to 30,000.00 /monthExperience:Function Consultant: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Zoho CRM: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Diploma (Preferred)Location:Delhi (Preferred)Industry:Software Development","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=25bc82b39ca56c85,25bc82b39ca56c85,indeed,ZOHO
new,Customer Service Manager (CSM),houzyy.com,"Mohali Sas Nagar, Chandigarh",2020-01-28,"Job SummaryCustomer Service Manager (CSM) is a key position in our start up. CSM will be performing and overlooking vendor and customer onboarding activities, meeting scheduling, hiring and training CS executives and reporting to management in addition to other roles.Responsibilities and DutiesCustomer Service Manager (CSM) will be responsible for:- Making business development calls- Scheduling appointments for respective department executives- Coordination with vendors and customers on marketplace- Training Inbound service call and Outbound Market Call executives- Team hiring- Monitoring CRM activities- Reporting and analysis- Team performance monitoringKey Skills- Excellent communication skills (Fluent English is must), Microsoft Office, CRM Software (Zoho CRM professional will be preferred), - Leadership QualitiesRequired Experience and Qualifications- Minimum Bachelors in academics- Minimum 3 Years Work Experience- MS Office, Internet Research capabilities and acquaintance with CRMsBenefitsGrow along as the Start Up grows. Growth is assured with performance and results.Job Type: Full-timeSalary: 180,000.00 to 300,000.00 /yearExperience:sales: 3 years (Required)Education:Bachelor's (Required)Location:Mohali Sas Nagar, Chandigarh (Preferred)Language:English (Required)Industry:Construction","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=e20849cd2341ebc6,e20849cd2341ebc6,indeed,ZOHO
new,Sales Executive,Nanak Furnishers Pvt Ltd,"Delhi, Delhi",2020-01-30,"Job SummarySales Executive position requires a candidate to sell wooden flooring, exterior wooden decking & cladding, artificial grass & wooden pergola to retail clients, architects & builders.Responsibilities and Duties1. Make presentation of the product to retail clients, architects & dealers2. Meet dealers regularly3. Visit sites to collect the data of Architects, builder & retail client4. Supervision of the sites 5. Take measurements of the site, calculate the area & provide estimate to the client6. Calling on the leads & following up on the potentials7. Work & update the data on the Zoho CRM8. Candidate must have his own motorcycle, preferably 100cc & willing to travel for at least 100kms/day9. Proactively planning for next days tasks & meetings10. Build dealer network11. Tour multiple cities & meet dealers12. Build database from site visits, dealer visits & internetKey SkillsClient should have basic knowledge of mensuration to calculate area of a siteRequired Experience and QualificationsMinimum 2 years of experienceBenefitsESI+PFJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 18,000.00 to 25,000.00 /monthExperience:sales: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 2 years (Preferred)Business Development: 1 year (Preferred)Lead generation: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Required)Location:Delhi, Delhi (Required)Licence:Driving Licence (Required)Required travel:50% (Preferred)Required Assets:Smartphone (Required)Two wheeler (Required)Required Documents:Address Proof (Required)Aadhar Card (Required)Driver's License (Required)Sales Experience:Field Sales (Preferred)Benefits:Provident fund (PF)Phone / Internet reimbursementHealth insuranceTravel requirements:Yes - ~50%Industry:Construction","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=1b94f811eff15b52,1b94f811eff15b52,indeed,ZOHO
new,Junior Software Engineer,Extension technologies,"Delhi, Delhi",2020-01-16,"Job SummaryPosition: Software Engineer(API)/ API Developer/Web Developer(API)Cooperating with the back-end developer in the process of building the Restful API Communicating with external web servicesDeep knowledge of Angular JS practices and commonly used modules based on extensive work experienceExtensive knowledge of CSS and Java Script methods for providing performant visual effects.Documenting the code inline using JSDoc or other conventionsWorking on the latest and greatest technology stack like Angular 2/4, NodeJS, JQuery, Bootstrap, DelugeWriting tested, idiomatic, and documented JavaScript, HTML and CSSKey SkillsJavaScript, Rest API, Deluge(Zoho), CSSRequired Experience and QualificationsExp: 1+ yearsJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 15,000.00 to 25,000.00 /monthExperience:API development: 1 year (Preferred)Rest API: 1 year (Preferred)Javascript: 1 year (Preferred)Deluge(zoho): 1 year (Preferred)Education:Diploma (Preferred)Location:Delhi (Preferred)Industry:Software Development","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=27fe46659debbce2,27fe46659debbce2,indeed,ZOHO
new,Financial Accountant,Bytize,"Chennai, Tamil Nadu",2020-01-30,"Job SummaryFinancial Account would be accountant for the company from managing the complete accounting requirements.Responsibilities and DutiesBelow are the roles and responsibility1. Raising performa invoice and invoice to the customers2. Manage billing and subscription payments from Customers.3. Follow-up on the payments.4. Co-ordinate on the payments with sales team.5. Should file GST for the monthly GST filing for company6. Co-ordinate with Auditor for the IT filing and tax audits.7. On weekly basis should provide the update on the cashflows and payment collectionsKey SkillsExcel, tally, Zoho, Windows, microsoftwordRequired Experience and QualificationsShould have minimum 2-3 years experience with overall accountingShould have good experience with Excel sheetShould have good experience with Zoho or tally book keepingJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 10,000.00 to 15,000.00 /monthExperience:zoho: 1 year (Preferred)Accounts Management: 2 years (Preferred)Accounting: 2 years (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=b0a44c458a63bf57,b0a44c458a63bf57,indeed,ZOHO
new,Full Stack PHP Developer (Event Ticketing),Raj Khanna Pty Ltd,"Lajpat Nagar, Delhi, Delhi",2020-02-05,"Job SummaryFull Stack PHP Developer (Event Ticketing)We're looking for an experienced PHP developer who is passionate about tech & entertainment to maintain and improve a world-class event ticketing platform, to join our growing global team, working out of our office in New Delhi. Ultimately enabling our users to choose and book the best tickets.Bollywood Club by Raj Khanna Pty Ltd, New Delhi#1 Invite-only Club - Let us create a parallel universe for the people who go wild for great music and the most happening bunch of party animals.Elitist Venues- For an exclusive experience at every party, we choose the best venues around the city. One of our perks of being a pop up club!Bollywood in the House- Making nights crazier with the best DJs playing Bollywood, House, Commercial and Top 40 Hits is our most treasured task.We have a team of 30+ people based in New Delhi. We have our offices in Australia, Singapore, India, New Zealand.https://www.bollywoodclubx.com/Responsibilities and DutiesResponsibilities:Practical experience using PHP 5+ (3+ years);Strong competency in JavaScript, jQuery, HTML5 / CSS3Experience with adaptive cross-browser layout, valid code;Designing for and deploying to cloud infrastructure (Amazon AWS)Proficiency in SQL.Proficiency in Git source control.Understanding & Implementation Experience with a CRM (Zoho/Salesforce)Desirable Skills:Experience in E-commerce or specially ticketing platformPassion for theatre or live eventsQualifications and SkillsA bachelor's or masters degree in computer science, information systems or an equivalent is preferred. Knowledge of design principles for delivering highly available and highly scalable web systemsJob Type: Full-timeSalary: 30,000.00 to 60,000.00 /monthExperience:.net: 2 years (Preferred)total work: 5 years (Preferred)Java: 2 years (Preferred)Angular / Node JS: 3 years (Preferred)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Benefits:Paid leaves / Leave encashmentTravel allowanceMeal card / Food couponsFlexible work hoursEducation assistanceOtherIndustry:Marketing","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=0e55c7cba329b4af,0e55c7cba329b4af,indeed,ZOHO
new,Inside Sales Representative,Extension technologies,"Delhi, Delhi",2020-01-21,"Job SummaryWe are looking for a motivated and well-spoken Inside Sales Representative to join our sales team. The Inside Sales Representative will be responsible for developing new leads, communicating with customers, understanding their needs, and ensuring a smooth sales process. You should be able to close sales and meet targets.Responsibilities and Duties**4+ years inside sales experienceExperience with (ERP/CRM/EPM/Financials/Accounting/Supply Chain, etc.) software solutions, ideally with experience in both direct and indirect sales models working in an extended team would be a strong plus.Experienced in (Business) Software Applications License Sales, ideally ERP/EPM/Supply Chain/Financials. Experience in Cloud sales will be a plus.Experience in different sales techniques like face-to-face, social selling and other.Experience in selling across all lines of businesses within enterprise organisations.Strong communication and presentation skillsAbility to take a leading sales role, managing virtual teams and executing successful sales strategies.Experience in hunting for new business, prospecting over a large territoryCommunicating with customers, making outbound calls to potential customers, and following up on leads.Understanding customers' needs and identifying sales opportunities.Answering potential customers' questions and sending additional information per email.Keeping up with product and service information and updates.Creating and maintaining a database of current and potential customers.Explaining and demonstrating features of products and services.Staying informed about competing products and services.Up selling products and services.Researching and qualifying new leads.Closing sales and achieving sales targets.Should be able to generate contact information generation (email, phone etc)Should use social media platform to generate leads.Valid Data Base generation through LinkedIn and similar websites.Data filtration and validation experience.Lead Generation through campaigns like Cold Calling and E-mails.Generating meeting with prospects.Experience in managing data using CRM.Required Experience and QualificationsHigh school diploma/Bachelors.Previous experience in an outbound call center or a related sales position preferred.Proficiency in Microsoft Office and CRM software such as Salesforce.com, zoho, etcExcellent communication skills, both verbal and written.Good organizational skills and the ability to multitask.Excellent phone and cold calling skills.Exceptional customer service skills.Strong listening and sales skills.Ability to achieve targets.Experience in managing data using CRM.Job Type: Full-timeExperience:client calling: 1 year (Preferred)inside sales: 1 year (Preferred)total work: 1 year (Preferred)Education:Higher Secondary(12th Pass) (Preferred)Location:Delhi (Preferred)Industry:Software Development","Apply securely with Indeed Resume
Urgently hiring",https://www.indeed.co.in/viewjob?jk=95430c4220993ecd,95430c4220993ecd,indeed,ZOHO
new,Job Title: Zoho Developers,YESCRM.org,Mumbai,2020-01-25,"Location: Mumbai

Position Type: Fulltime

Job Description: The Zoho developer shall be responsible for designing and implementing critical customer-facing solutions, mainly on Zoho platform. The job requires a self-motivated, driven individual with excellent verbal and written communication skills. The developer may also have to manage/train other team members.

Desired Skills and Experience:

Experience in building or implementing requirements using Zoho custom functions, with a deep understanding of Deluge, HTML, Javascript, and CSS

Excellent understanding of object-oriented concepts and design patterns, as well as with OO languages (Java, Ruby, C#, C++, etc)

Experience and knowledge of relational databases, including work with MySQL, SQL Server, Oracle, or other common RDBMS

Knowledge of Agile development practices, particularly sprint planning and assessment

Zoho developer certification preferred.

Educational Requirements :

BE / BCA / MCA (preferably)

Please email your resumes to: zdesai@yescrm.org",Easy Apply,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=113&ao=437149&s=58&guid=0000017030575b2689eb8afa587e2aef&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&ea=1&cs=1_02099e26&cb=1581358996365&jobListingId=3200933058,3200933058,glassdoor,ZOHO
new,Full Stack Software Developer,Zoho,Chennai,2020-02-05,"Greetings from ZOHO Corporation Pvt Ltd!  At ZOHO, we're building the most integrated suite of business products that exist on the cloud. With over 20 million users working online using ZOHO, your work impacts a wide variety of businesses across the world. Join us on this exciting and satisfying journey to build smart software for growing businesses.  We're expanding and would love to have you as part of our growth. ZOHO is now hiring ' Java Full-Stack Developer ' If you're excited to be part of a winning team, ZOHO is a perfect place to get ahead.
Job Description: 
The Java Full-Stack Developer will be part of the Application Development with true experience from front-end development to SQL databases. The candidate will be responsible for the development, and support of the respective product modules. This profile is also expected to develop the frameworks and interaction models for the overall suite of systems. 
Roles and Responsibilities:
We are looking for a Full Stack Java Engineer with a strong interest in designing, building, deploying, and operating web tools and services that process enormous quantities of data in performant ways. Participates in the full SDLC/Agile cycle engagements, including meetings, iterative development, and design sessions. Solves technical problems using cutting edge technologies and best practices. Mentor teammates and support them in solving critical challenges. Contribute technical expertise to all projects as required.
Desired Skills and Experience:


Deep understanding & experience in Java.
Strong fundamental knowledge in Object-Oriented Design Principles, Data Structures, Algorithms, SQL.
More than 1+ years of experience building large-scale software applications.
Some experience with web application development using JavaScript, JQuery, HTML5, CSS, JSON, RESTful Web Services
Experience with one or more of the following databases: Postgres, SQL Server or MySQL.
Familiarity with front-end technologies, HTML, CSS, the angular and JavaScript experience is plus, should have the aptitude to learn front-end development.
Experience with jUnit and other testing frameworks is a plus.
Experience in working with web application performance monitor and monitoring tools is a plus.","Hot
Easy Apply",https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=101&ao=771766&s=58&guid=0000017030575b2689eb8afa587e2aef&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&ea=1&cs=1_2959d195&cb=1581358996355&jobListingId=3355773962,3355773962,glassdoor,ZOHO
new,Software Developer,Zoho,Tenkasi,2020-01-31,"At ZOHO, we're building the most integrated suite of business products that exist in the cloud. With over 20 million users working online using ZOHO, your work impacts a wide variety of businesses across the world. Join us on this exciting and satisfying journey to build smart software for growing businesses.  We're expanding and would love to have you as part of our growth. ZOHO is now hiring ' Software Developer ' If you're excited to be part of a winning team, ZOHO is a perfect place to get ahead.Role: Software DeveloperWe are looking forward to hire candidates with 0-3 years of experience for the role of Member Technical Staff - Software Developer. We have scheduled a mass test on 21st September 2019 (Saturday) @ 09.00 AM at our Tenkasi Office.
This recruitment drive is to add talent at our Tenkasi office. kindly register using the following link - https://zoho.to/career-sd
Call letters will be sent to the registered and suitable candidates only along with the timing and venue details.
Note: Registration link will be deactivated on Thursday, 19th September 2019 by 05.00 PM. 
Job Description:

Design and develop high-volume, low-latency applications for mission-critical systems, delivering high-availability and performance. 
Contribute in all phases of the product development life cycle. 
Write well designed, testable, efficient code. 
Ensure designs are in compliance with specifications. 
Prepare and produce releases of software components. 
Support continuous improvement by investigating alternatives and technologies and presenting these for architectural review.","We're Hiring
Easy Apply",https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=102&ao=771766&s=58&guid=0000017030575b2689eb8afa587e2aef&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&ea=1&cs=1_a68e31e1&cb=1581358996356&jobListingId=3351721795,3351721795,glassdoor,ZOHO
new,Mobile Product Designer,Zoho Corporation Pvt. Ltd,Chennai,2020-01-30,"At ZOHO, we're building the most integrated suite of business products that exists on the cloud. With over 20 million users working online using ZOHO, your work impacts a wide variety of businesses across the world. Join us on this exciting and satisfying journey to build smart software for growing businesses.

We're expanding and would love to have you as part of our growth. ZOHO is now hiring ' Mobile Product Designer ' If you're excited to be part of a winning team, ZOHO is a perfect place to get ahead.

Role: Mobile Product Designer

Responsibilities

Develop the look and function for digital media interfaces including business website, games and other mobile devices.
1-5 years design experience in 100% native mobile applications.
Expert knowledge in any of the tools like Sketch, Figma or Adobe xd is a must.
Hands-on experience on Principle/Origami, Zeplin/InVision is a plus.
Strong native platform knowledge like Apple HIG, Google MD & accessibility guidelines is a plus.
Wearable & native desktop design exposure is an added advantage.

Should be ready to work from Zoho Chennai office.","We're Hiring
Easy Apply",https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=103&ao=771766&s=58&guid=0000017030575b2689eb8afa587e2aef&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&ea=1&cs=1_a199ea92&cb=1581358996357&jobListingId=3349941115,3349941115,glassdoor,ZOHO
new,Java Developer,Zoho,Chennai,2020-01-30,"At ZOHO, we're building the most integrated suite of business products that exist on the cloud. With over 20 million users working online using ZOHO, your work impacts a wide variety of businesses across the world. Join us on this exciting and satisfying journey to build smart software for growing businesses.  We're expanding and would love to have you as part of our growth. ZOHO is now hiring ' Java Developer ' If you're excited to be part of a winning team, ZOHO is a perfect place to get ahead.

Responsibilities

Work as part of a software development team
Write code per app specifications
Test to ensure designs are in compliance with specifications
Analyze user requirements to determine how to translate into Java
Debug and resolving technical issues
Make recommendations to existing job infrastructure
Continually engage in professional development
Develop documentation to track



Eligibility Criteria:

0-5 years of experience in Core Java. 
Experience in C,C++,Java or any OOPS based programming language.

If you find yourself suitable for the position, kindly register using the below linkhttps://zoho.to/ffE
Thanks in advance !!","We're Hiring
Easy Apply",https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=104&ao=771766&s=58&guid=0000017030575b2689eb8afa587e2aef&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&ea=1&cs=1_08d14cf6&cb=1581358996358&jobListingId=3349950925,3349950925,glassdoor,ZOHO
new,IOS Developer,Zoho,Chennai,2020-01-31,"At ZOHO, we're building the most integrated suite of business products that exist on the cloud. With over 20 million users working online using ZOHO, your work impacts a wide variety of businesses across the world. Join us on this exciting and satisfying journey to build smart software for growing businesses.  We're expanding and would love to have you as part of our growth. ZOHO is now hiring ' IOS Developer' If you're excited to be part of a winning team, ZOHO is a perfect place to get ahead.
Experience: 1 to 4 years
Job description:

1+ year of experience in iOS Development.
Deep understanding of the iOS platform.
Should be proficient in Objective C and Swift language.
Experience in developing libraries in iOS.
Should be strong in logical and analytical thinker.
Should have strong troubleshooting skills.","We're Hiring
Easy Apply",https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=106&ao=771766&s=58&guid=0000017030575b2689eb8afa587e2aef&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&ea=1&cs=1_e9a16d29&cb=1581358996360&jobListingId=3351772709,3351772709,glassdoor,ZOHO
